Vol. I. 2
HOPE LESLIE.
CHAPTER I.
Virtue may be assail'd, but never hurt,
Surpris'd by unjust force, but not inthrall'd;
Yea, even that which mischief meant most harm
Shall in the happy trial prove most glory.
Comus
.
William Fletcher
was the son of a respectable
country gentleman of Suffolk, in England; and
the destined heir of his uncle Sir William Fletcher,
an eminent lawyer, who had employed his talents
with such effective zeal and pliant principle, that
he had won his way to courtly favour and secured
a courtly fortune.
Sir William had only one childa daughter;
and possessing the common ambition of
transmitting
his name with his wealth, he selected his
nephew as the future husband of his daughter
Alice.
Take good heed, Sir William thus expressed
himself in a letter to his brother, take good
heed that the boy be taught unquestioning and
unqualified loyalty to his sovereignthe Alpha
and Omega of political duty. These are times
when every true subject has his price. Divers of
the leaders of the Commons are secret friends of
the seditious mischief-brewing puritans; and
Buckingham
himself is suspected of favouring their
cabalsbut this sub rosaI burn not my fingers
with these matters. `He who meddleth with
another man's strifes, taketh a dog by the ear,'
said the wisest man that ever lived; and he
thank Godwas a king. Caution Will against
all vain speculation and idle inquiriesthere are
those that are for ever inquiring and inquiring,
and never coming to the truth. One inquiry
should suffice for a loyal subject. `What is
established
?'
and that being well ascertained, the line
of duty is so plain, that he who runs may read.
I would that all our youths had inscribed on
their hearts that golden rule of political religion,
framed and well maintained by our good Queen
Elizabeth. `No man should be suffered to
decline
either on the left or on the right hand, from
the drawn line limited by authority, and by the
sovereign's laws and injunctions.'
Instead of such healthy maxims, our lads'
heads are crammed with the philosophy and
rhetoric
and history of those liberty-loving Greeks
and Romans. This is the pernicious lore that has
poisoned our academical fountains. Liberty, what
is it! Daughter of disloyalty and mother of all
misrulewho, from the hour that she tempted our
first parents to forfeit paradise, hath ever worked
mischief to our race.
But above all, brother, as you value the
temporal
salvation of your boy, restrain him from all
confederacy, association, or even acquaintance
with the puritans. If my master took counsel of
me, he would ship these mad canting fools to our
New-England colonies, where their tender
consciences
would be no more offended because,
forsooth
,
a prelate saith his prayers in white
vestments
,
and where they might enjoy with the
savages
that primitive equality, about which they
make such a pother. God forefend that our good
lad William should company with these misdoers!
He must be narrowly watched; for, as I hear,
there is a neighbour of yours, one Winthrop, (a
notable gentleman too, as they say, but he doth
grievously scandalize his birth and breeding) who
hath embraced these scurvy principles, and doth
magnify them with the authority of his birth and
condition, and hath much weight with the
country
.
There is in Suffolk too, as I am told, one
Eliot, a young zealota fanatical incendiary, who
doth find ample combustibles in the gossiping
matrons, idle maidens, and lawless youth who
flock about him.
These are dangerous neighboursrouse
yourself
,
brothergive over your idle sporting with
hawk and hound, and watch over this goodly scion
of oursours, I say, but I forewarn you, no
daughter
or guinea of mine shall ever go to one who is
infected with this spreading plague.
This letter was too explicit to be misunderstood;
but so far from having the intended effect of
awakening
the caution of the expectant of fortune,
it rather stimulated the pride of the independent
country gentleman. He permitted his son to
follow
the bent of accident, or the natural course of
a serious, reflecting, and enthusiastic temper.
Winthrop, the future governor of Massachusetts,
was the counsellor of young Fletcher; and
Eliot, the apostle of New-England, his most
intimate friend. These were men selected of
Heaven to achieve a great work. In the quaint
language of the time, the Lord sifted three
nations
for precious seed to sow the wilderness.
There were interested persons who were not
slow in conveying to Sir William unfavourable
reports of his nephew, and the young man
received
a summons from his uncle, who hoped, by
removing him from the infected region, to rescue
him from danger.
Sir William's pride was gratified by the elegant
appearance and graceful deportment of his
nephew
,
whom he had expected to see with the
slovenly and lawyerlike carriage that marked
the scholars of the times. The pliant courtier
was struck with the lofty independence of the
youth who, from the first, shewed that neither
frowns nor favour would induce him to bow the
knee to the idols Sir William had served. There
2*
was something in this independence that awed
the inferior mind of the uncle. To him it was
an unknown mysterious power, which he knew
not how to approach, and almost despaired of
subduing. However, he was experienced in
life, and had observed enough of human
infirmity
to convince him, that there was no
human
virtue that had not some weaksome
assailable
point. Time and circumstances were not
long in developing the vulnerability of the
nephew
.
Alice Fletcher had been the companion
of his childhood. They now met without any of
the reserve that often prevents an intimate
intercourse
between young persons, and proceeds from
the consciousness of a susceptibility which it
would seem to deny.
The intercourse of the cousins was renewed with
all the frankness and artlessness of the sunny
season
of childish love and confidence. Alice had
been educated in retirement, by her mother, whom
she had recently attended through a long and
fatal
illness. She had been almost the exclusive
object of her love, for there was little
congeniality
between the father and daughter. The ties
of nature may command all dutiful
observances
,
but they cannot control the affections. Alice
was deeply afflicted by her bereavement. Her
cousin's serious temper harmonized with her
sorrow
,
and nature and opportunity soon
indissolubly
linked their hearts together.
Sir William perceived their growing
attachment
and exulted in it; for, as he fancied, it
reduced
his nephew to dependence on his will and
whims. He had never himself experienced the
full strength of any generous sentiment; but he
had learned from observation, that love was a
controlling passion, and he now most anxiously
watched and promoted the kindling of the flame,
in the expectation that the fire would subdue
the principles of civil and religious liberty, with
which he had but too well ascertained the mind
of his nephew to be imbued.
He silently favoured the constant and exclusive
intercourse of the young people: he secretly
contrived
various modes of increasing their mutual
dependence; and, when he was certain their
happiness
was staked, he cast the die. He told his
nephew that he perceived and rejoiced in the
mutual
affection that had so naturally sprung up
between him and his daughter, and he confessed
their union had been the favourite object of his
life; and said, that he now heartily accorded his
consent to it, prescribing one condition onlybut
that condition was unalterable. You must
abjure
,
William, in the presence of witnesses, he
said, the fanatical notions of liberty and religion
with which you have been infectedyou must
pledge yourself, by a solemn oath, to unqualified
obedience to the king, and adherence to the
established
church: you shall have time enough for
the effervescence of your young blood. God
send this fermentation may work off all impurities.
Nay, answer me not now. Take a daya week
a month for consideration; for on your
decision
depends fortune and loveor the
alternative
,
beggary and exile.
If a pit had yawned beneath his feet, and
swallowed Alice from his view, William
Fletcher
could not have been more shocked. He was
soul-stricken, as one who listens to a sentence of
death. To his eye the earth was shrouded in
darkness
;
not an object of hope or pursuit remained.
He had believed his uncle was aware of what
he must deem his political and religious
delinquency
;
but he had never spoken to him on the
subject: he had treated him with marked favour,
and he had so evidently encouraged his
attachment
to his cousin, that he had already plighted
his love to her, and received her vows without
fearing that he had passed even the limit of strict
prudence.
There was no accommodating flexibility in his
principles; his fidelity to what he deemed his duty
could not have been subdued by the fires of
martyrdom
,
and he did not hesitate to sacrifice what
was dearer than life to it. He took the resolution
at once to fly from the temptation that, present,
he dared not trust himself to resist.
I shall not again see my Alice, he said. I
have not courage to meet her smiles; I have not
strength to endure her tears.
In aid of his resolution there came, most
opportunely
,
a messenger from his father, requiring his
immediate presence. This afforded him a
pretext
for his sudden departure from London. He
left a few brief lines for Alice, that expressed
without
explaining the sadness of his heart.
His father died a few hours before he arrived at
the paternal mansion. He was thus released from
his strongest natural tie. His mother had been
long dead; and he had neither brother nor sister.
He inherited a decent patrimony, sufficient at least
to secure the independence of a gentleman. He
immediately repaired to Groton, to his friend
Winthrop
;
not that he should dictate his duty to him,
but as one leans on the arm of a friend when he
finds his own strength scarcely sufficient to
support
him.
Mr. Winthrop is well known to have been a
man of the most tender domestic affections and
sympathies; but he had then been long married
and
twice
marriedand probably a little dimness
had come over his recollection of the enthusiasm
of a first passion. When Fletcher spoke of Alice's
unequalled loveliness, and of his own
unconquerable
love, his friend listened as one listens to a
tale he has heard a hundred times, and seemed to
regard the cruel circumstances in which the ardent
lover was placed only in the light of a fit and fine
opportunity of making a sacrifice to the great and
good cause to which this future statesman had
even then begun to devote himself, as the sole
object
of his life. He treated his friend's sufferings
as in their nature transient and curable; and
concluded by saying, the Lord hath prepared
this fire, my friend, to temper your faith, and you
will come out of it the better prepared for your
spiritual warfare.
Fletcher listened to him with stern resolution,
like him who permits a surgeon to probe a wound
which he is himself certain is incurable.
Mr. Winthrop knew that a ship was appointed
to sail from Southampton in a few days for
New-England
.
With that characteristic zeal which
then made all the intentions of Providence so
obvious
to the eye of faith, and the interpretation of
all the events of life so easy, Mr. Winthrop
assured
his friend that the designs of Heaven, in
relation
to him, were plain. He said, there was a
great call for such services as he could render in
the expedition just about to sail, and which was
like to fail for the want of them; and that now,
like a faithful servant to the cause he had
confessed
,
he must not look behind, but press on to
the things that were before.
Fletcher obeyed the voice of Heaven. This is
no romantic fiction. Hundreds in that day
resisted
all that solicits earthly passions, and
sacrificed
all that gratifies them, to the cause of God
and of manthe cause of liberty and religion.
This cause was not to their eyes invested with any
romantic attractions. It was not assisted by the
illusions of chivalry, nor magnified by the
spiritual
power and renown of crusades. Our fathers
neither had, nor expected their reward on earth.
One severe duty remained to be performed.
Fletcher must announce their fate to Alice. He
honoured her too much to believe she would have
permitted the sacrifice of his integrity, if he would
have made it. He, therefore, had nothing to
excuse
;
nothing but to tell the terrible truthto
try to reconcile her to her fatherto express, for
the last time, his love, and to pray that he might
receive, at Southampton, one farewell line from
her. Accompanying his letter to Alice was one
to Sir William, announcing the decision to
resign
his favour and exile himself for ever from
England.
He arranged his affairs, and in a few days
received
notice that the vessel was ready to sail.
He repaired to Southampton, and as he was
quitting
the inn to embark in the small boat that was
to convey him to the vessel, already in the offing,
a voice from an inner apartment pronounced his
nameand at the next moment Alice was in his
arms. She gently reproved him for having
estimated
her affection at so low a rate as not to have
anticipated that she should follow him, and share
his destiny. It was more than could have been
expected from man, that Fletcher should have
opposed
such a resolution. He had but a moment
for deliberation. Most of the passengers had
already
embarked; some still lingered on the strand
protracting their last farewell to their country and
their friends. In the language of one of the most
honoured of these pilgrims truly doleful was
the sight of that sad and mournful parting, to hear
what sighs, and sobs, and prayers, did sound
amongst them; what tears did gush from every
eye, and pithy speeches pierced each other's
hearts.
With the weeping groupe Fletcher left Alice
and her attendants, while he went to the vessel to
prepare for her suitable reception. He there found
a clergyman, and bespoke his holy offices to unite
him to his cousin immediately after their
embarcation
.
All the necessary arrangements were made, and
he was returning to the shore, his eye fixed on the
lovely being whom he believed Heaven had
interposed
to give to him, when he descried Sir
William's
carriage guarded by a cavalcade of armed
men, in the uniform of the King's guards,
approaching
the spot where she stood.
He comprehended at once their cruel purpose.
He exhorted the boatmen to put forth all their
strength; he seized the oars himselfdespair
gave him supernatural powerthe boat shot
forward
with the velocity of light; but all in vain!
he only approached near enough to the shore to
hear Alice's last impotent cries to himto see
her beautiful face convulsed with agony, and her
arms outstretched towards himwhen she was
forced to the carriage by her father, and driven
from his sight.
He leaped on the strand; he followed the troop
with cries and entreaties; but he was only
answered
by the coarse jeering and profane jests of
the soldiery.
Notice was soon given that the boat was ready
to return to the ship for the last time, and Fletcher
in a state of agitation and despair, almost
amounting
to insanity, permitted it to return without
him.
He went to London and requested an interview
with his uncle. The request was granted, and a
long and secret conference ensued. It was known
by the servants of the household, that their
mistress
,
Alice, had been summoned by her father to
this meeting; but what was said or done, did not
transpire. Immediately after, Fletcher returned
to Mr. Winthrop's in Suffolk. The fixedness of
despair was on his countenance; but he said
nothing
,
even to this confidential friend, of the
interview
with his uncle. The particulars of the
affair at Southampton, which had already
reached
Suffolk, seemed sufficiently to explain his
misery.
In less than a fortnight he there received
despatches
from his uncle, informing him that he had
taken effectual measures to save himself from a
second conspiracy against the honour of his
family
that
his daughter, Alice, had that day been
led to the altar by Charles Leslie; and concluding
with a polite hope, that though his voyage had
been interrupted, it might not be long deferred.
Alice had, indeed, in the imbecility of utter
despair
,
submitted to her father's commands. It was
Vol. I. 3
intimated at the time, and reported for many years
after, that she had suffered a total alienation of
mind. To the world this was never contradicted,
for she lived in absolute retirement; but those
who best knew could have attested, that if her
mind had departed from its beautiful temple, an
angelic spirit had entered in and possessed it.
William Fletcher was, in a few months,
persuaded
to unite himself with an orphan girl, a
ward of Mr. Winthrop, who had, in the eyes of
the elders, all the meek graces that befitted a
godly maiden and dutiful helpmate. Fletcher
remained
constant to his purpose of emigrating to
New-England, but he did not effect it till the year
1630, when he embarked with his family and
effects
in the ship Arabella, with Governor
Winthrop
,
who the, for the first time, went to that
land where his name will ever be held in
affectionate
and honourable remembrance.
CHAPTER II.
For the temper of the brain in quick apprehensions and
acute judgments, to say no more, the most High and
Sovereign
God hath not made the Indian inferior to the
European
.
Roger Williams
.
The
magnitude of the enterprise in which the
first settlers of New-England were engaged, the
terrific obstacles they encountered, and the
hard-ships
they endured, gave to their characters a
seriousness
and solemnity, heightened, it may be, by
the severity of their religious faith.
Where all were serious the melancholy of an
individual was not conspicuous; and Mr. Fletcher's
sadness would probably have passed unnoticed,
but for the reserve of his manners, which piqued
the pride of his equals, and provoked the curiosity
of his inferiors.
The first probably thought that the apostolic
principle of community of goods at least
extended
to opinions and feelings; and the second
always
fancy when a man shuts the door of his
lips that there must be some secret worth
knowing
within.
Like many other men of an ardent
temperament
and disinterested love of his species, Mr.
Fletcher was disappointed at the slow operation of
principles, which, however efficient and excellent
in the abstract, were to be applied to various and
discordant subjects. Such men, inexperienced in
the business of life, are like children, who, setting
out on a journey, are impatient after the few first
paces to be at the end of it. They cannot
endure
the rebuffs and delays that retard them in
their course. These are the men of geniusthe
men of feelingthe men that the world calls
visionaries
;
and it is because they are visionaries
because they have a beau-ideal in their own minds,
to which they can see but a faint resemblance in
the actual state of things, that they become
impatient
of detail, and cannot brook the slow
progress
to perfection. They are too rapid in their
anticipations. The character of man, and the
institutions
of society, are yet very far from their
possible and destined perfection. Still, how far
is the present age in advance of that which drove
reformers to a dreary wilderness!of that which
hanged quakers!of that which condemned to
death, as witches, innocent, unoffending old
women
!
But it is unnecessary to heighten the glory
or our risen day by comparing it with the
preceding
twilight.
To return to Mr. Fletcher. He was mortified
at seeing power, which had been earned at so
dear a rate, and which he had fondly hoped was
to be applied to the advancement of man's
happiness
,
sometimes perverted to purposes of
oppression
and personal aggrandizement. He was
shocked when a religious republic, which he
fancied
to be founded on the basis of established
truth, was disturbed by the out-break of heresies;
and his heart sickened when he saw those, who
had sacrificed whatever man holds dearest to
religious
freedom, imposing those shackles on others
from which they had just released themselves at
such a price. Partly influenced by these disgusts,
and partly by that love of contemplation and
retirement
that belongs to a character of his cast,
especially when depressed by some early
disappointment
,
he refused the offices of honour and
trust that were, from time to time, offered to him;
and finally, in 1636, when Pynchon, Holioke, and
Chapin, formed their settlement at Springfield, on
Connecticut river, he determined to retire from
the growing community of Boston to this frontier
settlement.
Mrs. Fletcher received his decision as all wives
of that age of undisputed masculine supremacy (or
most of those of our less passive age) would do,
with meek submission. The inconveniencies
and dangers of that outpost were not unknown
to her, nor did she underrate them; but
Abraham
would as soon have remonstrated against the
command that bade him go forth from his father's
house into the land of the Chaldees, as she would
have failed in passive obedience to the resolve of
her husband.
The removal was effected early in the summer
of 1636. Springfield assumed, at once, under the
3*
auspices of its wealthy and enterprising
proprietors
,
the aspect of a village. The first settlers
followed the course of the Indians, and planted
themselves on the borders of riversthe natural
gardens of the earth, where the soil is mellowed
and enriched by the annual overflowing of the
streams, and prepared by the unassisted processes
of nature to yield to the indolent Indian his scanty
supply of maize and other esculents. The wigwams
which constituted the village, or, to use the graphic
aboriginal designation, the `smoke' of the natives
gave place to the clumsy, but more convenient
dwellings of the pilgrims.
Where there are now contiguous rows of shops,
filled with the merchandise of the east, the
manufactures
of Europe, the rival fabrics of our own
country, and the fruits of the tropics; where now
stands the stately hall of justicethe academy
the bankchurches, orthodox and heretic, and
all the symbols of a rich and populous
community
were,
at the early period of our history,
a few log-houses, planted around a fort, defended
by a slight embankment and palisade.
The mansions of the proprietors were rather
more spacious and artificial than those of their
more humble associates, and were built on the
well-known model of the modest dwelling
illustrated
by the birth of Miltona form still
abounding
in the eastern parts of Massachusetts, and
presenting to the eye of a New-Englander the
familiar aspect of an awkward friendly country
cousin.
The first clearing was limited to the plain. The
beautiful hill that is now the residence of the
gentry
(for there yet lives such a class in the heart of
our democratic community) and is embellished
with stately edifices and expensive
pleasure-grounds
,
was then the border of a dense forest,
and so richly fringed with the original growth of
trees, that scarce a sun-beam had penetrated to the
parent earth.
Mr. Fletcher was at first welcomed as an
important
acquisition to the infant establishment;
but he soon proved that he purposed to take no
part in its concerns, and, in spite of the
remonstrances
of the proprietors, he fixed his residence
a mile from the village, deeming exposure to the
incursions of the savages very slight, and the
surveillance
of an inquiring neighbourhood a certain
evil. His domain extended from a gentle eminence,
that commanded an extensive view of the
bountiful
Connecticut to the shore, where the river
indented
the meadow by one of those sweeping
graceful curves by which it seems to delight to
beautify the land it nourishes.
The border of the river was fringed with all the
water-loving trees; but the broad meadows were
quite cleared, excepting that a few elms and
sycamores
had been spared by the Indians, and
consecrated
,
by tradition, as the scene of revels or
councils. The house of our pilgrim was a
low-roofed
modest structure, containing ample
accommodation
for a patriarchal family; where
children
,
dependants, and servants were all to be
sheltered under one roof-tree. On one side,
as we have described, lay an open and extensive
plain; within view was the curling smoke from
the little cluster of houses about the fortthe
habitation
of civilized man; but all else was a
savage howling wilderness.
Never was a name more befitting the condition
of a people, than `Pilgrim' that of our forefathers.
It should be redeemed from the puritanical and
ludicrous associations which have degraded it, in
most men's minds, and be hallowed by the sacrifices
made by these voluntary exiles. They were
pilgrims
,
for they had resigned, for ever, what the
good hold most deartheir homes. Home can
never be transferred; never repeated in the
experience
of an individual. The place consecrated
by parental love, by the innocence and sports of
childhood, by the first acquaintance with nature;
by the linking of the heart to the visible creation,
is the only home. There there is a living and
breathing spirit infused into nature: every
familiar
object has a historythe trees have tongues,
and the very air is vocal. There the vesture of
decay doth not close in and control the noble
functions of the soul. It sees and hears and
enjoys
without the ministry of gross material
substance
.
Mr. Fletcher had resided a few months in
Springfield when he one day entered with an
open letter in his hand, that apartment of his
humble
dwelling styled, by courtesy, the parlour. His
wife was sitting there with her eldest son, a
stripling
of fourteen, busily assisting him in twisting a
cord for his cross-bow. She perceived that her
husband looked disturbed; but he said nothing,
and her habitual deference prevented her
inquiring
into the cause of his discomposure.
After taking two or three turns about the room,
he said to his son, Everell, my boygo to the
door, and await there the arrival of an Indian
girl; she is, as you may see, yonder by the
riverside
,
and will be here shortly. I would not that
Jennet should, at the very first, shock the child
with her discourteous ways.
Child! coming here! exclaimed the boy,
dropping his bow and gazing through the window
Who is she?that tall girl, fathershe is no
more a child than I am!
His mother smiled at an exclamation that
betrayed
a common juvenile jealousy of the honour
of dawning manhood, and bade the boy obey his
father's directions. When Everell had left the
apartment, Mr. Fletcher said, I have just
received
letters from Bostonfrom Governor
Winthrop
he
paused.
Our friends are all well, I hope, said Mrs.
Fletcher.
Yes, Martha, our friends are all wellbut
these letters contain something of more
importance
than aught that concerns the health of the
perishing body.
Mr. Fletcher again hesitated, and his wife,
perplexed
by his embarrassment, inquired, Has
poor deluded Mrs. Hutchinson again presumed
to disturb the peace of God's people?
Martha, you aim wide of the mark. My
present
emotions are not those of a mourner for Zion.
A ship has arrived from England, and in it
came
My brother Stretton! exclaimed Mrs.
Fletcher.
Nono, Martha. It will be long ere
Stretton
quits his paradise to join a suffering people in
the wilderness.
He paused for a moment, and when he again
spoke, the softened tone of his voice evinced that
he was touched by the expression of
disappointment
,
slightly tinged by displeasure that shaded
his wife's gentle countenance. Forgive me, my
dear wife, he said. i should not have spoken
aught that implied censure of your brother;
for I know he hath ever been most precious in
your eyesalbeit, not the less so, that he is yet
without the foldThat which I have to tell you
and it were best that it were quickly toldis,
that my cousin Alice was a passenger in this newly
arrived ship.Martha, your blushes wrong you.
The mean jealousies that degrade some women
have, I am sure, never been harboured in your
heart.
If I deserve your praise, it is because the
Lord has been pleased to purify my heart and
make it his sanctuary. But, if I have not the
jealousies, I have the feelings of a woman, and I
cannot forget that you was once affianced to your
cousin Aliceand
And that I once told you, Martha, frankly,
that the affection I gave to her, could not be
transferred
to another. That love grew with my growth
strengthened with my strength. Of its
beginning
,
I had no more consciousness than of the
commencement of my existence. It was sunshine
and flowers in all the paths of my childhood. It
inspired every hopemodified every project
such was the love I bore to Alicelove immortal
as the soul!
You know how cruelly we were severed at
Southamptonhow she was torn from the strand
by the king's guardswithin my view, almost
within my grasp. How Sir William tempted me
with the offer of pardonmy cousin's hand
and,poor temptation indeed after that!
honours
,
fortune. You know that even Alice, my
precious beautiful Alice, knelt to me. That
smitten
of God and man, and for the moment, bereft
of the right use of reason, she would have
persuaded
me to yield my integrity. You know that
her cruel father reproached me with virtually
breaking my plighted troth, That many of my
friends urged my present conformity; and you
know, Martha, that there was a principle in my
bosom that triumphed over all these temptations.
And think you not that principle has preserved
me faithful in my friendship to you? Think you
not that your obedience;your careful
conformity
to my wishes; your steady love, which
hath kept far more than even measure with
my deserts, is undervaluedcan be lightly
estimated
?
Oh, I know, said the humble wife, that
your goodness to me does far surpass my merit;
but bethink you, it is the nature of a woman to
crave the first place.
It is the right of a wife, Martha; and there is
none now to contest it with you. This is but the
second time I have spoken to you on a subject
that has been much in our thoughts: that has
made me wayward, and would have made my
sojourning
on earth miserable, but that you have
been my support and comforter. These letters
contain tidings that have opened a long sealed
fountain. My uncle, Sir William, died last
January
.
Leslie perished in a foreign service. Alice,
thus released from all bonds, and sole mistress
of her fortunes, determined to cast her lot in
the heritage of God's people. She embarked
with her two girlsher only childrena
tempestuous
voyage proved too much for a constitution
already broken by repeated shocks. She was
fully aware of her approaching death, and died
as befits a child of faith, in sweet peace. Would
to God I could have seen her once morebut,
he added, raising his eyes devoutly, not my will
but thine be done! The sister of Leslie, a
Mistress
Grafton, attended Alice, and with her she
left a will committing her children to my
guardianship
.
It will be necessary for me to go to
Boston
to assume this trust. I shall leave home
tomorrow
,
after making suitable provision for your
safety and comfort in my absence. These
children
will bring additional labour to your
household
;
and in good time hath our thoughtful friend
Governor Winthrop procured for us two Indian
servants. The girl has arrived. The boy is
retained
about the little Leslies; the youngest of
whom, it seems, is a petted child; and is
particularly
pleased by his activity in ministering to her
amusement.
I am glad if any use can be made of an
Indian
servant, said Mrs. Fletcher, who, oppressed
with conflicting emotions, expressed the lightest
of thema concern at a sudden increase of
domestic
cares where there were no facilities to
lighten them.
How any use! You surely do not doubt,
Martha, that these Indians possess the same
faculties
that we do. The girl, just arrived, our
friend writes me, hath rare gifts of mindsuch
as few of God's creatures are endowed with.
She is just fifteen; she understands and speaks
English perfectly well, having been taught it by
Vol. I. 4
an English captive, who for a long time dwelt
with her tribe. On that account she was much
noticed by the English who traded with the
Pequods
;
and young as she was, she acted as their
interpreter.
She is the daughter of one of their chiefs,
and when this wolfish tribe were killed, or
dislodged
from their dens, she, her brother, and their
mother, were brought with a few other captives
to Boston. They were given for a spoil to the
soldiers. Some, by a christian use of money,
were redeemed; and others, I blush to say it, for
`it is God's gift that every man should enjoy the
good of his own labour,' were sent into slavery in
the West Indies. Monoca, the mother of these
children, was noted for the singular dignity and
modesty of her demeanor. Many notable
instances
of her kindness to the white traders are
recorded; and when she was taken to Boston, our
worthy governor, ever mindful of his duties,
assured
her that her good deeds were held in
remembrance
,
and that he would testify the gratitude of
his people in any way she should direct. `I have
nothing to ask,' she said, `but that I and my
children
may receive no personal dishonour.'
The governor redeemed her children, and
assured
her they should be cared for. For herself,
misery and sorrow had so wrought on her, that
she was fast sinking into the grave. Many
christian
men and women laboured for her conversion
but she would not even consent that the holy
word should be interpreted to her; insisting, in
the pride of her soul, that all the children of the
Great Spirit were equal objects of His favour;
and that He had not deemed the book he had
withheld, needful to them.
And did she, inquired Mrs. Fletcher, thus
perish in her sins?
She died, replied her husband,
immoveably
fixed in those sentiments. But, Martha, we
should not suit God's mercy to the narrow frame
of our thoughts. This poor savage's life, as far
as it has come to our knowledge, was marked
with innocence and good deeds; and I would
gladly believe that we may hope for her, on that
broad foundation laid by the Apostle Peter`In
every nation, he that feareth God and worketh
righteousness, is accepted of Him.'
That text, answered Mrs. Fletcher, her heart
easily kindling with the flame of charity, is a
light behind many a dark scripture, like the
sun shining all around the edges of a cloud that
would fain hide its beams.
Such thoughts, my dear wife, naturally spring
from thy kind heart, and are sweet morsels for
private meditation; but it were well to keep them
in thine own bosom lest, taking breath, they should
lighten the fears of unstable souls. But here
comes the girl, Magawisca, clothed in her Indian
garb, which the governor has permitted her to
retain, not caring, as he wisely says, to interfere
with their innocent peculiarities; and she, in
particular
,
having shewn a loathing of the English
dress.
Everell Fletcher now threw wide open the
parlour
door, inviting the Indian girl, by a motion of
his hand and a kind smile, to follow. She did so,
and remained standing beside him, with her eyes
rivetted to the floor, while every other eye was
turned towards her. She and her conductor were
no unfit representatives of the people from whom
they sprung. Everell Fletcher was a fair ruddy boy
of fourteen; his smooth brow and bright curling
hair, bore the stamp of the morning of life; hope
and confidence and gladness beamed in the
falcon
glance of his keen blue eye; and love and
frolic played about his lips. The active hardy
habits of life, in a new country, had already knit
his frame, and given him the muscle of manhood;
while his quick elastic step truly expressed the
untamed spirit of childhoodthe only spirit
without
fear and without reproach. His dress was of
blue cloth, closely fitting his person; the sleeves
reached midway between the elbow and wrist,
and the naked, and as it would seem to a modern
eye, awkward space, was garnished with
deep-pointed
lace ruffles of a coarse texture; a ruff,
or collar of the same material, was worn about
the neck.
The Indian stranger was tall for her years,
which did not exceed fifteen. Her form was
slender, flexible, and graceful; and there was a
freedom and loftiness in her movement which,
though tempered with modesty, expressed a
consciousness
of high birth. Her face, although
marked
by the peculiarities of her race, was beautiful
even to an European eye. Her features were
regular
,
and her teeth white as pearls; but there must
be something beyond symmetry of feature to fix
the attention, and it was an expression of dignity,
thoughtfulness, and deep dejection that made the
eye linger on Magawisca's face, as if it were
perusing
there the legible record of her birth and
wrongs. Her hair, contrary to the fashion of the
Massachusetts Indians, was parted on her
forehead
,
braided, and confined to her head by a band
of small feathers, jet black, and interwoven, and
attached at equal distances by rings of polished
bone. She wore a waistcoat of deer-skin,
fastened
at the throat by a richly wrought collar.
Her arms, a model for sculpture, were bare. A
mantle of purple cloth hung gracefully from her
shoulders, and was confined at the waist by a
broad band, ornamented with rude hieroglyphics.
The mantle and her strait short petticoat or kilt
of the same rare and costly material, had been
obtained, probably, from the English traders.
Stockings were an unknown luxury; but leggins,
similar to those worn by the ladies of Queen
Elizabeth's
court, were no bad substitute. The
moccasin
,
neatly fitted to a delicate foot and ankle,
and tastefully ornamented with bead-work,
completed
the apparel of this daughter of a chieftain,
which altogether, had an air of wild and fantastic
4*
grace, that harmonized well with the noble
demeanor
and peculiar beauty of the young savage.
Mr. Fletcher surveyed her for a moment with a
mingled feeling of compassion and curiosity, and
then turning away and leaning his head on the
mantelpiece, his thoughts reverted to the subject
that had affected him far more deeply than he
had ventured to confess, even to the wife of his
bosom.
Mrs. Fletcher's first feeling was rather that of a
housewife than a tender woman. `My husband,'
she thought, `might as well have brought a wild
doe from the forest to plough his fields, as to give
me this Indian girl for household labour; but the
wisest men have no sense in these matters.' This
natural domestic reflection was soon succeeded
by a sentiment of compassion, which scarcely
needed to be stimulated by Everell's whisper of
do, mother, speak to her.
Magawisca, she said in a friendly tone, you
are welcome among us, girl. Magawisca
bowed
her head. Mrs. Fletcher continued: you
should receive it as a signal mercy, child, that you
have been taken from the midst of a savage
people
,
and set in a christian family. Mrs. Fletcher
paused for her auditor's assent, but the
proposition
was either unintelligible or unacceptable to
Magawisca.
Mistress Fletcher means, said a middle-aged
serving woman who had just entered the room,
that you should be mightily thankful, Tawney,
that you are snatched as a brand from the
burning
.
Hush, Jennet! said Everell Fletcher,
touching
the speaker with the point of an arrow which
he held in his hand.
Magawisca's eyes had turned on Jennet,
flashing
like a sun-beam through an opening cloud.
Everell's interposition touched a tender chord,
and when she again cast them down, a tear
trembled
on their lids.
You will have no hard service to do, said
Mrs. Fletcher, resuming her address. I cannot
explain all to you now; but you will soon
perceive
that our civilized life is far easierfar
better
and happier than your wild wandering ways,
which are indeed, as you will presently see, but
little
superior to those of the wolves and foxes.
Magawisca suppressed a reply that her heart
sent to her quivering lips; and Everell said,
hunted, as the Indians are, to their own dens, I
am sure, mother, they need the fierceness of the
wolf, and the cunning of the fox.
Truetrue, my son, replied Mrs. Fletcher,
who really meant no unkindness in expressing
what she deemed a self-evident truth; and then
turning again to Magawisca, she said, in a gentle
tone, you have had a long and fatiguing
journey
was
it not, girl?
My foot, replied Magawisca, is used to the
wild-wood path. The deer tires not of his way
on the mountain, nor the bird of its flight in the
air.
She uttered her natural feeling in so plaintive a
tone that it touched the heart like a strain of sad
music; and when Jennet again officiously
interposed
in the conversation, by saying, that truly
these savages have their house in the wilderness,
and their way no man knows, her mistress cut
short her outpouring by directing her to go to the
outer door and learn who it was that Digby was
conducting to the house.
A moment after Digby, Mr. Fletcher's
confidential
domestic, entered with the air of one who
has important intelligence to communicate. He
was followed by a tall gaunt Indian, who held in
his hand a deer-skin pouch. Ha! Digby, said
Mr. Fletcher, have you returned? What say
the Commissioners? Can they furnish me a guide
and attendants for my journey?
Yes, an' please you, sir, I was in the nick of
time, for they were just despatching a messenger
to the Governor.
On what account?
Why, it's rather an odd errand, replied
Digby
,
scratching his head with an awkward
hesitation
.
I would not wish to shock my gentle
mistress
,
who will never bring her feelings to the
queer fashions of the new world; but Lord's
mercy
,
sir, you know we think no more of taking off
a scalp here, than we did of shaving our beards at
home.
Scalp! exclaimed Mr. Fletcher. Explain
yourself, Digby.
The Indian, as if to assist Digby's
communication
,
untied his pouch and drew from it a piece
of dried and shrivelled skin, to which hair, matted
together with blood, still adhered. There was an
expression of fierce triumph on the countenance
of the savage as he surveyed the trophy with a
grim smile. A murmur of indignation burst from
all present.
Why did you bring that wretch here?
demanded
Mr. Fletcher of his servant, in an angry
tone.
I did but obey Mr. Pynchon, sir. The thing
is an abomination to the soul and eye of a
christian
,
but it has to be taken to Boston for the
reward
.
What reward, Digby?
The reward, sir, that is in reason expected
for the scalp of the Pequod chief.
As Digby uttered these last words Magawisca
shrieked as if a dagger had pierced her heart.
She darted forward and grasped the arm that
upheld
the trophy. My father!Mononotto!
she screamed in a voice of agony.
Give it to herby Heaven, you shall give it
to her, cried Everell, springing on the Indian and
losing all other thought in his instinctive
sympathy
for Magawisca.
Softly, softly, Mr. Everell, said Digby, that
is the scalp of Sassacus, not Mononotto. The
Pequods had two chiefs you know.
Magawisca now released her hold; and as soon
as she could again command her voice, she said,
in her own language to the Indian, my father
my fatherdoes he live?
He does, answered the Indian in the same
dialect; he lives in the wigwam of the chief of
the Mohawks.
Magawisca was silent for a moment, and knit
her brows as if agitated with an important
deliberation. She then undid a bracelet from
her arm and gave it to the Indian: I charge
ye, she said, as ye hope for game in your
hunting-grounds
,
for the sun on your wigwam, and the
presence of the Great Spirit in your death-hour
I charge ye to convey this token to my father.
Tell him his children are servants in the house of
his enemies; but, she added, after a moment's
pause, to whom am I trusting?to the
murderer
of Sassacus!my father's friend!
Fear not, replied the Indian; your errand
shall be done. Sassacus was a strange tree in our
forests; but he struck his root deep, and lifted
his tall head above our loftiest branches, and cast
his shadow over us; and I cut him down. I may
not return to my people, for they called Sassacus
brother, and they would fain avenge him. But
fear not, maiden, your errand shall be done.
Mr. Fletcher observed this conference, which
he could not understand, with some anxiety and
displeasure, and he broke it off by directing
Jennet
to conduct Magawisca to another apartment.
Jennet obeyed, muttering, as she went, a
notable
providence this concerning the Pequod
caitiff
.
Even like Adonibezek, as he has done to
others the Lord hath requited him.
Mr. Fletcher then most reluctantly took into his
possession the savage trophy, and dismissed the
Indian, deeply lamenting that motives of
mistaken
policy should tempt his brethren to depart
from the plainest principles of their religion.
CHAPTER III.
But ah, who can deceive his destiny,
Or ween, by Warning, to avoid his Fate?
Fairy Queen
.
On
the following morning Mr. Fletcher set out
for Boston, and escaping all perils by flood and
field, he arrived there at the expiration of nine
days, having accomplished the journey, now the
affair of a single day, with unusual expedition.
His wards were accompanied by two individuals
who were now, with them, to become permanent
members of his family. Mrs. Grafton, the sister
of their father, and one Master Cradock, a
scholar
skilled in the tongues, who attended them
as their tutor. Mrs. Grafton was a widow, far on
the shady side of fifty; though, as that was a
subject
to which she never alluded, she probably
regarded
age with the feelings ascribed to her sex,
that being the last quality for which womankind
would wish to be honoured, as is said by one
whose satire is so good-humoured that even its
truth may be endured. She was, unhappily
for herself as her lot was cast, a zealous
adherent
to the church of England. Good people,
who take upon themselves the supervisorship of
their neighbours' consciences, abounded in that
age; and from them Mrs. Grafton received
frequent
exhortations and remonstrances. To these
she uniformly replied, `that a faith and mode of
religion that had saved so many was good enough
to save her'`that she had received her belief,
just as it was, from her father, and that he, not
she, was responsible for it.' Offensive such
opinions
must needs be in a community of professed
reformers, but the good lady did not make them
more so by the obtrusiveness of over-wrought zeal.
To confess the truth, her mind was far more
intent
on the forms of head-pieces, than modes of
faith; and she was far more ambitious of being
the leader of fashion, than the leader of a sect.
She would have contended more earnestly for a
favourite recipe, than a favourite dogma; and
though she undoubtedly believed a saint in
crape to be twice a saint in lawn, and
fearlessly
maintained that no man could suitably
administer
the offices of religion without `gown,
surplice, and wig,'  yet she chiefly directed her
hostilities against the puritanical attire of the
ladies
of the colony, who, she insisted, `did most
unnaturally belie their nature as women, and
their birth and bringing-up as gentlewomen, by
their ill-fashioned, ill-sorted, and unbecoming
apparel
.'
To this heresy she was fast gaining
proselytes
;
for, if we may believe the simple
cobbler
of Agawam, there were, even in those early
and pure day, nugiperous gentle dames who
inquired what dress the Queen is in this week.
Vol. I. 5
The contagion spread rapidly; and when some
of the most vigilant and zealous sentinels
proposed
that the preachers should make it the
subject
of public and personal reproof, it was
whispered
that the scandal was not limited to idle
maidens, but that certain of the deacons' wives
were in it, and it was deemed more prudent to
adopt gentle and private measures to eradicate
the evil; an evil so deeply felt as to be bewailed
by the merciless `cobbler,' above quoted, in the
following affecting terms: Methinks it would
break the hearts of Englishmen to see so many
goodly English women imprisoned in French
cages, peeping out of their hood-holes for some
men of mercy to help them with a little wit, and
nobody relieves them. We have about five or six
of them in our colony. If I see any of them
accidentally
,
I cannot cleanse my phansie of them for
a month after.
It would seem marvellous that a woman like
Mrs. Grafton, apparently engrossed with the world,
living on the foam and froth of life, should
become
a voluntary exile to the colonies; but, to do
her justice, she was kind-hearted and affectionate
susceptible of strong and controlling attachment,
and the infant children of a brother on whom she
had doated, outweighed her love of frivolous
pleasures
and personal indulgence.
She certainly believed that the resolution of her
sister to go to the wilderness, had no parallel in
the history of human folly and madness; but the
resolution once taken, and, as she perceived,
unconquerable
,
she made her own destiny
conformable
,
not without some restiveness, but without
serious
repining. It was an unexpected shock to
her to be compelled to leave Boston for a
condition
of life not only more rude and inconvenient,
but really dangerous. Necessity, however, is
more potent than philosophy, and Mrs. Grafton,
like most people, submitted with patience to an
inevitable evil.
As `good Master Cradock' was a man rather
acted upon than acting, we shall leave him to be
discovered by our readers as the light of others
falls on him.
Mr. Fletcher received the childrenthe relicts
and gifts of a woman whom he had loved as few
men can love, with an intense interest. The
youngest, Mary, was a pretty petted child,
wayward
and bashful. She repelled Mr. Fletcher's
caresses, and ran away from him to shelter
herself
in her aunt's armsbut Alice, the eldest,
seemed instinctively to return the love that
beamed
in the first glance that Mr. Fletcher cast on
herin that brief eager glance he saw the living
and beautiful image of her mother. So much was
he impressed with the resemblance, that he said,
in a letter to his wife, that it reminded him of the
heathen doctrine of metemsychosisand he could
almost believe the spirit of the mother was
transferred
to the bosom of the child. The
arrangement
Mr. Fletcher made, for the transportation of
his charge to Springfield, might probably be
traced
to the preference inspired by this resemblance.
He dispatched the little Mary with her aunt and
the brother of Magawisca, the Indian boy
Oneco
,
and such attendants as were necessary for
their safe conductand he retained Alice and the
tutor to be the companions of his journey.
Before
the children were separated, they were
baptised
by the Reverend Mr. Cotton, and in
commemoration
of the christian graces of their
mother
,
their names were changed to the puritanical
appellations of Hope and Faith.
Mr. Fletcher was detained, at first by business,
and afterwards by ill-health, much longer than he
had expected, and the fall, winter, and earliest
months of spring wore away before he was able
to set his face homeward. In the mean time, his
little community at Bethel proceeded more
harmoniously
than could have been hoped from the
discordant
materials of which it was composed.
This was owing, in great part, to the wise and
gentle Mrs. Fletcher, the sun of her little system
all were obedient to the silent influence that
controlled, without being perceived. But a letter
which she wrote to Mr. Fletcher, just before his
return, containing some important domestic
details
,
may be deemed worth the perusal of our
readers.
Springfield,
1636.
To my good and honoured husband!
Thy kind letter was duly received fourteen
days after date, and was most welcome to me,
containing, as it does, a portion of that stream of
kindness that is ever flowing out from thy
bountiful
nature towards me. Sweet and refreshing
was it, as these gentle days of spring after our
sullen winter. Winter! ever disconsolate in these
parts, but made tenfold more dreary by the
absence
of that precious light by which I have ever
been cheered and guided.
I thank thee heartily, my dear life, that thou
dost so warmly commend my poor endeavours to
do well in thy absence. I have truly tried to be
faithful to my little nestlings, and to cheer them
with notes of gladness when I have drooped
inwardly
for the voice of my mate. Yet my anxious
thoughts have been more with thee than with
myself
;
nor have I been unmindful of any of thy
perplexities by sickness and otherwise, but in all
thy troubles I have been troubled, and have ever
prayed, that whatever might betide me, thou
mightest return, in safety, to thy desiring family.
I have had many difficulties to contend with in
thy absence, of which I have forborne to inform
thee, deeming it the duty of a wife never to
disquiet
her husband with her household cares; but
now that, with the Lord's permission, thou art so
soon to be with us, I would fain render unto thee
5*
an account of my stewardship, knowing that thou
art not an hard master, and wilt consider the will
and not the weakness of thy loving wife.
This Dame Grafton is strangely out of place
herefitter for a parlour bird, than a flight into
the wilderness; and but that she cometh
commended
to us as a widow, a name that is a draft
from the Lord upon every Christian heart, we
might find it hard to brook her light and wordly
ways. She raileth, and yet I think not with an
evil mind, but rather ignorantly, at our most
precious
faith, and hath even ventured to read aloud
from her book of Common Prayeran offence
that she hath been prevented from repeating by
the somewhat profane jest of our son Everell;
whose love of mischief, proceeding from the gay
temper of youth, I trust you will overlook. It
was a few nights ago, when a storm was raging,
that the poor lady's fears were greatly excited.
My womanish apprehensions had a hard struggle
with my duty, so terrific was the hideous howling
of the wolves, mingling with the blasts that swept
through the forest; but I stilled my beating heart
with the thought, that my children leant on me,
and I must not betray my weakness. But Dame
Grafton was beside herself. At one moment she
fancied we should be the prey of the wild beast,
and at the next, that she heard the alarm yell of
the savages. Everell brought her, her
prayer-book
,
and affecting a well-beseeming gravity, he
begged her to look out the prayer for distressed
women, in imminent danger of being scalped by
North American Indians. The poor lady,
distracted
with terror, seized the book, and turned over leaf
after leaf, Everell meanwhile affecting to aid her
search. In vain I shook my head, reprovingly, at
the boyin vain I assured Mistress Grafton that I
trusted we were in no danger; she was beyond
the influence of reason; nothing allayed her
fears, till chancing to catch a glance of Everell's
eye, she detected the lurking laughter, and
rapping
him soundly over the ears with her book, she
left the room greatly enraged. I grieve to add, that
Everell evinced small sorrow for his levity, though
I admonished him thereupon. At the same time
I thought it a fit occasion to commend the
sagacity
whereby he had detected the short-comings
of written prayers, and to express my hope, that
unpromising as his beginnings are, he may prove
a son of Jacob that shall wrestle and prevail.
I have something farther to say of Everell, who
is, in the main, a most devoted son, and as I
believe
,
an apt scholar; as his master telleth me
that he readeth Latin like his mother tongue, and
is well grounded in the Greek. The boy doth
greatly affect the company of the Pequod girl,
Magawisca. If, in his studies, he meets with any
trait of heroism, (and with such, truly, her mind
doth seem naturally to assimilate) he straightway
calleth for her and rendereth it into English, in
which she hath made such marvellous progress,
that I am sometimes startled with the beautiful
forms in which she clothes her simple thoughts.
She, in her turn, doth take much delight in
describing
to him the customs of her people, and
relating their traditionary tales, which are like
pictures, captivating to a youthful imagination. He
hath taught her to read, and reads to her
Spenser's
rhymes, and many other books of the like
kind; of which, I am sorry to say, Dame Grafton
hath brought hither stores. I have not forbidden
him to read them, well knowing that the appetite
of youth is often whetted by denial; and fearing
that the boy might be tempted, secretly, to evade
my authority; and I would rather expose him to
all the mischief of this unprofitable lore, than to
tempt him to a deceit that might corrupt the sweet
fountain of truththe well-spring of all that is
good and noble.
I have gone far from my subject. When my
boy comes before my mind's eye, I can see no
other object. But to return. I have not been
unmindful
of my duty to the Indian girl, but have
endeavoured to instil into her mind the first
principles
of our religion, as contained in Mr. Cotton's
Catechism, and elsewhere. But, alas! to these
her eye is shut and her ear is closed, not only with
that blindness and deafness common to the
natural
man, but she entertaineth an aversion, which
has the fixedness of principle, and doth
continually
remind me of Hannibal's hatred to Rome,
and is like that inwrought with her filial piety. I
have, in vain, attempted to subdue her to the
drudgery of domestic service, and make her take
part with Jennet; but as hopefully might you yoke
a deer with an ox. It is not that she lacks
obedience
to meso far as it seems she can
command
her duty, she is ever complying; but it
appeareth
impossible to her to clip the wings of her
soaring thoughts, and keep them down to
household
matters.
I have, sometimes, marvelled at the providence
of God, in bestowing on this child of the forest,
such rare gifts of mind, and other and outward
beauties. Her voice hath a natural deep and
most sweet melody in it, far beyond any stringed
instrument. She hath too, (think not that I, like
Everell, am, as Jennet saith, a charmed bird to
her) she hath, though yet a child in years, that in
her mien that doth bring to mind the lofty Judith,
and the gracious Esther. When I once said this
to Everell, he replied, Oh, mother! is she not
more like the gentle and tender Ruth? To him
she may be, and therefore it is, that innocent and
safe as the intercourse of these children now is, it
is for thee to decide whether it be not most wise
to remove the maiden from our dwelling. Two
young plants that have sprung up in close
neighbourhood
,
may be separated while young; but if
disjoined after their fibres are all intertwined, one,
or perchance both, may perish.
Think not that this anxiety springs from the
mistaken fancy of a woman, that love is the
natural
channel for all the purposes, and thoughts,
and hopes, and feelings of human life. Neither
think, I beseech thee, that doating with a foolish
fondness upon my noble boy, I magnify into
importance
whatsoever concerneth him. Nomy
heart yearneth towards this poor heathen
orphan-girl
;
and when I see her, in his absence, starting
at every sound, and her restless eye turning an
asking glance at every opening of the door; every
movement betokening a disquieted spirit, and
then the sweet contentment that stealeth over her
face when he appeareth;oh, my honoured
husband
!
all my woman's nature feeleth for her
not for any present evil, but for what may betide.
Having commended this subject to thy better
wisdom, I will leave caring for it to speak to thee
of others of thy household. Your three little girls
are thriving mightily, and as to the baby, you will
not be ashamed to own him; though you will not
recognise, in the bouncing boy that plays bo-peep
and creeps quite over the room, the little creature
who had scarcely opened his eyes on the world,
when you went away. He is by far the largest
child I ever had, and the most knowing; he has
cut his front upper teeth, and sheweth signs of two
more. He is surprisingly fond of Oneco, and
clappeth his hands with joy whenever he sees
him. Indeed, the boy is a favourite with all the
young ones, and greatly aideth me by continually
pleasuring them. He is far different from his
sister
gay
and volatile, giving scarcely one thought
to the past, and not one care to the future. His
sister often taketh him apart to discourse with him,
and sometimes doth produce a cast of seriousness
over his countenance, but at the next presented
object, it vanisheth as speedily as a shadow before
a sunbeam. He hath commended himself greatly
to the favour of Dame Grafton, by his devotion to
her little favourite: a spoiled child is she, and it
seemeth a pity that the name of Faith was given
to her, since her shrinking timid character doth
not promise, in any manner, to resemble that most
potent of the christian graces. Oneco hath
always
some charm to lure her waywardness. He
bringeth home the treasures of the woods to
please herberries, and wild flowers, and the
beautiful plumage of birds that are brought down
by his unerring aim. Everell hath much
advantage
from the wood-craft of Oneco: the two boys
daily enrich our table, which, in truth, hath need
of such helps, with the spoils of the air and water.
I am grieved to tell thee that some misrule hath
crept in among thy servants in thy absence. Alas,
what are sheep without their shepherd! Digby
is, as ever, faithfulnot serving with eye-service;
but Hutton hath consorted much with some
evildoers
,
who have been violating the law of God
and the law of our land, by meeting together in
merry companies, playing cards, dancing, and the
like. For these offences, they were brought
before
Mr. Pynchon, and sentenced to receive, each,
twenty stripes well laid on. Hutton
furthermore
,
having been overtaken with drink, was
condemned
to wear suspended around his neck for
one month, a bit of wood on which Toper is
legibly
written:and Darby, who is ever a
dawdler
,
having gone, last Saturday, with the cart to the
village, dilly-dallied about there, and did not set
out on his return till the sun was quite down, both
to the eye and by the kalender. Accordingly,
early on the following Monday, he was summoned
before Mr. Pynchon, and ordered to receive ten
stripes, but by reason of his youth and my
intercession
,
which, being by a private letter, doubtless
had some effect, the punishment was remitted;
whereupon he heartily promised amendment and
a better carriage.
There hath been some alarm here within the
last few days, on account of certain Indians who
have been seen lurking in the woods around us.
They are reported not to have a friendly
appearance
.
We have been advised to remove, for the
present, to the Fort; but as I feel no
apprehension
,
I shall not disarrange my family by taking a
step that would savour more of fear than
prudence
.
I say I feel no apprehensionyet I must
confess itI have a cowardly womanish spirit,
and fear is set in motion by the very mention of
danger. There are vague forebodings hanging
about me, and I cannot drive them away even by
the thought that your presence, my honoured
husband
,
will soon relieve me from all agitating
apprehensions
,
and repair all the faults of my poor
judgment. Fearful thoughts press on me
untoward
accidents have prolonged thy absenceour
re-union may yet be far distant, and if it should
never chance in this world, oh remember that if
I have fallen far short in duty, the measure of my
love hath been full. I have ever known that mine
was Leah's portionthat I was not the chosen
and the loved one; and this has sometimes made
me fearfuloften joylessbut remember, it is
only the perfect love of the husband that casteth
out the fear of the wife.
I have one request to prefer to thee which I
have lacked courage to make by word of mouth,
and therefore now commend it by letter to thy
kindness. Be gracious unto me, my dear
husband
,
and deem not that I overstep the modest
bound of a woman's right in meddling with that
which is thy prerogativethe ordering of our
eldest son's education. Everell here hath few
except
spiritual privileges. God, who seeth my heart,
knoweth I do not undervalue thesethe manna
of the wilderness. Yet to them might be added
worldly helps, to aid the growth of the boy's
noble
gifts, a kind Providence having opened a wide
door therefor in the generous offer of my brother
Stretton. True, he hath not attained to our light
whereby manifold errors of church and state are
made visible; yet he hath ever borne himself
uprightly
,
and to us, most lovingly, and as I
remember
there was a good Samaritan, and a faithful
centurion, I think we are permitted to enlarge the
Vol. I. 6
bounds of our charity to those who work
righteousness
,
albeit not of our communion.
Thou hast already sown the good seed in our
boy's heart, and it hath been (I say it not
presumingly
)
nurtured with a mother's tears and
prayers
.
Trust then to the promised blessing, and
fear not to permit him to pass a few years in
England
,
whence he will return to be a crown of glory
to thee, my husband, and a blessing and honour
to our chosen country. Importunity, I know, is
not beseeming in a wifeit is the instrument of
weakness, whereby, like the mouse in the fable,
she would gnaw away what she cannot break. I
will not, therefore, urge thee farther, but leave the
decision to thy wisdom and thy love. And now,
my dear husband, I kiss and embrace thee, and
may God company with thee, and restore thee, if
it be his good pleasure, to thy ever faithful and
loving and obedient wife,
Martha Fletcher
.
To her honoured husband
these be delivered.
The above letter may indicate, but it
feebly
expresses, the character and state of mind
of the writer. She never magnified her love
by words, but expressed it by that
self-devoting
,
self-sacrificing conduct to her husband and
children, which characterizes, in all ages and
circumstances
,
faithful and devoted woman. She
was too generous to communicate all her fears,
(about which a woman is usually least reserved)
to her husband.
Some occurrences of the preceding day had
given her just cause of alarm. At a short
distance
from Bethel, (the name that Mr. Fletcher
had given his residence) there lived an old Indian
woman, one of the few survivors of a tribe who
had been faithful allies of the Pequods. After
the destruction of her people, she had strayed up
the banks of the Connecticut, and remained in
Springfield. She was in the habit of supplying
Mrs. Fletcher with wild berries and herbs, and
receiving
favours in return, and on that day went
thither, as it appeared, on her customary errand.
She had made her usual barter, and had
drawn her blanket around her as if to depart, but
still she lingered standing before Mrs. Fletcher
and looking fixedly at her. Mrs. Fletcher did not
at first observe her; her head was bent over her
infant sleeping on her lap, in the attitude of
listening
to its soft breathing. As she perused its
innocent face a mother's beautiful visions floated
before her; but, as she raised her eye and met
the piercing glance of the old woman, a dark
cloud came over the clear heaven of her thoughts.
Nelema's brow was contracted, her lips drawn in,
and her little sunken eye gleamed like a diamond
from its dark recess.
Why do you look at my baby thus? asked
Mrs. Fletcher.
The old woman replied in her own dialect,
in a hurried inarticulate manner. What says
she, Magawisca? asked Mrs. Fletcher of the
Indian girl who stood beside her, and seemed to
listen with unwonted interest.
She says, madam, the baby is like a flower
just opened to the sun, with no stain upon it
that he better pass now to the Great Spirit. She
says this world is all a rough placeall sharp
stones, and deep waters, and black clouds.
Oh, she is old, Magawisca, and the days have
come to her that have no pleasure in them. Look
there, she said, Nelema, at my son Everell;'
the boy was at the moment passing the window,
flushed with exercise and triumphantly displaying
a string of game that he had just brought from
the forestIs there not sunshine in my boy's
face! To him every day is bright, and every path
is smooth.
Ah! replied the old woman with a heavy
groan, I had sons tooand grandsons; but
where are they? They trod the earth as lightly
as that boy; but they have fallen like our forest
trees, before the stroke of the English axe. Of
all my race, there is not one, now, in whose veins
my blood runs. Sometimes, when the spirits
of the storm are howling about my wigwam, I
hear the voices of my children crying for
vengeance
,
and then I could myself deal the
death-blow
.
Nelema spoke with vehemence and wild
gesture; and her language, though interpreted by
Magawisca's soft voice, had little tendency to allay
the feeling her manner inspired. Mrs. Fletcher
recoiled from her, and instinctively drew her baby
closer to her breast.
Nay, said the old woman, fear me not, I
have had kindness from thee, thy blankets have
warmed me, I have been fed from thy table, and
drank of thy cup, and what is this arm, and she
threw back her blanket and stretched out her
naked, shrivelled, trembling arm, what is this to
do the work of vengeance?
She paused for an instant, glanced her eye
wildly
around the room, and then again fixed it on
Mrs. Fletcher and her infant. They spared not
our homes, she said; there where our old men
spoke, where was heard the song of the maiden,
and the laugh of our children; there now all is
silence, dust, and ashes. I can neither harm thee,
nor help thee. When the stream of vengeance
rolls over the land, the tender shoot must be
broken
,
and the goodly tree uprooted, that gave its
pleasant shade and fruits to all.
It is a shame and a sin, said Jennet who
entered the room just as Magawisca was
conveyveying
Nelema's speech to Mrs. Fletcher; a
crying
shame, for this heathen hag to be pouring forth
here as if she were gifted like the prophets of
old; she that can only see into the future by
reading
the devil's book, and if that be the case, as
more than one has mistrusted, it were best,
forthwith
,
6*
to deliver her to the judges and cast her
into prison.
Peace, Jennet, said Mrs. Fletcher, alarmed
lest Nelema should hear her, and her feelings,
which were then at an exalted pitch, should be
wrought to frenzy; but her apprehensions were
groundless; the old woman saw nothing but the
visions of her imagination; heard nothing but the
fancied voices of the spiritis of her race. She
continued for a few moments to utter her thoughts
in low inarticulate murmurs, and then, without
again addressing Mrs. Fletcher, or raising her eyes,
she left the house.
A few moments after her departure, Mrs.
Fletcher perceived that she had dropped at her
feet a little roll, which she found on examination,
to be an arrow, and the rattle of a rattle-snake
enveloped in a skin of the same reptile. She knew it
was the custom of the savages to express much
meaning by these symbols, and she turned to
demand
an explanation of Magawisca, who was
deeply skilled in all the ways of her people.
Magawisca had disappeared, and Jennet, who
had ever looked on the poor girl with a jealous
and an evil eye, took this occasion to give vent to
her feelings. It is a pity, she said, the child
is out of the way the first time she was like to do
a service; she may be skilled in snake's rattles,
and bloody arrows, for I make no doubt she is as
used to them, as I am to my broom and
scrubbing-cloth
.
Will you call Magawisca to me, said Mrs.
Fletcher, in a voice that from her would have
been a silencing reproof to a more sensitive ear
than Jennet's; but she, no ways daunted, replied,
Ah! that will I, madam, if I can find her; but
where to look for her no mere mortal can tell; for
she does not stay longer on a perch than a
butterfly
,
unless indeed, it be when she is working on
Mr. Everell's moccasins, or filling his ears with
wild fables about those rampaging Indians. Ah,
there she is! she exclaimed, looking through the
window, talking with Nelema, just a little way
in the woodthere, I see their heads above those
scruboakssee their wild motionssee
Magawisca
starts homewardnow the old woman pulls
her backnow she seems entreating Nelemathe
old hag shakes her headMagawisca covers her
eyeswhat can all this mean? no good, I am
sure. The girl is ever going to Nelema's hut,
and of moonlight nights too, when they say witches
work their willbirds of a feather flock together.
Well, I know one thing, that if Master Everell
was mine, I would sooner, in faith, cast him into
the lion's den, or the fiery furnace, than leave him
to this crafty offspring of a race that are the
children
and heirs of the evil one.
Jennet, said Mrs. Fletcher, thy tongue far
outruns thy discretion. Restrain thy foolish
thoughts, and bid Magawisca come to me.
Jennet sullenly obeyed, and soon after
Magawisca
entered. Mrs. Fletcher was struck with
her changed aspect. She turned away, as one
conscious of possessing a secret, and fearful
that the eye, the herald of the soul, will speak
unbidden
.
Her air was troubled and anxious, and
instead of her usual light and lofty step, she
moved
timidly and dejectedly.
Come to me, Magawisca, said Mrs. Fletcher,
and deal truly by me, as I have ever dealt by
thee.
She obeyed, and as she stood by Mrs. Fletcher
the poor girl's tears dropped on her benefactor's
lap. Thou hast been more than true, she said,
thou hast been kind to me as the mother-bird
that shelters the wanderer in her nest.
Then, Magawisca, if it concerneth me to
know it, thou wilt explain the meaning of this roll
which Nelema dropped at my feet.
The girl started and became very paleto an
observing eye, the changes of the olive skin are
as apparent as those of a fairer complexion. She
took the roll from Mrs. Fletcher and shut her eyes
fast. Her bosom heaved convulsively; but after
a short struggle with conflicting feelings, she said,
deliberately, in a low voiceThat which I
may speak without bringing down on me the
curse of my father's race, I will speak. This,
she added, unfolding the snake's skin, this
betokeneth
the unseen and silent approach of an
enemy
.
This, you know, and she held up the rattle,
is the warning voice that speaketh of danger
near. And this, she concluded, taking the
arrow
in her trembling hand, this is the symbol of
death.
And why, Magawisca, are these fearful
tokens
given to me? Dost thou know, girl, aught
of a threatening enemyof an ambushed foe?
I have said all that I may say, she replied.
Mrs. Fletcher questioned further, but could
obtain
no satisfaction. Magawisca's lips were sealed;
and it was certain that if her resolution did not
yield to the entreaties of her own heart, it would
resist every other influence.
Mrs. Fletcher summoned Everell, and bade him
urge Magawisca to disclose whatever Nelema had
communicated. He did so, but sportively, for, he
said, the old woman was cracked, and
Magawisca's
head was turned. If there were indeed
danger, he continued, and Magawisca was
apprised
of it, think you, mother, she would permit
us to remain in ignorance? He turned an
appealing glance to Magawisca, but her face was
averted. Without suspecting this was
intentional
,
he continued, you ought to do penance,
Magawisca, for the alarm you have given mother.
You and I will act as her patrole to-night.
Magawisca assented, and appeared relieved by
the proposition, though her gloom was not
lightened
by Everell's gaiety. Mrs. Fletcher did not,
of course, acquiesce in this arrangement, but she
deemed it prudent to communicate her
apprehensions
to her trusty Digby. After a short
consultation
,
it was agreed that Digby should remain on
guard during the night, and that the two other
men-servants should have their muskets in order,
and be ready at a moment's warning. Such
precautions
were not infrequent, and caused no
unusual
excitement in the household. Mrs. Fletcher
had it, as she expressed herself, `borne in upon
her mind, after the evening exercise, to make some
remarks upon the uncertainty of life.' She then
dismissed the family to their several apartments,
and herself retired to indite the epistle given
above.
Everell observed Magawisca closely through the
evening, and he was convinced, from the
abstraction
of her manner and from the efforts she made,
(which were now apparent to him) to maintain a
calm demeanor, that there was more ground for
his mother's apprehensions than he, at first,
supposed
.
He determined to be the companion of
Digby's watch, and standing high in that good
fellow's confidence, he made a private
arrangement
with him, which he easily effected without
his mother's knowledge, for his youthful zeal did
not render him regardless of the impropriety of
heightening her fears.
CHAPTER IV.
It would have been happy if they had converted some
before they had killed any.
Robinson
.
The
house at Bethel had, both in front and in
rear, a portico, or, as it was more humbly, and
therefore more appropriately named, a shed; that
in the rear, was a sort of adjunct to the kitchen,
and one end of it was enclosed for the purpose of
a bed-room, and occupied by Magawisca. Everell
found Digby sitting at the other extremity of this
portico; his position was prudently chosen. The
moon was high, and the heavens clear, and there
concealed and sheltered by the shadow of the
roof, he could, without being seen, command the
whole extent of cleared ground that bordered on
the forest, whence the foe would come, if he came
at all.
Everell, like a good knight, had carefully
inspected
his arms and just taken his position beside
Digby, when they heard Magawisca's window
cautiously opened, and saw her spring through it.
Everell would have spoken to her, but Digby made
a signal of silence, and she, without observing
them, hastened with a quick and light step
towards
the wood, and entered it, taking the path
that led to Nelema's hut.
Confound her! exclaimed Digby; she is
in a plot with the old woman.
Nono. On my life she is not, Digby.
Some mischiefsome mischief, said Digby,
shaking his head. They are a treacherous race.
Let's follow her. No, we had best keep clear of
the wood. Do you call after her; she will
hearken
to you.
Everell hesitated. Speak quickly, Mr.
Everell
,
urged Digby; she will be beyond the
reach of your voice. It is no light matter that
could take her to Nelema's hut at this time of the
night.
She has good reason for going, Digby. I am
sure of it; and I will not call her back.
Reason, muttered Digby; reason is but a
jack-o'-lantern light in most people's minds. You
trust her too far, Mr. Everell; but there, she is
returning
!
See how she looks all around her, like
a frightened bird that hears an enemy in every
rustling leaf. Stand closeobserve hersee, she
lays her ear to the earthit is their crafty way of
listeningthere, she is gone again! he
exclaimed
,
as Magawisca darted away into the wood.
It is past doubt she holds communication with
some one. God send us a safe deliverance. I had
rather meet a legion of Frenchmen than a
company
of these savages. They are a kind of beast
we don't comprehendout of the range of God's
creaturesneither angel, man, nor yet quite devil.
I would have sent to the fort for a guard to-night,
but I liked not being driven hither and yon by that
old hag's tokens; nor yet quite to take counsel
from your good mother's fears, she being but a
woman.
I think you have caught the fear, Digby,
without
taking it's counsel, said Everell, which does
little credit to your wisdom; the only use of fear,
being to provide against danger.
That is true, Mr. Everell; but don't think I
am afraid. It is one thing to know what danger
is, and wish to shun it; and another thing to feel
like you, fear-nought lads, that have never felt a
twinge of pain, and have scarce a sense of your
own mortality. You would be the boldest at an
attack, Mr. Everell, and I should stand a siege
best. A boy's courage is a keen weapon that
wants temper.
Apt to break at the first stroke from the
enemy
,
you mean, Digby? Digby nodded assent.
Well, I should like, at any rate, to prove it,
added Everell.
Time enough this half-dozen years yet, my
young master. I should be loath to see that fair
skin of thine stained with blood; and, besides,
you have yet to get a little more worldly prudence
than to trust a young Indian girl, just because she
takes your fancy.
And why does she take my fancy, Digby?
because
she is true and noble-minded. I am
certain
,
that if she knows of any danger approaching
us, she is seeking to avert it.
Vol. I. 7
I don't know that, Mr. Everell; she'll be first
true to her own people. The old proverb holds fast
with these savages, as well as with the rest of the
world`hawks won't pick out hawks' eyes.' Like
to like, throughout all nature. I grant you, she
hath truly a fair seeming.
And all that's foul is our own suspicion, is it
not, Digby?
Not exactly; there's plainly some mystery
between
Magawisca and the old woman, and we
know these Pequods were famed above all the
Indian tribes for their cunning.
And what is superior cunning among savages
but superior sense?
You may out-talk me, Mr. Everell, replied
Digby, with the impatience that a man feels when
he is sure he is right, without being able to make
it appear. You may out-talk me, but you will
never convince me. Was not I in the Pequod
war? I ought to know, I think.
Yes, and I think you have told me they
shewed
more resolution than cunning there; in
particular
,
that the brother of Magawisca, whom she so
piteously bemoans to this day, fought like a young
lion.
Yes, he did, poor dog!and he was
afterwards
cruelly cut off; and it is this that makes
me think they will take some terrible revenge for
his death. I often hear Magawisca talking to
Oneco of her brother, and I think it is to stir his
spirit; but this boy is no more like to him than a
spaniel to a bloodhound.
Nothing Digby said had any tendency to weaken
Everell's confidence in Magawisca.
The subject of the Pequod war once started,
Digby and Everell were in no danger of sleeping
at their post. Digby loved, as well as another man,
and particularly those who have had brief military
experience, to fight his battles o'er again; and
Everell was at an age to listen with delight to
tales of adventure, and danger. They thus wore
away the time till the imaginations of both
relater
and listener were at that pitch, when every
shadow is embodied, and every passing sound
bears a voice to the quickened sense. Hark!
said Digby, did you not hear footsteps?
I hear them now, replied Everell; they
seem not very near. Is it not Magawisca
returning
?
No; there is more than one; and it is the
heavy, though cautious, tread of men. Ha!
Argus
scents them. The old house-dog now sprang
from his rest on a mat at the door-stone, and gave
one of those loud inquiring barks, by which this
animal
first hails the approach of a strange footstep.
Hush, Argus, hush, cried Everell; and the old
dog, having obeyed his instinct, seemed satisfied
to submit to his master's voice, and crept lazily
back to his place of repose.
You have hushed Argus, and the footsteps
too, said Digby; but it is well, perhaps, if there
really is an enemy near, that he should know we
are on guard.
If there really is, Digby! said Everell, who,
terrific as the apprehended danger was, felt the
irrepressible thirst of youth for adventure; do
you think we could both have been deceived?
Nothing easier, Mr. Everell, than to deceive
senses on the watch for alarm. We heard
something
,
but it might have been the wolves that even
now prowl about the very clearing here at night.
Ha! he exclaimed, there they areand
starting
forward he levelled his musket towards the
wood.
You are mad, said Everell, striking down
Digby's musket with the butt end of his own. It
is Magawisca. Magawisca at that moment
emerged from the wood.
Digby appeared confounded. Could I have
been so deceived? he said; could it have been
her shadowI thought I saw an Indian beyond
that birch tree; you see the white bark? well, just
beyond in the shade. It could not have been
Magawisca, nor her shadow, for you see there are
trees between the foot-path and that place; and
yet, how should he have vanished without motion
or sound?
Our senses deceive us, Digby, said Everell,
reciprocating Digby's own argument.
In this tormenting moonlight they do; but
my senses have been well schooled in their time,
and should have learned to know a man from a
woman, and a shadow from a substance.
Digby had not a very strong conviction of the
actual presence of an enemy, as was evident from
his giving no alarm to his auxiliaries in the
house; and he believed that if there were hostile
Indians prowling about them, they were few in
number, and fearful; still he deemed it prudent to
persevere in their precautionary measures. I
will remain here, he said, Mr. Everell, and do
you follow Magawisca; sift what you can from
her. Depend on't, there's something wrong.
Why should she have turned away on seeing us?
and did you not observe her hide something
beneath
her mantle?
Everell acceded to Digby's proposition; not
with the expectation of confirming his suspicions,
but in the hope that Magawisca would shew they
were groundless. He followed her to the front of
the house, to which she seemed involuntarily to
have bent her steps on perceiving him.
You have taken the most difficult part of our
duty on yourself, Magawisca, he said, on coming
up to her. You have acted as vidette, while I
have been quiet at my post.
Perhaps Magawisca did not understand him,
at any rate she made no reply.
Have you met an enemy in your
reconnoitring
?
Digby and I fancied that we both heard
and saw the foe.
When and where? exclaimed Magawisca,
in a hurried, alarmed tone.
Not many minutes since, and just at the very
edge of the wood.
7*
What! when Digby raised his gun? I
thought that had been in sport to startle me.
NoMagawisca. Sporting does not suit our
present case. My mother and her little ones are
in peril, and Digby is a faithful servant.
Faithful! echoed Magawisca, as if there
were more in Everell's expression than met the
ear; he surely may walk straight who hath
nothing
to draw him aside. Digby hath but one
path, and that is plain before himbut one voice
from his heart, and why should he not obey it?
The girl's voice faltered as she spoke, and as she
concluded she burst into tears. Everell had never
before witnessed this expression of feeling from
her. She had an habitual self-command that
hid the motions of her heart from common
observers
,
and veiled them even from those who
most narrowly watched her. Everell's confidence
in Magawisca had not been in the least degree
weakened by all the appearances against her.
He did not mean to imply suspicion by his
commendation
of Digby, but merely to throw out a
leading observation which she might follow if she
would.
He felt reproached and touched by her distress,
but struck by the clew, which, as he thought,
her language afforded to the mystery of her
conduct
,
and confident that she would in no way aid
or abet any mischief that her own people might
be contriving against them, he followed the
natural
bent of his generous temper, and assured her
again, and again, of his entire trust in her. This
seemed rather to aggravate than abate her
distress
.
She threw herself on the ground, drew
her mantle over her face, and wept convulsively.
He found he could not allay the storm he had
raised, and he seated himself beside her. After
a little while, either exhausted by the violence
of her emotion, or comforted by Everell's silent
sympathy, she became composed; and raised
her face from her mantle, and as she did so,
something fell from beneath its folds. She
hastily
recovered and replaced it, but not till Everell
had perceived it was an eagle's feather. He
knew this was the badge of her tribe, and he had
heard her say, that a tuft from the wing of the
monarch-bird was her father's crest. A suspicion
flashed through his mind, and was conveyed to
Magawisca's, by one bright glance of inquiry.
She said nothing, but her responding look was
rather sorrowful than confused, and Everell,
anxious to believe what he wished to be true,
came, after a little consideration, to the conclusion,
that the feather had been dropped in her path by
a passing bird. He did not scrutinise her motive
in concealing it; he could not think her capable
of evil, and anxious to efface from her mind the
distrust his countenance might have expressed
This beautiful moon and her train of stars, he
said, look as if they were keeping their watch
over our dwelling. There are those, Magawisca,
who believe the stars have a mysterious influence
on human destiny. I know nothing of the grounds
of their faith, and my imagination is none of the
brightest, but I can almost fancy they are
stationed
there as guardian angels, and I feel quite sure
that nothing evil could walk abroad in their
light.
They do look peaceful, she replied
mournfully
;
but ah! Everell, man is ever breaking
the peace of nature. It was such a night as this
so bright and still, when your English came
upon our quiet homes.
You have never spoken to me of that night
Magawisca.
NoEverell, for our hands have taken hold
of the chain of friendship, and I feared to break
it by speaking of the wrongs your people laid on
mine.
You need not fear it; I can honour noble
deeds though done by our enemies, and see that
cruelty is cruelty, though inflicted by our friends.
Then listen to me; and when the hour of
vengeance comes, if it should come, remember it
was provoked.
She paused for a few moments, sighed deeply,
and then began the recital of the last acts in the
tragedy of her people; the principal circumstances
of which are detailed in the chronicles of the
times, by the witnesses of the bloody scenes.
You know, she said, our fortress-homes were
on the level summit of a hill. Thence we could
see as far as the eye could stretch, our
hunting-grounds
,
and our gardens, which lay beneath us on
the borders of a stream that glided around our
hill, and so near to it, that in the still nights we
could hear its gentle voice. Our fort and
wigwams
were encompassed with a palisade, formed
of young trees, and branches interwoven and
sharply pointed. No enemy's foot had ever
approached
this nest, which the eagles of the tribe
had built for their mates and their young. Sassacus
and my father were both away on that dreadful
night. They had called a council of our chiefs,
and old men; our young men had been out in
their canoes, and when they returned they had
danced and feasted, and were now in deep sleep.
My mother was in her hut with her children, not
sleeping, for my brother Samoset had lingered
behind his companions, and had not yet returned
from the water-sport. The warning spirit, that
ever keeps its station at a mother's pillow,
whispered
that some evil was near; and my mother,
bidding me lie still with the little ones, went forth
in quest of my brother. All the servants of the
Great Spirit spoke to my mother's ear and eye of
danger and death. The moon, as she sunk
behind
the hills, appeared a ball of fire; strange
lights darted through the air; to my mother's eye
they seemed fiery arrows; to her ear the air was
filled with death-sighs.
She had passed the palisade, and was
descending
the hill, when she met old Cushmakin. Do
you know aught of my boy? she asked.
Your boy is safe, and sleeps with his
companions
;
he returned by the Sassafras knoll; that
way can only be trodden by the strong-limbed,
and light-footed. My boy is safe, said my
mother; then tell me, for thou art wise, and
canst see quite through the dark future, tell me,
what evil is coming to our tribe? She then
described
the omens she had seen. I know not,
said Cushmakin, of late darkness hath spread
over my soul, and all is black there, as before
these eyes, that the arrows of death have pierced;
but tell me, Monoco, what see you now in the
fields of heaven?
Oh, now, said my mother, I see nothing
but the blue depths, and the watching stars. The
spirits of the air have ceased their moaning, and
steal over my cheek like an infant's breath. The
water-spirits are rising, and will soon spread their
soft wings around the nest of our tribe.
The boy sleeps safely, muttered the old
man, and I have listened to the idle fear of a
doating mother.
I come not of a fearful race, said my mother.
Nay, that I did not mean, replied
Cushmakin
,
but the panther watching her young is
fearful
as a doe. The night was far spent, and my
mother bade him go home with her, for our
pow-wows
1
1.
See note at the end of the volume.
have always a mat in the wigwam of their
chief. Nay, he said, the day is near, and I
am always abroad at the rising of the sun. It
seemed that the first warm touch of the sun
opened the eye of the old man's soul, and he
saw again the flushed hills, and the shaded vallies,
the sparkling waters, the green maize, and the
gray old rocks of our home. They were just
passing
the little gate of the palisade, when the old
man's dog sprang from him with a fearful bark.
A rushing sound was heard. Owanox! Owanox!
(the English! the English!) cried Cushmakin.
My mother joined her voice to his, and in an
instant
the cry of alarm spread through the
wigwams
.
The enemy were indeed upon us. They
had surrounded the palisade, and opened their
fire.
Was it so sudden? Did they so rush on
sleeping
women and children? asked Everell, who
was unconsciously lending all his interest to the
party of the narrator.
Even so; they were guided to us by the
traitor
Wequash; he from whose bloody hand my
mother had shielded the captive English maidens
he who had eaten from my father's dish, and
slept on his mat. They were flanked by the
cowardly
Narragansetts, who shrunk from the sight
of our tribewho were pale as white men at the
thought of Sassacus, and so feared him, that
when his name was spoken, they were like an
unstrung
bow, and they said, `He is all one God
no man can kill him.' These cowardly allies
waited for the prey they dared not attack.
Then, said Eyerell, as I have heard, our
people had all the honour of the fight.
Honour! was it, Everellye shall hear. Our
warriors rushed forth to meet the foe; they
surrounded
the huts of their mothers, wives, sisters,
children; they fought as if each man had a
hundred
lives, and would give each, and all, to redeem
their homes. Oh! the dreadful fray, even now,
rings in my ears! Those fearful guns that we
had never heard beforethe shouts of your
people
our
own battle yellthe piteous cries of the
little childrenthe groans of our mothers, and,
oh! worseworse than allthe silence of those
that could not speakThe English fell back;
they were driven to the palisade; some beyond it,
when their leader gave the cry to fire our huts,
and led the way to my mother's. Samoset,
the noble boy, defended the entrance with a
prince-like
courage, till they struck him down; prostrate
and bleeding he again bent his bow, and had
taken
deadly aim at the English leader, when a
sabre-blow severed his bowstring. Then was
taken
from our hearth-stone, where the English had
been so often warmed and cherished, the brand
to consume our dwellings. They were covered
with mats, and burnt like dried straw. The
enemy
retreated without the palisade. In vain did
our warriors fight for a path by which we might
escape from the consuming fire; they were beaten
back; the fierce element gained on us; the
Narragansetts
pressed on the English, howling like
wolves for their prey. Some of our people threw
themselves into the midst of the crackling flames,
and their courageous souls parted with one shout
of triumph; others mounted the palisade, but
they were shot and dropped like a flock of birds
smitten by the hunter's arrows. Thus did the
strangers destroy, in our own homes, hundreds of
our tribe.
And how did you escape in that dreadful
hour, Magawiscayou were not then taken
prisoners
?
No; there was a rock at one extremity of our
hut, and beneath it a cavity into which my
mother
crept, with Oneco, myself, and the two little
ones that afterwards perished. Our simple
habitations
were soon consumed; we heard the foe
retiring, and when the last sound had died away,
we came forth to a sight that made us lament to
be among the living. The sun was scarce
an hour from his rising, and yet in this brief space
our homes had vanished. The bodies of our
people
were strewn about the smouldering ruin; and
all around the palisade lay the strong and valiant
warriorscoldsilentpowerless as the
unformed
clay.
Magawisca paused; she was overcome with
the recollection of this scene of desolation. She
looked upward with an intent gaze, as if she held
communion with an invisible being. Spirit of
Vol. I. 8
my mother! burst from her lips. Oh! that I
could follow thee to that blessed land where I
should no more dread the war-cry, nor the
death-knife
.
Everell dashed the gathering tears from his
eyes, and Magawisca proceeded in her narrative.
While we all stood silent and motionless, we
heard footsteps and cheerful voices. They came
from my father and Sassacus, and their band,
returning
from the friendly council. They
approached
on the side of the hill that was covered
with a thicket of oaks, and their ruined homes at
once burst upon their view. Oh! what horrid
sounds then pealed on the air! shouts of wailing,
and cries for vengeance. Every eye was turned
with suspicion and hatred on my father.
He
had
been the friend of the English;
he
had counselled
peace and alliance with them;
he
had protected
their traders; delivered the captives taken from
them, and restored them to their people: now
his
wife and children alone were living, and they
called
him traitor. I heard an angry murmur, and
many hands were lifted to strike the death-blow.
He moved not`Nay, nay,' cried Sassacus,
beating
them off. `Touch him not; his soul is bright
as the sun; sooner shall you darken that, than find
treason in his breast. If he hath shown the
dove's heart to the English when he believed them
friends, he will show himself the fierce eagle now
he knows them enemies. Touch him not,
warriors
;
remember my blood runneth in his veins.'
From that moment my father was a changed
From that moment my father was a changed
man. He neither spoke nor looked at his wife, or
children; but placing himself at the head of one
band of the young men he shouted his war-cry,
and then silently pursued the enemy. Sassacus
went forth to assemble the tribe, and we followed
my mother to one of our villages.
You did not tell me, Magawisca, said
Everell
,
how Samoset perished; was he consumed
in the flames, or shot from the palisade?
Neitherneither. He was reserved to whet
my father's revenge to a still keener edge. He
had forced a passage through the English, and
hastily collecting a few warriors, they pursued the
enemy, sprung upon them from a covert, and
did so annoy them that the English turned and
gave them battle. All fled save my brother, and
him they took prisoner. They told him they
would spare his life if he would guide them to our
strong holds; he refused. He had, Everell, lived
but sixteen summers; he loved the light of the
sun even as we love it; his manly spirit was tamed
by wounds and weariness; his limbs were like a
bending reed, and his heart beat like a woman's;
but the fire of his soul burnt clear. Again they
pressed him with offers of life and reward; he
faithfully refused, and with one sabre-stroke they
severed his head from his body.
Magawisca pausedshe looked at Everell and
said with a bitter smileYou English tell us,
Everell, that the book of your law is better than
that written on our hearts, for ye say it teaches
mercy, compassion, forgivenessif ye had such
a law and believed it, would ye thus have treated
a captive boy?
Magawisca's reflecting mind suggested the
most serious obstacle to the progress of the
christian religion, in all ages and under all
circumstances
;
the contrariety between its divine
principles and the conduct of its professors; which,
instead of always being a medium for the light
that emanates from our holy law, is too often the
darkest cloud that obstructs the passage of its
rays to the hearts of heathen men. Everell had
been carefully instructed in the principles of his
religion, and he felt Magawisca's relation to be an
awkward comment on them, and her inquiry
natural
;
but though he knew not what answer to
make, he was sure there must be a good one, and
mentally resolving to refer the case to his mother,
he begged Magawisca to proceed with her
narrative
.
The fragments of our broken tribe, she said,
were collected, and some other small dependent
tribes persuaded to join us. We were obliged to
flee from the open grounds, and shelter ourselves
in a dismal swamp. The English surrounded us;
they sent in to us a messenger and offered life
and pardon to all who had not shed the blood of
Englishmen. Our allies listened, and fled from
us, as frightened birds fly from a falling tree. My
father looked upon his warriors; they answered
that look with their battle-shout. `Tell your
people
,'
said my father to the messenger, `that we
have shed and drank English blood, and that we
will take nothing from them but death.'
The messenger departed and again returned
with offers of pardon, if we would come forth and
lay our arrows and our tomahawks at the feet of
the English. `What say you, warriors,' cried my
father`shall we take
pardon
from those who
have burned your wives and children, and given
your homes to the beasts of preywho have
robbed
you of your hunting-grounds, and driven your
canoes from their waters?' A hundred arrows
were pointed to the messenger. `Enoughyou
have your answer,' said my father, and the
messenger
returned to announce the fate we had
chosen.
Where was Sassacus?had he abandoned
his people? asked Everell.
Abandoned them! Nohis life was in theirs;
but accustomed to attack and victory, he could
not bear to be thus driven, like a fox to his hole.
His soul was sick within him, and he was silent
and left all to my father. All day we heard the
strokes of the English axes felling the trees that
defended us, and when night came, they had
approached
so near that we could see the
glimmering
of their watch-lights through the branches of
the trees. All night they were pouring in their
bullets, alike on warriors, women, and children.
Old Cushmakin was lying at my mother's feet,
when he received a death-wound. Gasping for
8*
breath he called on Sassacus and my father
`Stay not here,' he said; `look not on your wives
and children, but burst your prison bound; sound
through the nations the cry of revenge! Linked
together, ye shall drive the English into the sea.
I speak the word of the Great Spiritobey it!'
While he was yet speaking he stiffened in death.
`Obey him, warriors,' cried my mother; `see,'
she said, pointing to the mist that was now
wrapping
itself around the wood like a thick curtain
`see, our friends have come from the spirit-land
to shelter you. Nay, look not on usour hearts
have been tender in the wigwam, but we can die
before our enemies without a groan. Go forth
and avenge us.'
`Have we come to the counsel of old men
and old women!' said Sassacus, in the bitterness
of his spirit.
`When women put down their womanish
thoughts and counsel like men, they should be
obeyed,' said my father. `Follow me, warriors.'
They burst through the enclosure. We saw
nothing more, but we heard the shout from the foe,
as they issued from the woodthe momentary
fierce encounterand the cry, `they have
escaped
!'
Then it was that my mother, who had
listened with breathless silence, threw herself
down on the mossy stones, and laying her hot
cheek to mine`Oh, my childrenmy children!'
she said, `would that I could die for you! But
fear not deaththe blood of a hundred chieftains,
that never knew fear, runneth in your veins. Hark,
the enemy comes nearer and nearer. Now lift up
your heads, my children, and show them that even
the weak ones of our tribe are strong in soul.'
We rose from the groundall about sat
women
and children in family clusters, awaiting
unmoved
their fate. The English had penetrated
the forest-screen, and were already on the little
rising-ground where we had been entrenched.
Death was dealt freely. None resistednot a
movement was madenot a voice liftednot a
sound escaped, save the wailings of the dying
children.
One of your soldiers knew my mother, and a
command was given that her life and that of her
children should be spared. A guard was
stationed
round us.
You know that, after our tribe was thus cut
off, we were taken, with a few other captives, to
Boston. Some were sent to the Islands of the
Sun, to bend their free limbs to bondage like your
beasts of burden. There are among your people
those who have not put out the light of the Great
Spirit; they can remember a kindness, albeit
done by an Indian; and when it was known to
your Sachems that the wife of Mononotto, once
the protector and friend of your people, was a
prisoner, they treated her with honour and
gentleness
.
But her people were extinguishedher
husband driven to distant forestsforced on earth
to the misery of wicked soulsto wander without
a home; her children were captivesand her
heart was broken. You know the rest.
This war, so fatal to the Pequods, had transpired
the preceding year. It was an important event
to the infant colonies, and its magnitude
probably
somewhat heightened to the imaginations of
the English, by the terror this resolute tribe had
inspired. All the circumstances attending it were
still fresh in men's minds, and Everell had heard
them detailed with the interest and particularity
that belongs to recent adventures; but he had
heard them in the language of the enemies and
conquerors of the Pequods; and from Magawisca's
lips they took a new form and hue; she seemed,
to him, to embody nature's best gifts, and her
feelings
to be the inspiration of heaven. This new
version of an old story reminded him of the man
and the lion in the fable. But here it was not
merely changing sculptors to give the advantage
to one or the other of the artist's subjects; but it
was putting the chisel into the hands of truth, and
giving it to whom it belonged.
He had heard this destruction of the original
possessors of the soil described, as we find it in
the history of the times, where, we are told, the
number destroyed was about four hundred; and
it was a fearful sight to see them thus frying in
the fire, and the streams of blood quenching the
same, and the horrible scent thereof; but the
victory
seemed a sweet sacrifice, and they gave the
praise thereof to God.
In the relations of their enemies, the courage
of the Pequods was distorted into ferocity, and
their fortitude, in their last extremity, thus set
forth: many were killed in the swamp, like
sullen
dogs, that would rather, in their self-willedness
and madness, sit still to be shot or cut in pieces,
than receive their lives for asking, at the hands of
those into whose power they had now fallen.
Everell's imagination, touched by the wand of
feeling, presented a very different picture of those
defenceless families of savages, pent in the
recesses
of their native forests, and there
exterminated
,
not by superior natural force, but by the
adventitious circumstances of arms, skill, and
knowledge; from that offered by those who then
living and worthy of credit did affirm, that in the
morning entering into the swamp, they saw
several
heaps of them [the Pequods] sitting close
together
,
upon whom they discharged their pieces,
laden with ten or twelve pistol bullets at a time,
putting the muzzles of their pieces under the
boughs, within a few yards of them.
Everell did not fail to express to Magawisca,
with all the eloquence of a heated imagination,
his sympathy and admiration of her heroic and
suffering people. She listened with a mournful
pleasure, as one listens to the praise of a departed
friend. Both seemed to have forgotten the
purpose
of their vigil, which they had marvellously
kept without apprehension, or heaviness, when
they were roused from their romantic abstraction
by Digby's voice: Now to your beds, children,
he said; the family is stirring, and the day is at
hand. See the morning star hanging just over
those trees, like a single watch-light in all the wide
canopy. As you have not to look in a
prayerbook
for it, master Everell, don't forget to thank
the Lord for keeping us safe, as your mother, God
bless her, would say, through the night-watches.
Stop one moment, added Digby, lowering his
voice to Everell as he rose to follow Magawisca,
did she tell you?
Tell me! what?
What! Heaven's mercy! what ails the boy!
Why, did she tell you what brought her out
tonight
?
Did she explain all the mysterious actions
we have seen? Are you crazy? Did not you ask
her?
Everell hesitatedfortunately for him the light
was too dim to expose to Digby's eye the blushes
that betrayed his consciousness that he had
forgotten
his duty. Magawisca did not tell me,
he said, but I am sure Digby that
That she can do no wronghey, Master Everell,
well, that may be very satisfactory to youbut it
does not content me. I like not her secret ways
`it's bad ware that needs a dark store.'
Everell had tried the force of his own
convictions
on Digby, and knew it to be unavailing,
therefore having no reply to make, he very
discreetly
retreated without attempting any.
Magawisca crept to her bed, but not to repose
neither watching nor weariness procured sleep for
her. Her mind was racked with apprehensions,
and conflicting duties, the cruellest rack to an
honourable
mind.
Nelema had communicated to her the
preceding
day, the fact which she had darkly
intimated
to Mrs. Fletcher, that Mononotto, with one or
two associates was lurking in the forest, and
watching an opportunity to make an attack on
Bethel. How far his purpose extended, whether
simply to the recovery of his children, or to the
destruction of the family, she knew not. The
latter was most probable, for hostile Indians
always left blood on their trail. In reply to
Magawisca's
eager inquiries, Nelema said she had
again, and again, assured her father of the kind
treatment his children had received at the hands
of Mrs. Fletcher; but he seemed scarcely to hear
what she said, and precipitately left her, telling
her that she would not again see him, till his
work was done.
Magawisca's first impulse had been to reveal
all to Mrs. Fletcher; but by doing this, she would
jeopard her father's life. Her natural sympathies
her strong affectionsher pride, were all
enlisted
on the side of her people; but she shrunk,
as if her own life were menaced, from the blow
that was about to fall on her friends. She would
have done or suffered any thing to avert itany
thing but betray her father. The hope of
meeting
him, explains all that seemed mysterious to
Digby. She did go to Nelema's hutbut all
was quiet there. In returning she found an eagle's
feather in the path,she believed it must have
just been dropped there by her father, and this
circumstance
determined her to remain watching
through the night, that if her father should
appear
,
she might avert his vengeance.
She did not doubt that Digby had really seen
and heard him; and believing that her father
would not shrink from a single armed man, she
hoped against hope, that his sole object was to
recover his children; hoped against hope, we say,
for her reason told her, that if that were his only
purpose, it might easily have been accomplished
by the intervention of Nelema.
Magawisca had said truly to Everell, that her
father's nature had been changed by the wrongs
he received. When the Pequods were proud and
prosperous, he was more noted for his humane
virtues, than his warlike spirit. The supremacy
of his tribe was acknowledged, and it seemed to
be his noble nature, as it is sometimes the instinct
of the most powerful animals, to protect and
defend
,
rather than attack and oppress. The
ambitious
spirit of his brother chieftain Sassacus, had
ever aspired to dominion over the allied tribes;
and immediately after the appearance of the
English
,
the same temper was manifest in a
jealousy
of their encroachments. He employed all
his art and influence and authority, to unite the
tribes for the extirpation of the dangerous
invaders
.
Mononotto, on the contrary, averse to all
hostility, and foreseeing no danger from them,
was the advocate of a hospitable reception, and
pacific conduct.
This difference of feeling between the two
chiefs, may account for the apparent treachery of
the Pequods, who, as the influence of one or the
other prevailed, received the English traders
with favour and hospitality, or, violating their
treaties of friendship, inflicted on them cruelties
and death.
The stories of the murders of Stone, Norton,
and Oldham, are familiar to every reader of our
early annals; and the anecdote of the two
English
girls, who were captured at Wethersfield,
and protected and restored to their friends by the
wife of Mononotto, has already been illustrated by
a sister labourer; and is precious to all those who
would accumulate proofs, that the image of God
is never quite effaced from the souls of his
creatures
;
and that in their darkest ignorance, and
deepest degradation, there are still to be found
traits of mercy and benevolence. These will be
gathered and treasured in the memory, with that
fond feeling with which Mungo Park describes
himself to have culled and cherished in his
bosom, the single flower that bloomed in his
melancholy
track over the African desert.
The chieftain of a savage race, is the
depository
of the honour of his tribe; and their defeat is a
disgrace to him, that can only be effaced by the
Vol. I. 9
blood of his conquerors. It is a common case
with the unfortunate, to be compelled to endure
the reproach of inevitable evils; and Mononotto
was often reminded by the remnant of his tribe,
in the bitterness of their spirit, of his former
kindness for the English. This reproach
sharpened
too keenly the edge of his adversity.
He had seen his people slaughtered, or driven
from their homes and
hunting-grounds, into
shameful
exile; his wife had died in captivity, and his
children lived in servile dependence in the house
of his enemies.
Sassacus perished by treachery, and
Mononotto
alone remained to endure this accumulated
misery. In this extremity, he determined on the
rescue of his children, and the infliction of some
signal deed of vengeance, by which he hoped to
revive the spirit of the natives, and reinstate
himself
as the head of his broken and dispersed
people
:
in his most sanguine moments, he meditated
a unity and combination that should eventually
expel the invaders.
CHAPTER V.
There have been sweet singing voices
In your walks that now are still;
There are seats left void in your earthly homes,
Which none again may fill.
Mrs. Hemans
.
Magawisca
rose from her sleepless pillow to
join the family at prayers, her mind distracted
with opposing fears, which her face, the mirror of
her soul, too truly reflected.
Mrs. Fletcher observed her narrowly, and
confirmed
in her forebodings by the girl's
apprehensive
countenance, and still farther by Digby's
report
of her behaviour during the night, she
resolved
to dispatch him to Mr. Pynchon for his advice
and assistance, touching her removal to the fort,
or the appointment of a guard for Bethel. Her
servant, (who prudently kept his alarm to
himself
,
knowing, as he said, that a woman's fears
were always ahead of danger) applauded her
decision
,
and was on the point of proceeding to
act upon it, when a messenger arrived with the
joyful tidings, that Mr. Fletcher was within a
few hours ride of Bethel. And the intelligence,
no less joyful to Dame Grafton, that with his
luggage, already arrived at the village, was a
small box of millinery, which she had ordered
from London.
Mrs. Fletcher feeling, as good wives do, a sense
of safety from the proximity of her husband, bade
Digby defer any new arrangement till he had the
benefit of his master's counsel. The whole house
was thrown into the commotion so common in a
retired family, when an arrival is about to
interrupt
the equable current of life. Whatever
unexpressed
and superior happiness some others
might have felt, no individual made such bustling
demonstrations as Mrs. Grafton. It was difficult
to say which excited her most, the anticipation of
seeing her niece, Hope Leslie, or of inspecting
the box of millinery.
Immediately after dinner, two of the
men-servants
were despatched to the village to transport
their master's luggage. They had hardly gone
when Mrs. Grafton recollected that her box
contained
a present for Madam Holioke, which it
would be a thousand pities to have brought to
Bethel, and lie there, perhaps a week before it
would be sent to her, and `she would like of all
things, if Mrs. Fletcher saw no objection, to have
the pony saddled and ride to the village herself,
where the present could be made forthwith.'
Mrs. Fletcher was too happy to throw a shadow
across any one's path, and wearied too, perhaps,
with Mrs. Grafton's fidgetting, (for the good dame
had all day been wondering whether her
confidential
agent had matched her orange satin; how
she had trimmed her cap, &c. &c. &c.) she
ordered a horse to be saddled and brought to
the door. The animal proved a little restive,
and Mrs. Grafton, not excelling in horsemanship,
became alarmed and begged that Digby might be
allowed to attend her.
Digby's cleverness was felt by all the household,
and his talents were always in requisition for the
miscellaneous wants of the family; but Digby,
like good servants in every age, was aware of his
importance, and was not more willing than a
domestic
of the present day, to be worked like a
machine. He muttered something of old
women's
making fools of themselves with new
top-knots
,
and saying aloud, that Mistress
Grafton
knew it was his master's order, that all the
men-servants should not be away from the place
at the same time, he was turning off, when Mrs.
Fletcher, who was standing at the door observing
him, requested him with more authority than was
usual in her manner, to comply with Mrs.
Grafton's
request.
I would not wish, said Digby, still hesitating,
to disoblige Mistress Graftonif it were a matter
of life and death, he added, lowering his voice;
but to get more furbelows for the old lady when
with what she has already, she makes such a fool
of herself, that our young witlings, Master
Everell
and Oneco, garnish out our old Yorkshire
9*
hen with peacock's feathers and dandalions, and
then call her, `Dame Grafton in a flurry.'
Hush, Digby! said Mrs. Fletcher, it ill
fits you to laugh at such fooleries in the boys
they shall be corrected, and do you learn to treat
your master's friend with respect.
Comecome, Digby, screamed Mrs.
Grafton
.
Shall I go and break my master's orders?
asked Digby, still bent on having his own way.
For this once you shall, Digby, answered
Mrs. Fletcher, and if you need an apology to
your master, I shall not fail to make it.
But if any thing should happen to you,
Mistress
Fletcher
Nothing will happen, my good Digby. Is not
your master at hand? and an hour or two will be
the extent of your absence. So, get thee along
without more ado.
Digby could not resist any farther the authority
of his gentle mistress, and he walked by the side
of Mrs. Grafton's pony, with slow unwilling steps.
All was joy in Mrs. Fletcher's dwelling. My
dear mother, said Everell, it is now quite time
to look out for father and Hope Leslie. I have
turned the hour-glass three times since dinner, and
counted all the sands I think. Let us all go on
the front portico where we can catch the first
glimpse of them, as they come past the elm-trees.
Here, Oneco, he continued, as he saw assent in
his mother's smile, help me out with mother's
rocking-chairrather rough rocking, he added
as he adjusted the rockers lengthwise with the logs
that served for the flooringbut mother wont
mind trifles just now. Ah! blessed baby brother,
he continued, taking in his arms the beautiful
infant
you
shall come too, even though you cheat
me out of my birthright, and get the first
embrace
from father. Thus saying, he placed
the laughing infant in his go-cart, beside his
mother
.
He then aided his little sisters in their
arrangement
of the playthings they had brought
forth to welcome and astonish Hope; and finally
he made an elevated position for Faith Leslie,
where she might, he said, as she ought, catch the
very first glimpse of her sister.
Thank, thank you, Everell, said the little
girl as she mounted her pinnacle; if you knew
Hope, you would want to see her first tooevery
body loves Hope. We shall always have pleasant
times when Hope gets here.
It was one of the most beautiful afternoons at
the close of the month of May. The lagging
spring had at last come forth in all her power;
her work of gladness was finished, and
forests
,
fields, and meadows were bright with
renovated
life. The full Connecticut swept
triumphantly
on, as if still exulting in its release from
the fetters of winter. Every gushing rill had the
spring-note of joy. The meadows were, for the
first time, enriched with patches of English grain,
which the new settlers had sown, scantily, by way
of experiment, prudently occupying the greatest
portion of the rich mould, with the native Indian
corn. This product of our soil is beautiful in all
its progress, from the moment, when as now it
studded the meadow with hillocks, shooting its
bright-pointed spear from its mother earth, to its
maturity, when the long golden ear bursts from
the rustling leaf.
The grounds about Mrs. Fletcher's house had
been prepared with the neatness of English taste;
and a rich bed of clover that overspread the lawn
immediately before the portico, already rewarded
the industry of the cultivators. Over this delicate
carpet, the domestic fowls, the first civilized
inhabitants
of the country, of their tribe, were now
treading, picking their food here and there like
dainty little epicures.
The scene had also its minstrels; the birds, those
ministers and worshippers of nature, were on the
wing, filling the air with melody; while, like
diligent little housewifes, they ransacked forest
and field for materials for their house-keeping.
A mother, encircled by healthful sporting
children
,
is always a beautiful spectaclea spectacle
that appeals to nature in every human breast.
Mrs. Fletcher, in obedience to matrimonial duty,
or, it may be, from some lingering of female
vanity
,
had, on this occasion, attired herself with
extraordinary care. What woman does not wish
to look handsome?in the eyes of her husband.
Mother, said Everell, putting aside the
exquisitely
fine lace that shaded her cheek, I do not
believe you looked more beautiful than you do to
day when, as I have heard, they called you `the
rose of the wilderness'our little Mary's cheek is
as round and as bright as a peach, but it is not so
handsome as yours, mother. `Your heart has sent
this colour here, he continued, kissing her
tenderly
it
seems to have come forth to tell us that
our father is near.
It would shame me, Everell, replied his
mother
,
embracing him with a feeling that the
proudest
drawing-room belle might have envied, to
take such flattery from any lips but thine.
Oh do not call it flattery, motherlook,
Magawisca
for
heaven's sake cheer uplook, would
you know mother's eye? just turn it, mother, one
minute from that roadand her pale cheek too
with this rich colour on it?
Alas! alas! replied Magawisca, glancing her
eyes at Mrs. Fletcher, and then as if heart-struck,
withdrawing them, how soon the flush of the
setting
sun fades from the evening cloud.
Oh Magawisca, said Everell impatiently,
why are you so dismal? your voice is too sweet for
a bird of ill-omen. I shall begin to think as
Jennet
saysthough Jennet is no text-book for me
I shall begin to think old Nelema has really
bewitched
you.
You call me a bird of ill-omen, replied
Magawisca
,
half proud, half sorrowful, and you call
the owl a bird of ill-omen, but we hold him sacred
he is our sentinel, and when danger is near he
cries, awake! awake!
Magawisca, you are positively unkind
Jeremiah's
lamentations on a holiday would not be
more out of time than your croaking is nowthe
very skies, earth, and air seem to partake our joy
at father's return, and you only make a discord.
Do you think if your father was near I would not
share your joy?
Tears fell fast from Magawisca's eye, but she
made no reply, and Mrs. Fletcher observing and
compassionating her emotion, and thinking it
probably
arose from comparing her orphan state to
that of the merry children about her, called her
and said, Magawisca, you are neither a
stranger
,
nor a servant, will you not share our joy? Do
you not love us?
Love you! she exclaimed, clasping her hands,
love you! I would give my life for you.
We do not ask your life, my good girl,
replied
Mrs. Fletcher, kindly smiling on her, but a
light heart and a cheerful look. A sad
countenance
doth not become this joyful hour. Go and
help Onecohe is quite out of breath, blowing
those soap bubbles for the children.
Oneca smiled, and shook his head, and
continued
to send off one after another of the prismatic
globes, and as they rose and floated on the air and
brightened with the many-coloured ray, the little
girls clapped their hands, and the baby stretched
his to grasp the brilliant vapour.
Oh! said Magawisca, impetuously covering
her eyes, I do not like to see any thing so
beautiful
,
pass so quickly away.
Scarcely had she uttered these words, when
suddenly
,
as if the earth had opened on them, three
Indian warriors darted from the forest and pealed
on the air their horrible yells.
My father! my father! burst from the lips of
Magawisca, and Oneco.
Faith Leslie sprang towards the Indian boy, and
clung fast to himand the children clustered
about their mothershe instinctively caught her
infant and held it close within her arms as if their
ineffectual shelter were a rampart.
Magawisca uttered a cry of agony, and
springing
forward with her arms uplifted, as if
deprecating
his approach, she sunk down at her father's
feet, and clasping her hands, save themsave
them, she cried, the motherthe childrenoh
they are all goodtake vengeance on your enemies
but sparespare our friendsour benefactors
I bleed when they are struckoh command
them to stop! she screamed, looking to the
companions
of her father, who unchecked by her cries,
were pressing on to their deadly work.
Mononotto was silent and motionless, his eye
glanced wildly from Magawisca to Oneco.
Magawisca
replied to the glance of fireyes, they
have sheltered usthey have spread the wing of
love over ussave themsave themoh it will
be too late, she cried, springing from her father,
whose silence and fixedness showed that if his
better
nature rebelled against the work of revenge,
there was no relenting of purpose. Magawisca
darted before the Indian who was advancing
towards
Mrs. Fletcher with an uplifted hatchet.
You shall hew me to pieces ere you touch her,
she said, and planted herself as a shield before her
benefactress.
The warrior's obdurate heart untouched by the
sight of the helpless mother and her little ones,
was thrilled by the courage of the heroic girlhe
paused and grimly smiled on her when his
companion
,
crying, hasten, the dogs will be on us!
levelled
a deadly blow at Mrs. Fletcherbut his
uplifted arm was penetrated by a musket shot and
the hatchet fell harmless to the floor.
Courage, mother! cried Everell, reloading
the piece, but neither courage nor celerity could
availthe second Indian sprang upon him, threw
him on the floor, wrested his musket from him,
and brandishing his tomahawk over his head, he
would have aimed the fatal stroke, when a cry
from Mononotto arrested his arm.
Everell extricated himself from his grasp, and
one hope flashing into his mind, he seized a
bugle-horn
which hung beside the door, and winded it.
This was the conventional signal of alarmand
he sent forth a blastlong and louda death-cry.
Mrs. Grafton and her attendants were just
mounting their horses to return home. Digby
listened for a momentthen exclaiming, it
comes from our master's dwelling! ride for your
life, Hutton! he tossed away a bandbox that
encumbered
him, and spurred his horse to its utmost
speed.
The alarm was spread through the village, and
in a brief space Mr. Pynchon with six armed men
were pressing towards the fatal scene.
In the mean time the tragedy was proceeding
at Bethel. Mrs. Fletcher's senses had been
stunned
with terror. She had neither spoken nor
moved after she grasped her infant. Everell's
gallant interposition, restored a momentary
consciousness
;
she screamed to himFly, Everell,
my son, fly; for your father's sake, fly.
Never, he replied, springing to his mother's
side.
The savages, always rapid in their movements,
were now aware that their safety depended on
despatch. Finish your work, warriors, cried
Mononotto. Obedient to the command, and
infuriated
by his bleeding wound, the Indian, who
on receiving the shot, had staggered back, and
leant against the wall, now sprang forward, and
tore the infant from its mother's breast. She
shrieked, and in that shriek, passed the agony of
death. She was unconscious that her son,
putting
forth a strength beyond nature, for a moment
kept the Indian at bay; she neither saw nor felt
the knife struck at her own heart. She felt not
Vol. I. 10
the arms of her defenders, Everell and
Magawisca
,
as they met around her neck. She
fainted
,
and fell to the floor, dragging her impotent
protectors with her.
The savage, in his struggle with Everell, had
tossed the infant boy to the ground; he fell quite
unharmed on the turf at Mononotto's feet. There
raising his head, and looking up into the
chieftain's
face, he probably perceived a gleam of
mercy, for with the quick instinct of infancy, that
with unerring sagacity directs its appeal, he
clasped
the naked leg of the savage with one arm, and
stretched the other towards him with a piteous
supplication, that no words could have expressed.
Mononotto's heart melted within him; he
stooped to raise the sweet suppliant, when one of
the Mohawks fiercely seized him, tossed him
wildly
around his head, and dashed him on the
door-stone
.
But the silent prayerperhaps the celestial
inspiration of the innocent creature, was not lost.
We have had blood enough, cried Mononotto,
you have well avenged me, brothers.
Then looking at Oneco, who had remained in
one corner of the portico, clasping Faith Leslie
in his arms, he commanded him to follow him
with the child. Everell was torn from the
lifeless
bodies of his mother and sisters, and dragged
into the forest. Magawisca uttered one cry of
agony and despair, as she looked, for the last
time, on the bloody scene, and then followed her
father.
As they passed the boundary of the cleared
ground, Mononotto tore from Oneco his English
dress, and casting it from himThus perish,
he said, every mark of the captivity of my
children
.
Thou shalt return to our forests, he
continued
,
wrapping a skin around him, with the
badge of thy people.
CHAPTER VI.
It is but a shadow vanisheda bubble broke, a dreame
finish'tEternitie willpay for all.
Roger Williams
.
Scarcely
had the invaders disappeared, and
the sound of their footsteps died away, when
Digby and Hutton came in view of the dwelling.
Ah! said Hutton, reining in his horse, I
thought all this fluster was for nothingthe blast
a boy's prank. A pretty piece of work we've
made of it; you'll have Mistress Grafton about
your ears for tossing away her Lon'on
gimcracks
.
All is as quiet here as a Saturday night;
nothing to be seen but the smoke from the
kitchen-chimney
,
and that's a pleasant sight to me, for
I went off without my dinner, and methinks it
will now taste as savoury as Jacob's pottage.
Digby lent no attention to his companion's
chattering, but pressed on; his fears were allayed,
but not removed. As he approached the house,
he felt that the silence which pervaded it, boded
no good; but the horrors of the reality far
surpassed
the worst suggestions of his vague
apprehensions
.
Oh, my mistress! my mistress! he
screamed, when the havoc of death burst upon his
sight. My good mistressand her girls!and
the baby too! Oh, Godhave mercy on my
master! and he bent over the bodies and wrung
his hands: not onenot one spared!
Yes, one, spoke a trembling whining voice,
which proved to be Jennet's, who had just
emerged
from her hiding-place covered with soot; by
the blessing of a kind Providence, I have been
preserved for some wise end, but, she continued,
panting, the fright has taken my breath away,
besides being squeezed as flat as a pancake in
the bed-room chimney.
Stopfor Heaven's sake, stop, Jennet, and
tell me, if you can, if Mr. Everell was here.
Jennet did not know; she remembered having
seen the family in general assembled, just before
she heard the yell of the savages.
How long, Digby inquired, have they been
gone? how long since you heard the last sound?
That's more than mortal man, or woman
either, in my case, could tell, Mr. Digby. Do
you think, when a body seems to feel a scalping
knife in their heads, they can reckon time? No;
hours are minutes, and minutes hours, in such a
case.
Oh fool! fool! cried Digby, and turning
disgusted away, his eye fell on his musket.
Thank the Lord! he exclaimed, Mr. Everell
has poured one shot into the fiends; he alone
10*
knew where the gun was, bless the boybless
him; he has a strong arm, and a stout soulbless
him. They have taken him offwe'll after him,
Hutton. Jennet, bring my hunting pouch. Look
to your fire-lock, Hutton. Magawisca!Oneco!
Faith Leslie, all gone! he continued, his first
amazement dissipating, and thought after thought
flashing the truth on his mind. I remember last
nightOh, Mr. Everell, how the girl deceived
youshe knew it all.
Ah, Magawisca! so I thought, said Jennet.
She knows every thing evil that happens in
earth, sea, or air; she and that mother-witch,
Nelema. I always told Mrs. Fletcher she was
warming a viper in her bosom, poor dear lady;
but I suppose it was for wise ends she was left to
her blindness.
Are you ready, Hutton? asked Digby,
impatiently
.
Ready!yes, I am ready, but what is the use,
Digby? what are we two against a host? and,
besides, you know not how long they have been
gone.
Not very long, said Digby, shuddering and
pointing to blood that was trickling, drop by drop,
from the edge of the flooring to the step. How
long the faithful fellow might have urged, we know
not, for cowardice hath ever ready and abundant
arguments, and Hutton was not a man to be
persuaded
into danger; but the arrival of Mr.
Pynchon
and his men, put an end to the debate.
Mr. Pynchon was the faithful, paternal guardian
of his little colony. He saw in this scene of
violent
death, not only the present overwhelming
misery
of the family at Bethel, but the fearful fate to
which all were exposed who had perilled their
lives in the wilderness; but he could give but
brief space to bitter reflections, and the
lamentings
of nature. Instant care and service were
necessary for the dead and the living. The bodies
of the mother and children were removed to one
of the apartments, and decently disposed, and
then, after a fervent prayer, a duty never omitted
in any emergency by the pilgrims, whose faith in
the minute superintendence of Providence was
practical, he directed the necessary
arrangements
for the pursuit of the enemy.
Little could be gathered from Jennet. She was
mainly occupied with her own remarkable
preservation
,
not doubting that Providence had
specially
interposed to save the only life utterly
insignificant
in any eyes but her own. She
recollected
to have heard Magawisca exclaim, `My
father!' at the first onset of the savages. The
necessary conclusion was, that the party had been
led by the Pequod chief. It was obviously
probable
that he would return, with his children and
captives, to the Mohawks, where, it was well
known, he had found refuge; of course the
pursuers
were to take a westerly direction. Jennet
was of opinion that the party was not numerous;
and encumbered as they must be with their
prisoners
,
the one a child whom it would be
necessary
,
in a rapid flight to carry, Mr. Pynchon had
sanguine expectations that they might be
overtaken
.
The fugitives, obliged to avoid the cleared
meadows
,
had, as Mr. Pynchon believed, taken an
indirect
path through the forest to the Connecticut;
which, in pursuance of their probable route, they
would, of course cross, as soon as they could, with
safety. He selected five of his men, whom he
deemed fittest for the expedition, and
recommending
it to them to be guided by the counsel of
Digby, whose impatient zeal was apparent, he
directed
them to take a direct course to the river.
He was to return to the village, and despatch a
boat to them, with which they were to ply up the
river, in the hope of intercepting the passage of
the Indians.
The men departed, led by Digby, to whose
agitated
spirit every moment's delay had appeared
unnecessary and fatal; and Mr. Pynchon was
mounting his horse, when he saw Mr. Fletcher,
who had avoided the circuitous road through the
village, emerge from the forest, and come in full
view of his dwelling. Mr. Pynchon called to
Jennet
,
yonder is your masterhe must not come
hither while this precious blood is on the threshold
I shall take him to my house, and assistance
shall be sent to you. In the mean time, watch
those bodies faithfully.
Oh! I can't stay here alone, whimpered
Jennet, running after Mr. PynchonI would
not stay for all the promised land.
Back, woman, cried Mr. Pynchon, in a voice
of thunder; and Jennet retreated, the danger of
advancing appearing, for the moment, the greater
of the two.
Mr. Fletcher was attended by two Indians, who
followed him, bearing on a litter, his favourite,
Hope Leslie. When they came within sight of
Bethel, they shouted the chorus of a native song.
Hope inquired its meaning. They told her, and
raising herself, and tossing back the bright curls
that shaded her eyes, she clapped her hands, and
accompanied them with the English words,
`The home!the home!the chieftain's home!'
And my home too, is it not? she said.
Mr. Fletcher was touched with the joy with
which this bright little creature, who had left a
palace in England, hailed his rustic dwelling in
the wilderness. He turned on her a smile of
delight
he
could not speak; the sight of his home
had opened the flood-gates of his heart. Oh
now, she continued, with growing animation,
I shall see my sister. But why does not she
come to meet us?Where is your Everell? and
the girls? There is no one looking out for us.
The stillness of the place, and the absence of all
living objects, struck Mr. Fletcher with fearful
apprehensions
,
heightened by the sight of his friend,
who was coming, at full gallop, towards him. To
an accurate observer, the effects of joy and
sorrow
,
on the human figure, are easily discriminated
misery depresses, contracts, and paralyses the
body, as it does the spirit.
Remain here for a few moments, said Mr.
Fletcher to his attendants, and he put spurs to his
horse, and galloped forward.
Put down the litter, said Hope Leslie to her
bearers. I cannot stand stock-still, here, in
sight of the house where my sister is. The
Indians
knew their duty, and determined to abide
by the letter of their employer's orders, did not
depress the litter.
There, take that for your sulkiness, she said,
giving each a tap on his ear, and half impatient,
half sportive, she leaped from the litter, and
bounded forward.
The friends met. Mr. Pynchon covered his face,
and groaned aloud. What has happened to my
family? demanded Mr. Fletcher. My wife?
my son?my little ones?Oh! speakGod
give me grace to hear thee!
In vain Mr. Pynchon essayed to speakhe
could find no words to soften the frightful truth.
Mr. Fletcher turned his horse's head towards
Bethel
,
and was proceeding to end, himself, the
insupportable
suspense, when his friend, seizing his
arm, criedStop, stopgo not thitherthy
house is desolateand then, half-choked with
groans and sobs, he unfolded the dismal story.
Not a sound, nor a sigh, escaped the blasted
man. He seemed to be turned into stone, till he
was roused by the wild shrieks of the little girl,
who, unobserved, had listened to the
communication
of Mr. Pynchon.
Take the child with you, he saidI shall
go to my house. Ifif my boy returns, send
a messenger instantly; otherwise, suffer me to
remain alone till to-morrow.
He passed on, without appearing to hear the
cries and entreaties of Hope Leslie, who, forcibly
detained by Mr. Pynchon, screamed, Oh! take
metake me with youthere are but us two
leftI will not go away from you! but at last,
finding resistance useless, she yielded, and was
conveyed to the village, where she was received
by her aunt Grafton, whose grief was as noisy
and communicative, as Mr. Fletcher's had been
silent, and unexpressed by any of the forms of
sorrow.
Early on the following morning, Mr. Pynchon,
attended by several others, men and women, went
to Bethel to offer their sympathy and service.
They met Jennet at the door, who, greatly relieved
by the sight of human faces, and ears willing to
listen, informed them, that immediately after her
master's arrival, he had retired to the apartment
that contained the bodies of the deceased,
charging
her not to intrude on him.
A murmur of apprehension ran around the
circle
.
It was misjudged to leave him here alone,
whispered one. It is not every man, though his
faith stand as a mountain in his prosperity, that
can bear to have the Lord put forth his hand, and
touch his bone and his flesh.
Ah! said another, my heart misgave me
when Mr. Pynchon told us how calm he took it;
such a calm as that is like the still dead waters
that cover the lost citiesquiet is not the nature
of the creature, and you may be sure that unseen
havoc and ruin are underneath.
The poor dear gentleman should have taken
something to eat or drink, said a little plump,
full-fed lady; there is nothing so feeding to grief
as an empty stomach. Madam Holioke, do not
you think it would be prudent for us to guard
with a little cordial and a bit of spiced cakeif
this good girl can give it to us, looking at
Jennet
.
The dear lady that's gone was ever thrifty
in her housewifery, and I doubt not she hath left
such witnesses behind.
Mrs. Holioke shook her head, and a man of a
most solemn and owl aspect, who sat between the
ladies, turned to the last speaker and said, in a
deep guttural tone, Judy, thou shouldst not bring
thy carnal propensities to this house of mourning
and perchance of sin. Where the Lord works,
Satan worketh also, tempting the wounded. I
doubt our brother Fletcher hath done violence to
himself. He was ever of a proudthat is to say,
a peculiar and silent makeand what won't bend,
will break.
The suggestion in this speech communicated
alarm to all present. Several persons gathered
about Mr. Pynchon. Some advised him to knock
at the door of the adjoining apartment; others
counselled forcing it if necessary. While each
one was proffering his opinion, the door opened
from within, and Mr. Fletcher came among them.
Do you bring me any news of my son? he
asked Mr. Pynchon.
None, my friendthe scouts have not yet
returned
.
Till this question was put and answered, there
was a tremulousness of voice, a knitting of the
brow, and a variation of colour, that indicated the
agitation of the sufferer's soul; but then a
sublime
composure overspread his countenance and
figure. He noticed every one present with more
than his usual attention, and to a superficial
observer
,
one who knew not how to interpret his
mortal paleness, the wild melancholy of his glazed
eye and his rigid muscles, which had the
inflexibility
and fixedness of marble, he might have
appeared
to be suffering less than any person
present
.
Some cried outrightsome stared with
undisguised and irrepressible curiositysome
were voluble in the expression of their sympathy,
while a few were pale, silent, and awe-struck.
All these many coloured feelings fell on Mr.
Fletcher like light on a black surfaceproducing
no changemeeting no return. He stood
leaning
on the mantel-piece, till the first burst of
feeling was overtill all, insensibly yielding to
his example, became quiet, and the apartment
was as still as that in which death held his silent
dominion.
Mr. Pynchon then whispered to him. My
Vol. I. 11
friend, bear your testimony nowedify us with a
seasonable word, showing that you are not
amazed
at your calamitythat you counted the cost
before you undertook to build the Lord's building
in the wilderness. It is suitable that you should
turn your affliction to the profit of the Lord's
people.
Mr. Fletcher felt himself stretched on a rack,
that he must endure with a martyr's patience; he
lifted up his head and with much effort spoke
one brief sentencea sentence which contains all
that a christian could feel, or the stores of
language
could expresshe uttered, God's will be
done! and then hurried away, to hide his
struggles
in solitude.
Relieved from the restraint of his presence, the
company poured forth such moral, consoling, and
pious reflections as usually flow spontaneously
from the lips of the spectators of suffering; and
which would seem to indicate that each
individual
has a spare stock of wisdom and patience
for his neighbour's occasions, though, through
some strange fatality, they are never applied to
his own use.
We hope our readers will not think we have
wantonly sported with their feelings, by drawing
a picture of calamity that only exists in the
fictitious
tale. Nosuch events, as we have feebly
related
,
were common in our early annals, and
attended
by horrors that it would be impossible for
the imagination to exaggerate. Not only families
but villages, were cut off by the most dreaded of
all foesthe ruthless, vengeful savage.
In the quiet possession of the blessings
transmitted
,
we are, perhaps, in danger of forgetting,
or undervaluing the sufferings by which they were
obtained. We forget that the noble pilgrims
lived and endured for usthat when they came
to the wilderness, they said truly, though it may
be somewhat quaintly, that they turned their
backs on Egyptthey did virtually renounce all
dependence on earthly supportsthey left the
land of their birthof their homesof their
father's
sepulchresthey sacrificed ease and
preferment
,
and all the delights of senseand for
what?to open for themselves an earthly
paradise
?to
dress their bowers of pleasure and
rejoice
with their wives and children? Nothey
came not for themselvesthey lived not to
themselves
.
An exiled and suffering people, they came
forth in the dignity of the chosen servants of the
Lord, to open the forests to the sun-beam, and to
the light of the Sun of Righteousnessto restore
manman oppressed and trampled on by his
fellow; to religious and civil liberty, and equal
rightsto replace the creatures of God on their
natural levelto bring down the hills, and make
smooth the rough places, which the pride and
cruelty
of man had wrought on the fair creation of
the Father of all.
What was their reward? Fortune?
distinctions
?the
sweet charities of home? Nobut
their feet were planted on the mount of vision,
and they saw, with sublime joy, a multitude of
people where the solitary savage roamed the
forest
the
forest vanished, and pleasant villages and
busy cities appearedthe tangled foot-path
expanded
to the thronged high-waythe consecrated
church planted on the rock of heathen sacrifice.
And that we might realize this visionenter
into this promised land of faiththey endured
hardship, and braved deathdeeming, as said
one of their company, that he is not worthy to
live at all, who, for fear or danger of death,
shunneth
his country's service, or his own honour
since death is inevitable and the fame of virtue
immortal.
If these were the fervors of enthusiasm, it was
an enthusiasm kindled and fed by the holy flame
that glows on the altar of Godan enthusiasm
that never abates, but gathers life and strength
as the immortal soul expands in the image of its
Creator.
We shall now leave the little community,
assembled
at Bethel, to perform the last offices for
one who had been among them an example of
all the most attractive virtues of woman. The
funeral ceremony was then, as it still is, among the
descendants of the pilgrims, a simple affectionate
service; a gathering of the peoplemen, women,
and children, as one family, to the house of
mourning.
Mononotto and his party in their flight had less
than an hour's advantage of their pursuers; and,
retarded by their captives, they would have been
compelled to despatch them, or have been
overtaken
,
but for their sagacity in traversing the
forest
;
they knew how to wind around morasses,
to shape their course to the margin of the
rivulets
,
and to penetrate defiles, while their pursuers,
unpractised in that accurate observation of
nature
,
by which the savage was guided, were
clambering
over mountains, arrested by precipices, or
half buried in swamps.
After an hour's silent and rapid flight, the
Indians
halted to make such arrangements as would
best accelerate their retreat. They placed the
little Leslie on the back of one of the Mohawks,
and attached her there by a
happis,
or strong
wide band, passed several times over her, and
around the body of her bearer. She screamed at
her separation from Oneco, but being permitted
to stretch out her hand and place it in his, she
became quiet and satisfied.
The Mohawk auxiliaries, who so lately had
seemed two insatiate bloodhounds, now appeared
to regard the reciprocal devotion of the children
with complacency; but their amity was not
extended
to Everell; and Saco in particular, the
Indian
whom he had wounded, and whose arm was
irritated and smarting, eyed him with glances of
brooding malignity. Magawisca perceived this,
and dreading lest the savage should give way to a
11*
sudden impulse of revenge, she placed herself
between
him, and Everell. This movement
awakened
Mononotto from a sullen reverie, and
striking
his hands together, angrily, he bade
Magawisca
remove from the English boy.
She obeyed, and mournfully resumed her place
beside her father, saying, as she did so, in a low
thrilling tone, my fathermy father!where is
my father's look, and voice?Mononotto has
found his daughter, but I have not found my
father.
Mononotto felt her reproachhis features
relaxed
,
and he laid his hand on her head.
My father's soul awakes! she cried,
exultingly
.
Oh, listen to melisten to me!she
waived her hand to the Mohawks to stop, and they
obeyed. Why, she continued in an
impassioned
voicewhy hath my father's soul stooped
from its ever upward flight? Till this day his
knife was never stained with innocent blood.
Yonder
roof, and she pointed towards Bethel, has
sheltered thy childrenthe wing of the
mother-bird
was spread over uswe ate of the children's
bread; then, why hast thou shed their blood?
why art thou leading the son into captivity? Oh,
spare him!send him backleave one light in
the darkened habitation!
One, echoed Mononotto; did they leave
me one? No;my people, my children, were
swept away like withered leaves before the wind
and there where our pleasant homes were
clustered
,
is silence and darknessthistles have
sprung up around our hearth-stones, and grass has
overgrown our path-ways. Magawisca, has thy
brother vanished from thy memory? I tell thee,
that as Samoset died, that boy shall die. My soul
rejoiced when he fought at his mother's side, to
see him thus make himself a worthy victim to
offer to thy lion-hearted brothereven so fought
Samoset.
Magawisca felt that her father's purpose was
not to be shaken. She looked at Everell, and
already felt the horrors of the captive's fatethe
scorching fires, and the torturing knives; and
when her father commanded the party to move
onward, she uttered a piercing shriek.
Be silent, girl, said Mononotto, sternly;
cries and screams are for children and cowards.
And I am a coward, replied Magawisca,
reverting
to her habitually calm tone, if to fear
my father should do a wrong, even to an enemy,
is cowardice. Again her father's brow softened,
and she ventured to add, send back the boy,
and our path will be all smooth before usand
light will be upon it, for my mother often said,
`the sun never sets on the soul of the man that
doeth good.'
Magawisca had unwittingly touched the spring
of her father's vindictive passions. Dost thou
use thy mother's words, he said, to plead for
one of the race of her murderers? Is not her
grave among my enemies? Say no more, I
command
you, and speak not to the boy; thy kindness
but sharpens my revenge.
There was no alternative. Magawisca must
feel, or feign submission; and she laid her hand
on her heart, and bowed her head, in token of
obedience. Everell had observed, and understood
her intercession, for, though her words were
uttered
in her own tongue, there was no mistaking
her significant manner; but he was indifferent to
the success of her appeal. He still felt the
dying
grasp of his motherstill heard his
slaughtered
sisters cry to him for helpand, in the agony
of his mind, he was incapable of an emotion of
hope, or fear.
The party resumed their march, and suddenly
changing their direction, they came to the shore
of the Connecticut. They had chosen a point
for their passage where the windings of the river
prevented their being exposed to view for any
distance
;
but still they cautiously lingered till the
twilight had faded into night. While they were
taking their bark canoe from the thicket of
underwood
,
in which they had hidden it, Magawisca
said, unobserved, to Everell, keep an eagle-eye
on our path-wayour journey is always towards
the setting sunevery turn we make is marked
by a dead tree, a lopped branch, or an arrow's
head carved in the bark of a tree; be watchful
the hour of escape may come. She spoke in
the lowest audible tone, and without changing her
posture or raising her eyes; and though her last
accents caught her father's ear, when he turned
to chide her he suppressed his rebuke, for she sat
motionless, and silent as a statue.
The party were swiftly conveyed to the
opposite
shore. The canoe was then again taken
from the river and plunged into the wood; and
believing they had eluded pursuit, they prepared
to encamp for the night. They selected for this
purpose a smooth grassy area, where they were
screened and defended on the river-side by a
natural
rampart, formed of intersecting branches of
willows, sycamores, and elms.
Oneco collected dead leaves from the little
hollows, into which they had been swept by
eddies
of wind, and, with the addition of some soft
ferns, he made a bed and pillow for his little
favourite
,
fit for the repose of a wood nymph. The
Mohawks regarded this labour of love with
favour
,
and one of them took from his hollow
girdle
some pounded corn, and mixing grains of
maple-sugar with it, gave it to Oneco, and the
little girl received it from him as passively as the
young bird takes food from its mother. He then
made a sylvan cup of broad leaves, threaded
together
with delicate twigs, and brought her a
draught of water from a fountain that swelled
over the green turf and trickled into the river,
drop by drop, as clear and bright as crystal.
When she had finished her primitive repast, he
laid her on her leafy bed, covered her with skins,
and sang her to sleep.
The Indians refreshed themselves with
pounded
maize, and dried fish. A boyish appetite
is not fastidious, and, with a mind at ease,
Everell
might have relished this coarse fare; but
now, though repeatedly solicited, he would not
even rise from the ground where he had thrown
himself in listless despair. No excess of misery
can enable a boy of fifteen for any length of time
to resist the cravings of nature for sleep.
Everell
,
it may be remembered, had watched the
previous
night, and he soon sunk into oblivion of his
griefs. One after another, the whole party fell
asleep, with the exception of Magawisca, who sat
apart from the rest, her mantle wrapped closely
around her, her head leaning against a tree, and
apparently lost in deep meditation. The
Mohawks
,
by way of precaution, had taken a
position
on each side of Everell, so as to render it next
to impossible for their prisoner to move without
awakening them. But love, mercy, and hope,
count nothing impossible, and all were at work
in the breast of Magawisca. She warily waited
till the depth of the night, when sleep is most
profound
,
and then, with a step as noiseless as the
falling dew, she moved round to Everell's head,
stooped down, and putting her lips close to his
ear, pronounced his name distinctly. Most
persons
have experienced the power of a name thus
pronounced. Everell awakened instantly and
perfectly
and
at once understood from Magawisca's
gestures, for speak again she dared not, that she
urged his departure.
The love of life and safety is too strong to be
paralyzed for any length of time. Hope was
kindled
;
extrication and escape seemed possible;
quickening thoughts rushed through his mind.
He might be restored to his father; Springfield
could not be far distant; his captors would not
dare to remain in that vicinity after the dawn of
day; one half hour and he was beyond their
pursuit
.
He rose slowly and cautiously to his feet.
All was yet profoundly still. He glanced his
eye on Faith Leslie, whom he would gladly have
rescued; but Magawisca shook her head, and he
felt that to attempt it, would be to ensure his own
failure.
The moon shone through the branches of the
trees, and shed a faint and quivering light on the
wild groupe. Everell looked cautiously about
him, to see where he should plant his first
footstep
.
`If I should tread on those skins,' he
thought, `that are about them; or on those dead
rustling leaves, it were a gone case with me.'
During this instant of deliberation, one of the
Indians
murmured something of his dreaming
thoughts, turned himself over, and grasped
Everell's
ankle. The boy bit his quivering lip, and
suppressed an instinctive cry, for he perceived it
was but the movement of sleep, and he felt the
hold gradually relaxing. He exchanged a glance
of joy with Magawisca, when a new source of
alarm startled themthey heard the dashing of
oars. Breathlessimmoveablethey listened.
The strokes were quickly repeated, and the sound
rapidly approached, and a voice spokenot
there boysnot there, a little higher up.
Joy and hope shot through Everell's heart as he
sprang, like a startled deer, but the Mohawk,
awakened too by the noise, grasped his leg with
one hand, and with the other drawing his knife
from his girdle, he pointed it at Everell's heart, in
the act to strike if he should make the least
movement
,
or sound.
Caution is the instinct of the weaker animals;
the Indian cannot be surprised out of his wariness.
Mononotto and his companions, thus suddenly
awakened, remained as fixed and silent as the
trees about them.
The men in the canoes suspended their oars
for a moment, and seemed at a loss how to
proceed
,
or whether to proceed at all. It is a risky
business, I can tell you, Digby, said one of them,
to plunge into those woods`it is ill fighting
with wild beasts in their own den'they may start
out upon us from their holes when we are least
looking for them.
And if they should, replied Digby, in the
voice of one who would fain enforce reason with
persuasion, if they should, Lawrence, are we
not six stout christian men, with bold hearts, and
the Lord on our side, to boot?
I grant ye, that's fighting at odds; but I
mistrust
we have no command from the Lord to come
out on this wild-goose chase.
I take a known duty, replied Digby,
always
to be a command from the Lord, and you,
Lawrence, I am sure, will be as ready as another
man to serve under such an order.
Lawrence was silenced for a moment, and
another
voice spokeYes, so should we all, Master
Digby, if you could make out the order; but I
can't see the sense of risking all our lives, and
getting but a `thank ye for nothing' when we get
back, if, indeed, we ever get out of the bowels of
the forest again, into a clearing. To be sure,
we've tracked them thus far, but now, on the
river
,
we lose scent. You know they thread the
forest as handily as my good woman threads her
needle; and for us to pursue them, is as vain a
thing as for my old chimney-corner cat to chase a
catamount through the woods. Come, come
let's head about, and give it up for a bad job.
Stop, stop, my friends, cried Digby, as they
were about to put the boat around; ye surely
have not all faint hearts. Feare-naught, you will not
so belie your christian-name, as to turn your back
on danger. And you, John Wilkin, who cut down
the Pequods, as you were wont to mow the swarth
in Suffolk, will you have it thrown up to you,
that you wanted courage to pursue the caitiffs?
Go home, Lawrence, and take your curly-pated
boy on your knee, and thank God with what heart
you may, for his spared life; and all, all of you
go to that childless man, at Bethel, and say, `we
could not brave the terrors of the forest to save
Vol. I. 12
your child, for we have pleasant homes and wives
and children.' For myself, the Lord helping,
while I've life, I'll not turn back without the boy;
and if there's one among you, that hopes for
God's pity, let him go with me.
Why, I'm sure it was not I that proposed
going
back, said Lawrence.
And I'm sure, said the second speaker, that
I'm willing, if the rest are, to try our luck further.
Now, God above reward ye, my good
fellows
,
cried Digby, with renewed life; I knew
it was but trying your metal, to find it true. It is
not reasonable that you should feel as I do, who
have seen my master's home looking like a
slaughter-house
.
My mistressthe gentlest and the
best!Oh! it's too much to think of. And then
that boy, that's worth a legion of such men as we
areof such as I, I mean. But come, let's pull
away; a little further up the streamthere's no
landing here, where the bank is so steep.
Stayrow a little closer, cried one of the
men; I see something like a track on the very
edge of the bank; its being seemingly impossible,
is the very reason why the savages would have
chosen it.
They now approached so near the shore that
Everell knew they might hear a whisper, and yet
to move his lips was certain death. Those who
have experienced the agony of a night-mare, when
life seemed to depend on a single word, and that
word could not be pronounced, may conceive his
emotions at this trying moment. Friends and
rescue so near, and so unavailing!
Ye are mistaken, said another of the
pursuing
party, after a moment's investigation, it's but
a heron's track, which it truly was; for the
savages
had been careful not to leave the slightest
trace of their footsteps where they landed.
There's a cove a little higher up, continued
the speaker; we'll put in there, and then if we
dont get on their trail, Master Digby must tell us
what to do.
It's plain what we must do then, said Digby,
go strait on westerly. I have a compass, you
know; there is not, as the hunters tell us, a single
smoke between this and the vallies of the
Housatonick
.
There the tribes are friendly, and if we
reach them without falling in with our enemy, we
will not pursue them further.
Agreed, agreed, cried all the men, and they
again dashed in their oars and made for the cove.
Everell's heart sunk within him as the sounds
receded
;
but hope once admitted, will not be again
excluded, and with the sanguine temperament of
youth, he was already mentally calculating the
chances of escape. Not so Magawisca; she knew
the dangers that beset him; she was aware of her
father's determined purpose. Her heart had again
been rent by a divided duty; one word from her
would have rescued Everell, but that word would
have condemned her father; and when the boat
retired, she sunk to the ground, quite spent with
the conflict of her feelings.
It may seem strange that the Indians did not
avail themselves of the advantage of their
ambush
to attack their pursuers; but it will be
remembered
,
the latter were double their number,
and besides, Mononotto's object now was, to
make good his retreat with his children; and to
effect this, it was essential he should avoid any
encounter
with his pursuers. After a short
consultation
with his associates, they determined to
remain
in their present position till the morning.
They were confident they should be able to detect
and avoid the track of the enemy, and soon to
get in advance of them.
CHAPTER VII.
But the scene
Is lovely round; a beautiful river there
Wanders amid the fresh and fertile meads,
The paradise he made unto himself,
Mining the soil for ages. On each side
The fields swell upwards to the hills; beyond,
Above the hills, in the blue distance, rise
The mighty columns with which earth props heaven.
There is a tale about these gray old rocks,
A sad tradition
Bryant
.
It
is not our purpose to describe, step by step,
the progress of the Indian fugitives. Their
sagacity
in traversing their native forests; their skill
in following and eluding an enemy, and all their
politic devices, have been so well described in a
recent popular work, that their usages have
become
familiar as household words, and nothing
remains but to shelter defects of skill and
knowledge
under the veil of silence; since we hold it to
be an immutable maxim, that a thing had better
not be done, than be ill-done.
Suffice it to say, then, that the savages, after
crossing the track of their pursuers, threaded the
12*
forest with as little apparent uncertainty as to their
path, as is now felt by travellers who pass through
the same still romantic country, in a stage-coach
and on a broad turnpike. As they receded from the
Connecticut, the pine levels disappeared; the
country was broken into hills, and rose into high
mountains.
They traversed the precipitous sides of a river
that, swoln by the vernal rains, wound its way'
among the hills, foaming and raging like an angry
monarch. The river, as they traced its course,
dwindled to a mountain rill, but still retaining its
impetuous character, leaping and tumbling for
miles through a descending defile, between high
mountains, whose stillness, grandeur, and
immobility
,
contrasted with the noisy reckless little
stream, as stern manhood with infancy. In one
place, which the Indians called the throat of the
mountain, they were obliged to betake themselves
to the channel of the brook, there not being room
on its margin for a footpath. The branches of
the trees that grew from the rocky and
precipitous
declivities on each side, met and interlaced,
forming a sylvan canopy over the imprisoned
stream. To Magawisca, whose imagination
breathed a living spirit into all the objects of
nature
,
it seemed as if the spirits of the wood had
stooped to listen to its sweet music.
After tracing this little sociable rill to its source,
they again plunged into the silent forestwaded
through marshy ravines, and mounted to the
summits
of sterile hills; till at length, at the close of
the third day, after having gradually descended
for several miles, the hills on one side receded,
and left a little interval of meadow, through
which they wound into the lower valley of the
Housatonick.
This continued and difficult march had been
sustained by Everell with a spirit and fortitude
that evidently won the favour of the savages, who
always render homage to superiority over physical
evil. There was something more than this
common feeling, in the joy with which Mononotto
noted the boy's silent endurance, and even
contempt
of pain. One noble victim seemed to him
better than a human hecatomb. In
proportion
to his exultation in possessing an object
worthy to avenge his son, was his fear that his
victim would escape from him. During the march,
Everell had twice, aided by Magawisca, nearly
achieved his liberty. These detected
conspiracies
,
though defeated, rendered the chief
impatient
to execute his vengeance; and he secretly
resolved that it should not be delayed longer than
the morrow.
As the fugitives emerged from the narrow
defile
,
a new scene opened upon them; a scene of
valley and hill, river and meadow, surrounded by
mountains, whose encircling embrace, expressed
protection and love to the gentle spirits of the
valley. A light summer shower had just fallen,
and the clouds, in thousand liveries dight, had
risen from the western horizon, and hung their rich
draperies about the clear sun. The horizontal
rays passed over the valley, and flushed the upper
branches of the trees, the summits of the hills,
and the mountains, with a flood of light, whilst
the low grounds reposing in deep shadow,
presented
one of those striking and accidental
contrasts
in nature, that a painter would have
selected
to give effect to his art.
The gentle Housatonick wound through the
depths of the valley, in some parts contracted to
a narrow channel, and murmuring over the rocks
that rippled its surface; and in others, spreading
wide its clear mirror, and lingering like a lover
amidst the vines, trees, and flowers, that fringed
its banks. Thus it flows nowbut not as then
in the sylvan freedom of nature, when no
clattering
mills and bustling factories, threw their
prosaic
shadows over the silver waterswhen not
even a bridge spanned their bosomwhen not a
trace of man's art was seen save the little
bark canoe that glided over them, or lay idly
moored along the shore. The savage was rather
the vassal, than the master of nature; obeying her
laws, but never usurping her dominion. He only
used the land she prepared, and cast in his corn
but where she seemed to invite him by
mellowing
and upheaving the rich mould. He did not
presume to hew down her trees, the proud crest of
her uplands, and convert them into russet lawns
and fallows grey. The axman's stroke, that
music to the
settler's
ear, never then violated the
peace of nature, or made discord in her music.
Imagination may be indulged in lingering for
a moment in those dusky regions of the past; but
it is not permitted to reasonable instructed man,
to admire or regret tribes of human beings, who
lived and died, leaving scarcely a more enduring
memorial, than the forsaken nest that vanishes
before one winter's storms.
But to return to our wanderers. They had
entered the expanded vale, by following the
windings
of the Housatonick around a hill, conical
and easy of ascent, excepting on that side which
overlooked the river, where, half-way from the
base to the summit, rose a perpendicular rock,
bearing on its beetling front the age of centuries.
On every other side, the hill was garlanded with
laurels, now in full and profuse bloom; here and
there surmounted by an intervening pine, spruce,
or hemlock, whose seared winter foliage was
fringed with the bright tender sprouts of spring.
We believe there is a chord, even in the heart of
savage man, that responds to the voice of nature.
Certain it is, the party paused, as it appeared
from a common instinct, at a little grassy nook,
formed by the curve of the hill, to gaze on this
singularly beautiful spot. Everell looked on the
smoke that curled from the huts of the village,
embosomed in pine trees, on the adjacent plain.
The scene, to him, breathed peace and happiness,
and gushing thoughts of home filled his eyes with
tears. Oneco plucked clusters of laurels, and
decked his little favourite, and the old chief fixed
his melancholy eye on a solitary pine, scathed
and blasted by tempests, that rooted in the ground
where he stood, lifted its topmost branches to
the bare rock, where they seemed, in their wild
desolation, to brave the elemental fury that had
stripped them of beauty and life.
The leafless tree was truly, as it appeared to the
eye of Mononotto, a fit emblem of the chieftain of a
ruined tribe. See you, child, he said,
addressing
Magawisca, those unearthed roots? the tree
must fallhear you the death-song that wails
through those blasted branches?
Nay, father, listen not to the sad strain; it is
but the spirit of the tree mourning over its decay;
rather turn thine ear to the glad song of this
bright stream, image of the good. She nourishes
the aged trees, and cherishes the tender flowrets,
and her song is ever of happiness, till she reaches
the great seaimage of our eternity.
Speak not to me of happiness, Magawisca;
it has vanished with the smoke of our homes.
I tell ye, the spirits of our race are gathered
about this blasted tree. Samoset points to that rock
that sacrifice-rock. His keen glance turned
from the rock to Everell.
Magawisca understood its portentous meaning,
and she clasped her hands in mute and agonizing
supplication. He answered to the silent entreaty.
It is in vainmy purpose is fixed, and here it
shall be accomplished. Why hast thou linked
thy heart, foolish girl, to this English boy? I
have sworn, kneeling on the ashes of our hut, that
I would never spare a son of our enemy's race.
The lights of heaven witnessed my vow, and think
you, that now this boy is given into my hands to
avenge thy brother, I will spare him for thy
prayer
?
Nothough thou lookest on me with thy
mother's eye, and speakest with her voice, I will
not break my vow.
Mononotto had indeed taken a final and fatal
resolution; and prompted, as he fancied, by
super-natural
intimations, and, perhaps, dreading the
relentings of his own heart, he determined on its
immediate execution. He announced his decision
to the Mohawks. A brief and animated
consultation
followed, during which they brandished
their tomahawks, and cast wild and threatening
glances at Everell, who at once comprehended
the meaning of these menacing looks and
gestures
.
He turned an appealing glance to
Magawisca
.
She did not speak. Am I to die now?
he asked; she turned shuddering from him.
Everell had expected death from his savage
captors
,
but while it was comparatively distant, he
thought he was indifferent to it, or rather, he
believed
he should welcome it as a release from the
horrible recollection of the massacre at Bethel,
which haunted him day and night. But now that
his fate seemed inevitable, nature was appalled,
and shrunk from it; and the impassive spirit, for a
moment, endured a pang that there cannot be in
any corp'ral sufferance. The avenues of sense
were closed, and past and future were present to
the mind, as if it were already invested with the
attributes of its eternity. From this agonizing
excitement, Everell was roused by a command
from the savages to move onward. It is then
deferred, thought Magawisca, and heaving a
deep sigh, as if for a moment relieved from a
pressure on her over-burthened heart, she looked
to her father for an explanation; he said nothing,
but proceeded in silence towards the village.
The lower valley of the Housatonick, at the
period to which our history refers, was inhabited
by a peaceful, and, as far as that epithet could
ever be applied to our savages, an agricultural tribe,
whose territory, situate midway between the
Hudson and the Connecticut, was bounded and
defended on each side by mountains, then deemed
impracticable to a foe. These inland people had
heard from the hunters of distant tribes, who
occasionally
visited them, of the aggressions and
hostility of the English strangers, but regarding it
as no concern of theirs, they listened, much as we
listen to news of the Burmese warCaptain
Symmes' theoryor lectures on phrenology.
One of their hunters, it is true, had penetrated to
Springfield, and another had passed over the hills
to the Dutch fort at Albany, and returned with
the report that the strangers' skin was the colour
of cowardicethat they served their women, and
spoke an unintelligible language. There was
little
in this account to interest those who were so
ignorant as to be scarcely susceptible of curiosity,
and they hardly thought of the dangerous
strangers
at all, or only thought of them as a people
from whom they had nothing to hope or fear, when
the appearance of the ruined Pequod chief, with
his English captives, roused them from their
apathy.
The village was on a level, sandy plain,
extending
for about half a mile, and raised by a
natural and almost perpendicular bank fifty feet
above the level of the meadows. At one extremity
of the plain, was the hill we have described; the
other was terminated by a broad green,
appropriated
to sports and councils.
The huts of the savages were irregularly
scattered
over the plainsome on cleared ground,
and others just peeping out of copses of pine
treessome on the very verge of the plain,
overlooking
the meadowsand others under the
shelter
of a high hill that formed the northern
boundary
of the valley, and seemed stationed there to
defend the inhabitants from their natural enemies
cold, and wind.
The huts were the simplest structures of
human
art; but, as in no natural condition of
society
a perfect equality obtains, some were more
spacious and commodious than others. All were
made with flexible poles, firmly set in the ground,
Vol. I. 13
and drawn and attached together at the top.
Those of the more indolent, or least skilful, were
filled in with branches of trees and hung over
with coarse mats; while those of the better
order were neatly covered with bark, prepared
with art, and considerable labour for the purpose.
Little garden patches adjoined a few of the
dwellings
,
and were planted with beans, pumpkins, and
squashes; the seeds of these vegetables,
according
to an Indian tradition, (in which we may
perceive
the usual admixture of fable and truth,)
having been sent to them, in the bill of a bird,
from the south-west, by the Great Spirit.
The Pequod chief and his retinue passed, just
at twilight, over the plain, by one of the many
foot-paths that indented it. Many of the
women
were still at work with their
stone-pointed
hoes, in their gardens. Some of the men
and children were at their sports on the green.
Here a straggler was coming from the river with
a string of fine trout; another fortunate
sportsman
appeared from the hill-side with wild turkeys
and partridges; while two emerged from the
forest
with still more noble game, a fat antlered
buck.
This village, as we have described it, and
perhaps
from the affection its natural beauty inspired,
remained the residence of the savages long after
they had vanished from the surrounding country.
Within the memory of the present generation the
remnant of the tribe migrated to the west; and
even now some of their families make a summer
pilgrimage to this, their Jerusalem, and are
regarded
with a melancholy interest by the present
occupants of the soil.
Mononotto directed his steps to the wigwam of
the Housatonick chief, which stood on one side of
the green. The chief advanced from his hut to
receive him, and by the most animated gestures
expressed to Mononotto his pleasure in the
success
of his incursion, from which it seemed that
Mononotto had communicated with him on his
way to the Connecticut.
A brief and secret consultation succeeded,
which appeared to consist of propositions from
the Pequod, and assent on the part of the
Housatonick
chief, and was immediately followed by
a motion to separate the travellers. Mononotto
and Everell were to remain with the chief, and
the rest of the party to be conducted to the hut of
his sister.
Magawisca's prophetic spirit too truly
interpreted
this arrangement; and thinking or hoping
there might be some saving power in her
presence
,
since her father tacitly acknowledged it by
the pains he took to remove her, she refused to
leave him. He insisted vehemently; but finding
her unyielding, he commanded the Mohawks to
force her away.
Resistance was vain, but resistance she would
still have made, but for the interposition of
Everell
.
Go with them, Magawisca, he said,
and leave me to my fate.We shall meet
again.
Never! she shrieked; your fate is death.
And after death we shall meet again, replied
Everell, with a calmness that evinced his mind
was already in a great degree resigned to the
event that now appeared inevitable. Do not
fear for me, Magawisca. Better thoughts have
put down my fears. When it is over, think of
me.
And what am I to do with this scorching fire
till then? she asked, pressing both her hands
on her head. Oh, my father, has your heart
become
stone?
Her father turned from her appeal, and
motioned
to Everell to enter the hut. Everell
obeyed
;
and when the mat dropped over the entrance
and separated him from the generous creature,
whose heart had kept true time with his through
all his griefs, who he knew would have redeemed
his life with her own, he yielded to a burst of
natural and not unmanly tears.
If this could be deemed a weakness, it was his
last. Alone with his God, he realized the
sufficiency
of His presence and favour. He
appealed
to that mercy which is never refused, nor
given in stinted measure to the humble suppliant.
Every expression of pious confidence and
resignation
,
which he had heard with the heedless ear
of childhood, now flashed like an illumination
upon his mind.
His mother's counsels and instructions, to which
he had often lent a wearied attentionthe
passages
from the sacred book he had been
compelled
to commit to memory, when his truant
thoughts were ranging forest and field, now
returned
upon him as if a celestial spirit breathed
them into his soul. Stillness and peace stole
over him. He was amazed at his own
tranquillity
.
`It may be,' he thought, `that my mother
and sisters are permitted to minister to me.'
He might have been agitated by the admission
of the least ray of hope; but hope was utterly
excluded, and it was only when he thought of his
bereft father, that his courage failed him.
But we must leave him to his solitude and
silence
,
only interrupted by the distant hootings of
the owl, and the heavy tread of the Pequod chief,
who spent the night in slowly pacing before the
door of the hut.
Magawisca and her companions were
conducted
to a wigwam standing on that part of the plain
on which they had first entered. It was
completely
enclosed on three sides by dwarf oaks.
In front there was a little plantation of the
edible
luxuries of the savages. On entering the hut,
they perceived it had but one occupant, a sick
emaciated old woman, who was stretched on her
mat covered with skins. She raised her head, as
the strangers entered, and at the sight of Faith
Leslie, uttered a faint exclamation, deeming the
fair creature a messenger from the spirit-land
but being informed who they were and whence
13*
they came, she made every sign and expression
of courtesy to them, that her feeble strength
permitted
.
Her hut contained all that was essential to
savage
hospitality. A few brands were burning on
a hearth-stone in the middle of the apartment.
The smoke that found egress, passed out by a
hole in the centre of the roof, over which a mat
was skilfully adjusted, and turned to the
windward-side
by a cord that hung within. The old
woman, in her long pilgrimage, had accumulated
stores of Indian riches; piles of sleeping-mats
laid in one corner; nicely dressed skins garnished
the walls; baskets, of all shapes and sizes, gaily
decorated with rude images of birds and flowers,
contained dried fruits, medicinal herbs, Indian
corn, nuts, and game. A covered pail, made of
folds of birch-bark, was filled with a kind of beer
a decoction of various roots and aromatic shrubs.
Neatly turned wooden spoons and bowls, and
culinary
utensils of clay supplied all the demands of
the inartificial housewifery of savage life.
The travellers, directed by their old hostess,
prepared their evening repast, a short and simple
process to an Indian; and having satisfied the
cravings of hunger, they were all, with the
exception
of Magawisca and one of the Mohawks, in a
very short time, stretched on their mats and fast
asleep.
Magawisca seated herself at the feet of the
old woman, and had neither spoken nor
moved
since she entered the hut. She watched
anxiously and impatiently the movements of the
Indian, whose appointed duty it appeared to be,
to guard her. He placed a wooden bench
against the mat which served for a door, and
stuffing
his pipe with tobacco from the pouch slung
over his shoulder, and then filling a gourd with
the liquor in the pail and placing it beside him,
he quietly sat himself down to his night-watch.
The old woman became restless, and her loud
and repeated groans, at last, withdrew
Magawisca
from her own miserable thoughts. She
inquired
if she could do aught to allay her pain; the
sufferer pointed to a jar that stood on the embers
in which a medicinal preparation was simmering.
She motioned to Magawisca to give her a
spoonful
of the liquor; she did so, and as she took it,
it is made, she said, of all the plants on which
the spirit of sleep has breathed, and so it
seemed
to be; for she had scarcely swallowed it, when
she fell asleep.
Once or twice she waked and murmured
something
,
and once Magawisca heard her say, Hark
to the wekolis!
2
2.
Whip-poor-will.
he is perched on the old oak, by
the sacrifice-rock, and his cry is neither musical,
nor merrya bad sign in a bird.
But all signs and portents were alike to
Magawisca
every
sound rung a death-peal to her ear,
and the hissing silence had in it the mystery and
fearfulness of death. The night wore slowly and
painfully away, as if, as in the fairy tale, the
moments were counted by drops of heart's-blood.
But the most wearisome nights will end; the
morning approached; the familiar notes of the
birds of earliest dawn were heard, and the
twilight
peeped through the crevices of the hut, when
a new sound fell on Magawisca's startled ear.
It was the slow measured tread of many feet.
The poor girl now broke silence, and vehemently
entreated the Mohawk to let her pass the door, or
at least to raise the mat.
He shook his head with a look of unconcern,
as if it were the petulant demand of a child, when
the old woman, awakened by the noise, cried out
that she was dyingthat she must have light and
air, and the Mohawk started up, impulsively,
to raise the mat. It was held between two
poles that formed the door-posts, and while he
was disengaging it, Magawisca, as if inspired, and
quick as thought, poured the liquor from the jar on
the fire into the hollow of her hand, and dashed
it into the gourd which the Mohawk had just
replenished
.
The narcotic was boiling hot, but she
did not cringe; she did not even feel it; and she
could scarcely repress a cry of joy, when the
savage
turned round and swallowed, at one draught,
the contents of the cup.
Magawisca looked eagerly through the
aperture
,
but though the sound of the footsteps had
approached nearer, she saw no one. She saw
nothing
but a gentle declivity that sloped to the
plain, a few yards from the hut, and was covered
with a grove of trees; beyond and peering above
them, was the hill, and the sacrifice-rock; the
morning star, its rays not yet dimmed in the
light of day, shed a soft trembling beam on
its summit. This beautiful star, alone in the
heavens, when all other lights were quenched,
spoke to the superstitious, or, rather, the
imaginative
spirit of Magawisca. `Star of promise,' she
thought, `thou dost still linger with us when day
is vanished, and now thou art there, alone, to
proclaim the coming sun; thou dost send in upon
my soul a ray of hope; and though it be but as
the spider's slender pathway, it shall sustain my
courage.' She had scarcely formed this resolution,
when she needed all its efficacy, for the train,
whose footsteps she had heard, appeared in full
view.
First came her father, with the Housatonick
chief; next, alone, and walking with a firm
undaunted
step, was Everell; his arms folded over
his breast, and his head a little inclined upward, so
that Magawisca fancied she saw his full eye
turned
heavenward; after him walked all the men of
the tribe, ranged according to their age, and the
rank assigned to each by his own exploits.
They were neither painted nor ornamented
according
to the common usage at festivals and
sacrifices, but every thing had the air of hasty
preparation. Magawisca gazed in speechless
despair
.
The procession entered the wood, and for
a few moments, disappeared from her sight
again they were visible, mounting the acclivity of
the hill, by a winding narrow foot-path, shaded
on either side by laurels. They now walked
singly
and slowly, but to Magawisca, their progress
seemed rapid as a falling avalanche. She felt
that, if she were to remain pent in that
prisonhouse
,
her heart would burst, and she sprang
towards
the door-way in the hope of clearing her
passage, but the Mohawk caught her arm in his
iron grasp, and putting her back, calmly retained
his station. She threw herself on her knees
to himshe entreatedshe weptbut in vain:
he looked on her with unmoved apathy.
Already
she saw the foremost of the party had
reached the rock, and were forming a semicircle
around itagain she appealed to her determined
keeper, and again he denied her petition, but with
a faltering tongue, and a drooping eye.
Magawisca, in the urgency of a necessity that
could brook no delay, had forgotten, or regarded
as useless, the sleeping potion she had infused into
the Mohawk's draught; she now saw the
powerful
agent was at work for her, and with that
quickness
of apprehension that made the operations of
her mind as rapid as the impulses of instinct, she
perceived that every emotion she excited but
hindered
the effect of the potion, suddenly seeming
to relinquish all purpose and hope of escape, she
threw herself on a mat, and hid her face, burning
with agonizing impatience, in her mantle. There
we must leave her, and join that fearful company
who were gathered together to witness what they
believed to be the execution of exact and
necessary
justice.
Seated around their sacrifice-rocktheir holy
of holiesthey listened to the sad story of the
Pequod chief, with dejected countenances and
downcast eyes, save when an involuntary glance
turned on Everell, who stood awaiting his fate,
cruelly aggravated by every moment's delay, with
a quiet dignity and calm resignation, that would
have become a hero, or a saint. Surrounded by
this dark cloud of savages, his fair countenance
kindled by holy inspiration, he looked scarcely
like a creature of earth.
There might have been among the spectators,
some who felt the silent appeal of the helpless
courageous boy; some whose hearts moved them
to interpose to save the selected victim; but they
were restrained by their interpretation of natural
justice, as controlling to them as our artificial
codes of laws to us.
Others of a more cruel, or more irritable
disposition
,
when the Pequod described his wrongs,
and depicted his sufferings, brandished their
tomahawks, and would have hurled them at the
boy, but the chief saidNay, brothersthe
work is minehe dies by my handfor my
first-born
life
for lifehe dies by a single stroke, for
thus was my boy cut off. The blood of sachems
is in his veins. He has the skin, but not the soul
of that mixed race, whose gratitude is like that
vanishing mist, and he pointed to the vapour
that was melting from the mountain tops into the
transparent ether; and their promises are like
this, and he snapped a dead branch from the pine
beside which he stood, and broke it in fragments
Boy, as he is, he fought for his mother, as the
eagle fights for its young. I watched him in the
mountain-path, when the blood gushed from his
torn feet; not a word from his smooth lip,
betrayed
his pain.
Mononotto embellished his victim with praises,
as the ancients wreathed theirs with flowers.
He brandished his hatchet over Everell's head,
and cried, exultingly, See, he flinches not. Thus
stood my boy, when they flashed their sabres
before his eyes, and bade him betray his father.
BrothersMy people have told me I bore a
woman's
heart towards the enemy. Ye shall see.
I will pour out this English boy's blood to the last
drop, and give his flesh and bones to the dogs and
wolves.
He then motioned to Everell to prostrate
himself
on the rock, his face downward. In this
position the boy would not see the descending
stroke. Even at this moment of dire vengeance,
the instincts of a merciful nature asserted their
rights.
Everell sunk calmly on his knees, not to
supplicate
life, but to commend his soul to God.
He clasped his hands together. He did nothe
could not speak; his soul was
Rapt in still communion that transcends
The imperfect offices of prayer.
At this moment a sun-beam penetrated the
trees that enclosed the area, and fell athwart
his brow and hair, kindling it with an almost
supernatural brightness. To the savages, this
was a token that the victim was accepted, and
they sent forth a shout that rent the air. Everell
bent forward, and pressed his forehead to the
rock. The chief raised the deadly weapon, when
Magawisca, springing from the precipitous side
of the rock, screamedForbear! and
interposed
her arm. It was too late. The blow was
levelledforce and direction giventhe stroke
aimed at Everell's neck, severed his defender's
arm, and left him unharmed. The lopped
quivering
member dropped over the precipice.
Mononotto
staggered and fell senseless, and all the
savages, uttering horrible yells, rushed toward the
fatal spot.
Stand back! cried Magawisca. I have
bought his life with my own. Fly, Everellnay,
speak not, but flythitherto the east! she
cried, more vehemently.
Everell's faculties were paralyzed by a rapid
succession of violent emotions. He was
conscious
only of a feeling of mingled gratitude and
admiration for his preserver. He stood
motionless
,
gazing on her. I die in vain then, she
Vol. I. 14
cried, in an accent of such despair, that he was
roused. He threw his arms around her, and
pressed
her to his heart, as he would a sister that had
redeemed his life with her own, and then tearing
himself from her, he disappeared. No one offered
to follow him. The voice of nature rose from
every heart, and responding to the justice of
Magawisca's
claim, bade him God speed! To
all it seemed that his deliverance had been
achieved by miraculous aid. Allthe dullest
and coldest, paid involuntary homage to the heroic
girl, as if she were a superior being, guided and
upheld by supernatural power.
Every thing short of miracle she had achieved.
The moment the opiate dulled the senses of
her keeper, she escaped from the hut; and
aware that, if she attempted to penetrate to her
father through the semicircular line of spectators
that enclosed him, she should be repulsed, and
probably borne off the ground, she had taken the
desperate resolution of mounting the rock, where
only her approach would be unperceived. She
did not stop to ask herself if it were
possible
,
but impelled by a determined spirit, or rather,
we would believe, by that inspiration that teaches
the bird its unknown path, and leads the goat,
with its young, safely over the mountain crags,
she ascended the rock. There were crevices in
it, but they seemed scarcely sufficient to support
the eagle with his grappling talon, and twigs
issuing
from the fissures, but so slender, that they
waved like a blade of grass under the weight of
the young birds that made a rest on them, and
yet, such is the power of love, stronger than
death, that with these inadequate helps,
Magawisca
scaled the rock, and achieved her generous
purpose.
CHAPTER VIII.
Pawwowa priest. These do begin and order their
service and invocation of their gods, and all the people
follow
,
and join interchangeably in a laborious bodily service
unto sweating, especially of the priest, who spends himself in
strange antick gestures and actions, even unto fainting.
Being
once in their houses and beholding what their worship
was, I never durst be an eye-witness, spectator, or looker-on,
lest I should have been a partaker of Satan's inventions and
worships.
Roger Williams
.
The
following letter, written by Hope Leslie,
and addressed to Everell Fletcher, then residing
in England, will show, briefly, the state of affairs
at Bethel, seven years subsequent to the date of
the events already detailed. Little had occurred,
save the changes of the seasons, in nature and
human
life, to mark the progress of time.
Dear Everell,
This is the fifth anniversary of the day you
left usyour birth-day, too, you know; so we
celebrate
it, but with a blended joy and grief, which,
as my dear guardian says, is suitable to the mixed
condition of human life.
I surprised him, this morning, with a painting,
on which I had expended much time and laid out
all my poor skill. The scene is a forest gladea
boy is sleeping under a birch tree, near a thicket
of hazle bushes, and from their deepest shadow
peeps a gaunt wolf in the act of springing on
him, while just emerging from the depths of the
wood, in the back ground, appears a man with a
musket levelled at the animal. I had placed the
painting on the mantel-piece, and it caught your
father's eye as he entered to attend our morning
exercise. He said nothing, for, you know, the
order
of our devotions is as strictly observed as
were the services of the ancient temple. So we
all took our accustomed placesI mine on the
cushion beside your father; yours still stands on
the other side of him, like the vacant seat of
Banquo
.
Love can paint as well as fear; and though
no form, palpable to common eyes, is seated there,
yet, to our second sight, imagination produces
from her shadowy regions the form of our dear
Everell.
I believe the picture had touched the hidden
springs of memory, for your father, though he was
reading the chapter of Exodus that speaks of the
wise-hearted men who wrought for the sanctuary,
(a portion of scripture not particularly moving,)
repeatedly wiped the gathering tears from his eyes.
Jennet is never lagging in the demonstration of
religious emotion, and I inferred, from her
responsive
hems! and hahs! that, as there was no obvious
cause for tears, she fancied affecting types were
lurking in the `loops and selvedges, and tenons
14*
and sockets, and fine twined linen,' about which
your father was reading. But when he came, in
his prayer, to his customary mention of his absent
childwhen he touched upon the time when his
habitation was made desolateand then upon
the deliverance of his son, his only son, from the
savage foe, and the ravening beasthis voice
falteredevery heart responded; Digby sobbed
aloudand even aunt Grafton, whose
aversion
to standing at her devotions has not
diminished
with her increasing years, stood a
monument
of patience till the clock twice told the
hour; though it was but the other day when she
thought your father was drawing to a close, and
he started a new topic, that she broke out, after
her way of thinking aloud, well, if he is going
on t'other tack, I'll sit down.
When the exercise was finished, Digby gave
vent to his pleasure. `There, Jennet,' he said,
rubbing his hands exultingly, `you are always on
the look-out for witchcraft. I wonder what you
call that? It is a perfect picture of the place
where I found Mr. Everell, as that fellow there, in
the frieze jacket is of me; and any body would
know that, though they would not expect to see
John Digby painted in a picture. To be sure, Mr.
Everell does not look quite so pale and famished
as he did when I first saw him sleeping under that
birch tree: as I live, she has put his name there,
just as he had carved it. Well, it will be a
kind of a history for Mr. Everell's children, when
we, and the forest too, are laid low.'
Your father permitted the honest fellow's
volubility
to flow unrepressed; he himself only said,
as he drew me to him and kissed me, `you have
kept a faithful copy of our dear Everell in your
memory.'
My honest tutor Cradock and aunt Grafton
contended for the honour of my excellence in the
artpoor Cradock, my Apollo! He maintained
that he had taught me the theory, while aunt
Grafton boasted her knowledge of the practice:
but, alas! the little honour my success reflected
on them, was not worth their contest; and I did
them no injustice in secretly ascribing all my skill
to the source whence the Corinthian maid
derived
her power to trace, by the secret lamp, the
shade of her lover. Affection for my dear
Everell
and for his father is my inspiration; but, I
confess, it might never have appeared in the
mimicry
,
of even this rude painting, if aunt Grafton
had not taken lessons at the Convent of the
Chartreux
at Paris, and had daily access, as you know
she has a thousand times repeated to us, to the
paintings of Rossi and Albati in the palace of
Fontainbleau.
But into what egotism does this epistolary
journalizing betray me? The day is yours,
Everell
,
and I will not speak again of myself.
Aunt Grafton, meaning to do it what honour
she could, had our dinner-table set out with
massive
silver dishes, engraved with her family's
armorial
bearings. They have never before seen
the light in America. Your father smiled at their
contrast with our bare walls, pine tables, chairs,
&c.and said, `we looked like Attila, in his rude
hut, surrounded with the spoils of Rome;' and
aunt Grafton, who has a decided taste for all the
testimonials of her family grandeur, entered into
a warm discussion with Master Cradock as to how
far the new man might lawfully indulge in a vain
show. By the way, their skirmishing on the
debateable
grounds of church and state, have of
late almost ceased. When I remarked this to
your father, he said, he believed I had brought
about the present amicable state of affairs by
affording
them a kind of neutral ground, where
their common affections and interests met.
Whatever
has produced this result, it is too happy not
to be carefully cherished, so I have taken care
that my poor tutor, who never would
intentionally
provoke a human being, should avoid, as far as
possible, all those peculiarities, which, as some
colours offend certain animals, were sure, every
day, and thrice a day, to call forth aunt Grafton's
animadversions. I have, too, entered into a secret
confederacy with Digbythe effect of which is,
that Master Cradock's little brown wig is brushed
every morning, and is, at least once each day,
straight on his head. The brush has invaded too,
the hitherto unexplored regions of his broadcloth,
and his black stock gives place, on every Lord's
day at least, to a white collar. Aunt Grafton
herself
has more than once remarked, that `for one of
these scholar-folks, he goes quite decent.' As to
aunt Grafton, I am afraid that if you were here,
though we may both have gained with our years a
little discretionyet I am afraid we should laugh,
as we were wont to do, at her innocent
peculiarities
.
She spends many a weary hour in devising
new head-gear, and both daily, as Jennet says,
break the law against costly apparel. Jennet is
the same untired and tiresome railer. If there
are anodynes for the tongue in England, pray send
some for her.
We are going, to-morrow, on an excursion to
a new settlement on the river, called Northampton.
Your father feared the toils and perils of the way
for me, and has consented, reluctantly, to my being
of the party. Aunt Grafton remonstrated, and
expressed her natural and kind apprehensions, by
alleging that it was `very unladylike, and a thing
quite unheard of in England,' for a young person,
like me, to go out exploring a new country. I
urged, that our new country developes faculties
that young ladies, in England, were unconscious
of possessing. She maintained, as usual, that
whatever was not practised and known in
England
,
was not worth possessing; but finally she
concluded her opposition with her old customary
phrase, `Well, it's peculiar of you, Miss Hope,'
which, you know, she always uses to characterize
whatever opposes her opinions or inclinations.
My good tutor, who would fain be my
gisbearer
,
insists on attending me. You may laugh at
him, Everell, and call him my knight-errant, or
squire, or what you will; but I assure you, he is a
right godly and suitable appendage to a pilgrim
damsel. I will finish my letter when I return; a
journey of twenty miles has put my thoughts,
(which, you know, are ever ready to take wing,) to
flight.
25th October, Thursday,or, as the
injunction
has come from Boston that we be more
particular
in avoiding these heathen designations,
10th month, 5th day.
Dear Everell,We followed the Indian
footpath
that winds along the margin of the river,
and reached Northampton without any accident.
There is but a narrow opening there, scooped out
of the forest, and Mr. Holioke, wishing to have an
extensive view of the country, engaged an Indian
guide to conduct your father and himself to the
summit of a mountain, which rises precipitously
from the meadows, and overlooks an ocean of
forest.
I had gazed on the beautiful summits of this
mountain, that, in this transparent October
atmosphere
,
were as blue and bright as the heavens
themselves, till I had an irrepressible desire to go
to them; and, like the child who cried for the
horns of the silver moon, I should have cried too,
if my wishes had been unattainable.
Your father acquiescd (as my conscience tells
me, Everell, he does too easily) in my wishes, and
nobody objected but my tutor, who evidently
thought it would be unmanly for him to shrink
from toils that I braved, and who looked forward
with dread and dismay to the painful ascent.
However, we all reached the summit, without
scath to life or limb, and then we looked down
upon a scene that made me clap my hands, and
my pious companions raise their eyes in silent
devotion
.
I hope you have not forgotten the
autumnal
brilliancy of our woods. They say the
foliage
in England has a paler sickly hue, but for our
western worldnature's youngest childshe has
reserved her many-coloured robe, the brightest
and most beautiful of her garments. Last
week the woods were as green as an emerald,
and now they look as if all the summer-spirits
had been wreathing them with flowers of the
richest and most brilliant dyes.
Philosophers may inquire into the process of
nature, and find out, if they can, how such sudden
changes are produced, though, after all, I fancy
their inquiries will turn out like the experiment of
the inquisitive boy, who cut open the drum to find
the sound; but I love to lend my imagination to
poets' dreams, and to fancy nature has her
myriads
of little spirits, who
do wander every where,
Swifter than the moone's sphere.
He must have a torpid imagination, and a cold
heart, I think, who does not fancy these vast
forests
filled with invisible intelligences. Have these
beautiful vallies of our Connecticut, which we saw
from the mountain, looking like a smile on
nature's
rugged face, and stretching as far as our
vision extended, till the broad river diminished in
the shadowy distance, to a silver thread; have
they been seen and enjoyed only by those savages,
who have their summer home in them? While
I was pondering on this thought, Mr. Holioke,
who seldom indulges in a fanciful suggestion, said
to your father, `The Romans, you know, brother
Fletcher, had their Cenotapha, empty sepulchres,
in honour of those who died in their country's
cause, and mouldered on a distant soil. Why
may we not have ours? and surmise that the
spirits
of those who have died for liberty and
religion
,
have come before us to this wilderness, and
taken possession in the name of the Lord?'
We lingered for an hour or two on the
mountain
.
Mr. Holioke and your father were noting
the sites for future villages, already marked out
for them by clusters of Indian huts. The instinct
of the children of the forest guides them to these
rich intervals, which the sun and the river prepare
and almost till for them. While the gentlemen
were thus engaged, I observed that the highest
rock of the mountain was crowned with a
pyramidal
pile of stones, and about them were strewn
relicts of Indian sacrifices. It has, I believe, been
the custom of people, in all ages, who were
instructed
only by nature, to worship on high
places
.
3
3.
About the cliffs
Lay garlands, ears of maize, and skins of wolf,
And shaggy bear, the offerings of the tribe
Here made, to the Great Spirit; for they deemed,
Like worshippers of the olden time, that God
Doth walk on the high places and affect
The eartho'erlooking mountains.
Bryant
.
I pointed to the rude altar, and ventured
to ask Mr. Holioke if an acceptable service might
not have been offered there?
He shook his head at me, as if I were little
better than a heathen, and said, `it was all
worship
to an unknown God.'
`But,' said your father, `the time is
approaching
,
when through the vallies beneath, and on this
mount, incense shall rise from christian hearts.'
`It were well,' replied Mr. Holioke, `if we
now, in the spirit, consecrated it to the Lord.'
`And let me stand sponsor for it,' said I,
`while you christen it Holioke.'
I was gently rebuked for my levity, but my
hint was not unkindly taken; for the good man
has never since spoken of his name-sake, without
calling it `
Mount Holioke
.'
Vol. I. 15
My senses were enchanted on that high place.
I listened to the mighty sound that rose from the
forest depths of the abyss, like the roar of the
distant ocean, and to the gentler voices of nature,
borne on the invisible waves of airthe
farewell
notes of the few birds that still linger with us
the rustling of the leaves beneath the squirrel's
joyous leapthe whizzing of the partridge startled
from his perch; the tinkling of the cow-bell, and the
barking of the Indian's dog. I was lying with my
ear over the rock, when your father reminded me
that it was time to return, and bade Digby, who
had attended us, `look well to Miss Leslie's
descent, and lend a helping hand to Master
Cradock.'
My poor tutor's saffron skin changed to brick
colour; and that he might not think I heard the
imputation cast upon his serviceable powers, I
stepped between him and Digby, and said, `that
with such wings on each side of me, I might fly
down the mountain.'
`Ah, Miss Hope Leslie,' said Cradock,
restored
to his self-complacency, `you are a merry
thought atween us.' He would fain have
appeared
young and agile; not from vanity, Everell,
but to persuade me to accept his proffered
assistance
.
Poor old man! he put me in mind, as he
went after Digby, panting and leaping (or rather
settling) from crag to crag, of an ancient horse,
that almost cracks his bones to keep pace with a
colt. His involuntary groans betrayed the pain
of his stiffened muscles, and I lingered on every
projecting cliff, on the pretence of taking a
farewell
look of the vallies, but really to allow him
time to recover breath.
In the mean time the gentlemen had got
far in advance of us. We came to the last rock of
difficult passage; Digby gave me his hand to
assist
me in springing from it, and asked Cradock
to ascertain if the foot-hold below was sure; a
necessary precaution, as the matted leaves had
sometimes proved treacherous. Cradock in
performing
this office, startled a rattle-snake, that lay
concealed under a mass of leaves and moss; the
reptile coiled himself up, and darted his fangs
into his hand. I heard the rattle of victory, and
saw the poor man's deathly paleness, as he sunk
to the ground, exclaiming, `I am but a dead
sinner
!'
Digby turned to pursue the snake, and I
sprang from the rock. I begged Cradock to
show me the wound; it was on the back of his
hand. I assured him I could easily extract the
venom, and would have applied my lips to the
wound, but he withdrew his hand. Digby at
that moment returned. `She would suck the
poison from my hand, Digby,' said Cradock;
`verily, she is but little lower than the angels.'
`What! Miss Hope!' exclaimed Digby,
`would you be guilty of self-murder, even if you
could save the old gentleman from dyingand
dying, as it were, by the will of the Lord?' I
assured
Digby that there was no danger whatever
to me; that I had read of many cases of poison
being extracted in that way, without the slightest
injury to the person extracting it. He asked me
where I had read such stories. I was obliged to
refer to a book of aunt Grafton's, called `The
Wonders of the Crusades.' This seemed to Digby
but apocryphal authority; he shook his head, and
said, `he would believe such fables no where out
of the Bible. 'I entreated, vehemently, for I well
knew it could not harm me, and I believed it to
be life or death to my poor tutor. He seemed
half disposed to yield to me. `Thou hast a
marvellous
persuasion, child,' he said; `and now I
remember me of a proverb they have in Italythe
lips extract venom from the heart, and poison
from the wound.'
Digby again shook his head. `Nothing but
one of those flourishes they put into verses,' he
said. `Come, come, Master Cradock, stir up a
manly spirit, and let's on to the fort, where we
may get help it's lawful for you to use; and don't
ransack your memory for any more such
scholar-rubbish
to uphold you in consenting to our young
lady's exposing her life, to save the fag end of
yours.'
`Expose her life!' retorted Cradock, rising
with a feeling of honest indignation, that for a
moment overcame the terror of death. `Digby,
you know that if I had a hundred lives, I would
rather lose them all, than expose her precious
life.'
`I believe you, Master CradockI believe
you; and whether you live, or die, I will always
uphold you for a true-hearted man; and you must
excuse me for my boldness in speaking, when I
thought our young Mistress was putting herself
in the jaws of death.'
We now made all speed to reach the fort;
but when we arrived there, no aid could be
obtained
,
and poor Cradock's death was regarded
as inevitable. I remembered to have heard
Nelema
say, that she knew a certain antidote to the
poison of a rattle-snake; and when I told this to
your father, he ordered our horses to be saddled,
and we set out immediately for home, where we
arrived in six hours. Even in that brief space
the disease had made fearful progress. The
wound was horribly inflamed, and the whole arm
swoln and empurpled. I saw despair in every
face that looked on Cradock. I went myself,
attended by Jennet and Digby, to Nelema's
hut, for I knew if the old woman was in one of
her moody fits, she would not come for any
bidding
but mine.
Jennet, as you know was always her wont,
took up her testimony against `the old heathen
witch.' `It were better,' she said, `to die, than
to live by the devil's help.' I assured her, that
if the case were her own, I would not oppose
her pious preference; but that now I must have
my own way, and I believed the Giver of life would
direct the means of its preservation.
15*
Though it was near midnight, we found
Nelema sitting at the entrance of her hut. I
told her my errand. `Peace be with you, child,'
she said. `I knew you were coming, and have
been waiting for you.' She is superstitious, or
loves to affect supernatural knowledge, and I
should have thought nothing of her harmless
boast, had I not seen by the significant shake of
Jennet's head, that she set it down against her.
The old woman filled a deer-skin pouch from a
repository of herbs in one corner of her hut, and
then returned to Bethel with us. We found
Cradock in a state of partial delirium, and
nervous
restlessness, which, your father said, was the
immediate precursor of death. Aunt Grafton
was kneeling at his bedside, reading the prayers
for the dying.
Nelema ordered every one, with the exception
of myself, to leave the room, for she said her cures
would not take effect, unless there was perfect
silence. Your father retired to his own
apartment
,
and gave orders that he should, in no case,
be diverted from his prayers. Aunt Grafton
withdrew
with evident reluctance, and Jennet,
lingered
till Nelema's patience was exhausted, when she
pushed her out of the room, and barred the door
against her.
I confess, Everell, I would gladly have been
excluded too, for I recoiled from witnessing
Cradock's
mortal agony; but I dared in no wise
cross Nelema, so I quietly took the lamp, as she
bade me, and stood at the head of the bed. She
first threw aside her blanket, and discovered a
kind of wand, which she had concealed beneath
it, wreathed with a snake's skin. She then pointed
to the figure of a snake delineated on her naked
shoulder. `It is the symbol of our tribe,' she
said. `Foolish child!' she continued, for she saw
me shudder; `it is a sign of honour, won for our
race by him who first drew from the veins the poison
of the king of all creeping things. The tale was told
by our fathers, and sung at our feasts; and now
am I, the last of my race, bidden to heal a servant
in the house of our enemies.' She remained for
a moment, silent, motionless, and perfectly
abstracted
.
A loud groan from Cradock roused her.
She bent over him, and muttered an incantation
in her own tongue. She then, after many efforts,
succeeded in making him swallow a strong
decoction
,
and bathed the wound and arm with the
same liquor. These applications were repeated at
short intervals, during which she brandished her
wand, making quick and mysterious motions, as
if she were writing hieroglyphics on the invisible
air. She writhed her body into the most horrible
contortions, and tossed her withered arms wildly
about her, and, Everell, shall I confess to you,
that I trembled lest she should assume the living
form of the reptile whose image she bore? So
violent was her exercise, that the sweat poured
from her face like rain, and, ever and anon, she
sank down in momentary exhaustion, and stupor;
and then would spring to her feet, as a race horse
starts on the course, fling back her long black
locks that had fallen over her bony face, and
repeat
the strange process.
After a whilehow long I know not, for
anxiety
and terror prevented my taking any note of
timeCradock showed plain symptoms of
amendment
his
respiration became freethe colour in
his face subsidedhis brow, which had been
drawn to a knot, relaxed, and his whole
appearance
became natural and tranquil. `Now,'
whispered
Nelema to me, `fear no more for himhe
has turned his back on the grave. I will stay
here and watch him; but go thou to thy bed
thy cheek is pale with weariness and fear.'
I was too happy at that moment to feel
weariness
,
and would have remained, but Nelema's
gestures for me to withdraw were vehement, and I
left her, mentally blessing her for her effectual aid.
As I opened the door, I stumbled against Jennet.
It was evident from her posture, that she had been
peeping through the key-hole. Do not think me
a vixen, Everell, if I confess that my first impulse
was to box her ears; however, I suppressed my
rage, and, for the first time in my life, was
prudent
and temporizing, and I stooped to beg her
to go with me to my roomI am sure it was with
the timid voice of one who asks a favour, for, the
moment we were in the light, I saw by her mien
that she felt the power was all in her own hands.
`It is enough,' she said, `to make the hair of a
saint stand on end to have such carryings-on in my
master's house; and you, Miss Hope Leslie, that
have been, as it were, exalted to heaven in point
of privileges, that you should be nothing better
than an aid and abetment of this imissary of
Satan
.'
`Hush,' said I, `Jennet, and keep your breath
to give thanks for good Mr. Cradock's recovery.
Nelema has cured himSatan does not send forth
his emissaries with healing gifts.'
`Now, Miss Leslie,' retorted the provoking
creature, `you are in the very gall of bitterness
and blindness of the flesh. Did not the magicians
with their enchantments even as did Moses and
Aaron? The sons of darkness always put on the
form of the sons of light. I always said so. I
knew what it would come to. I said she was a
witch in Mistress Fletcher's time.'
`And you spoke falsely then, as you do now,
Jennet, for Nelema is no witch.'
`No witch!' rejoined Jennet, screaming with
her screech-owl voice, so loud that I was afraid
your father would overhear her; `try her then
see if she can read in the Bibleor Mr. Cotton's
catechismno, no; but give her your aunt
Grafton's
prayer book, and she will read as glib as a
minister.'
`Jennet,' said I, `you are mad outright
you seem to forget that Nelema cannot read any
thing.'
`It is all the same as if she could,' persisted
Jennet; `her master makes short teachingthere
are none so deaf as those that won't hear. I tell
you again, Miss Hope Leslieremember Mrs.
Fletcherremember what she got for shutting
her ears to me.'
You will forgive me, Everell, for losing my
patience utterly at these profane allusions to your
mother, and commanding Jennet to leave my
room.
She made me bitterly repent my want of
self-command
;
for, self-willed as the fools of
Solomon's
time, she determined to have her own way,
and went to your father's room, where she gained
admittance, and gave such a description of
Nelema's
healing process, that, late as it was, I was
summoned to his presence.
As I followed Jennet along the passage, she
whispered to me, `now for the love of your own
soul, don't use his blind partiality to pervert his
judgment.'
I made no reply, but mentally resolved that
I would task my power and ingenuity to the
utmost
to justify Nelema. When we came into the
study, Jennet, to my great joy, was dismissed. It
is much easier for me to contend with my
superiors
,
than my inferiors. Your father bade me sit
down by him. I seated myself on the foot-stool
at his feet, so that I could look straight into his
eyes; for many a time, when my heart has quailed
at his solemn address, the tender spirit stationed in
that soft hazle eye of hisso like yours, Everell
has quieted all my apprehensions. I spoke first,
and said, `I was sure Jennet had spoiled the good
news of my tutor's amendment, or he would not
look so grave.'
He replied, `that it was time to look grave
when a pow-wow dared to use her diabolical spells,
mutterings, and exorcisms, beneath a christian
roof, and in the presence of a christian maiden,
and on a christian man; but,' he added, `perhaps
Jennet hath not told the matter rightlyher zeal
is not always according to knowledge. I would
gladly believe that my house has not been
profaned
.
Tell me, Hope, all you witnessedtell
me truly.'
I obeyed. Your father heard me through
without any comment, but now and then a
deep-drawn
sigh; and when I had finished, he asked,
`what I understood by the strange proceedings I
had described?'
`May I not answer,' I said, `in the language
of scripture, `that this only I know, that whereas
thy servant was sick, he is now whole.
`Do not, my dear child,' said your father,
`rashly misapply scriptureand thus add to your
sin, in (as I trust ignorantly) dealing with this
witch and her familiars.'
I replied, `I did not believe Nelema had used
any witchcraft.'
He asked me, `if I had not been told, that
some of our catechised Indians had confessed that
when they were pagans they were pow-wows,
devoted
in their infancy to demonsthat these
pow-wows
were factors for the devilthat they held
actual conversation, and were in open and
avowed
confederacy with him?'
I said, `I had heard all this;' but asked, `if
it were right to take the confession of these poor
children of ignorance and superstition against
themselves?' I repeated what I had often heard
you, Everell, say, that Magawisca believed the
mountain, and the valley, the air, the trees, every
little rivulet, had their present invisible spiritand
that the good might hold discourse with them.
`Why not believe the one,' I asked, `as well as
the other?'
Your father looked at me sternly. `Dost thou
not believe in witchcraft, child?' he said. While
I hesitated how to reply, lest I should, in some
way, implicate Nelema, your father hastily turned
the leaves of the Bible, that lay on his table, and
opened to every text where familiar spirits,
necromancers
,
sorcerers, wizards, witches, and
witchcraft
,
are spoken of.
I felt as if the windows of heaven were
opened
on my devoted head. As soon as I could
collect
my wits, I said something, confusedly, about
not having thought much on the subject; but that
I had supposed, as indeed I always did, that bad
spirits were only permitted to appear on earth,
when there were, also, good spirits and holy
prophets
to oppose them.
Your father looked steadily at me, for a few
moments, then closing the Bible, he said, `I will
not blame thee, my child, but myself, that I have
left thee to the guidance of thy natural erring
reason
;
I should have better instructed thee.' He
then kissed me, bade me good night, and opened
the door for me to depart. I ventured to ask, `if
I might not say to Jennet, that it was his order,
she should be silent in regard to Nelema?'
`No, no,' he said, `meddle no farther with
that matter, but go to your own apartment,
and remain there till the bell rings for morning
prayers.'
My heart rebelled, but I dared not disobey.
I came to my room, and have been sitting by my
open window, in the hope of hearing Nelema's
parting footsteps; but I have listened in vain, and
unable to sleep, I have tried to tranquillize my
mind by writing to you. Poor old Nelema! if
she is given up to the magistrates, it will go hard
with herJennet is such an obstinate self-willed
fool! I believe she will be willing to see Nelema
hung for a witch, that she may have the pleasure
of saying, `I told you so.'
Poor Nelema!such a harmless, helpless,
lonely beingmy tears fall so fast on my paper,
that I can scarcely write. I blame myself for
bringing her into this hapless casebut it may be
better than I fear. I will leave my letter and try
to sleep.
Vol. I. 16
It is as I expected: Nelema was sent, early
this morning, to the magistrates. She was tried
before our triumvirate, Mr. Pynchon, Holioke,
and Chapin. It was not enough to lay on her
the crime of curing Cradock, but Jennet and some
of her gossips imputed to her all the mischances
that have happened for the last seven years. My
testimony was extorted from me, for I could not
disguise my reluctance to communicate any thing
that could be made unfavourable to her. Our
magistrates looked sternly on me, and Mr.
Holioke
said, `Take care, Hope Leslie, that thou art
not found in the folly of Balaam, who would have
blessed, when the Lord commanded him to curse.'
I said, `It was better to mistake in blessing
than in cursing, and that I was sure Nelema was
as innocent as myself.' I know not whence I had
my courage, but I think truth companies not with
cowardice; however, what I would fain call
courage
,
Mr. Pynchon thought necessary to rebuke
as presumption:`Thou art somewhat forward,
maiden,' he said, `in giving thy opinion; but thou
must know, that we regard it but as the whistle of
a bird; withdraw, and leave judgment to thy
elders.'
In leaving the room I passed close to
Nelema
.
I gave her my hand in token of kindness;
and though I heard a murmur of `shame
shame!' I did not withdraw it till the poor old
creature had bowed her wrinkled brow upon it,
and dropped a tear which no suffering could have
extorted.
The trial went on, and she was pronounced
worthy of death; but as the authority of our
magistracy
does not extend to life, limb, or
banishment
,
her fate is referred to the court at Boston.
In the mean time, she awaits her sentence in a
cell, in Mr. Pynchon's cellar. We have, as yet,
no jail.
Digby has been summoned before the
magistrates
,
and publickly reproved for expressing
himself
against their proceedings. Mr. Pynchon
charged him to speak no more against godly
governors
and righteous government, for to such
scoffers heaven had sent divers plaguessome
had been spirited away by Satansome blown
up in our harboursand some, like poor Austin
of Quinnepaig, taken into Turkish captivity!!
Digby's feelings are suppressed, but not subdued.
How I wish you were here, dear Everell.
Sometimes I wish your mother's letter had not
been so persuasive. Nothing but that last request
of hers, would have induced your father to send
you to your uncle Stretton. If you were here, I
am sure you would devise some way to save
Nelema
.
When she is gone, you will never again
hear of Magawisca. I shall never hear more of
my sweet sister. They both, if we may believe
Nelema, still dwell safely in the wigwam of
Mononotto
,
among the Mohawks. These Mohawks
are said to be a fierce race; and all those tribes
who dwell near the coast, and have, in some
measure
,
come under a christian jurisdiction, and are
called `praying and catechised Indians,' say, that
the Mohawks are to them as wolves to sheep. I
cannot bear to think of my gentle timid sister, a
very dove in her nature, among these fierce tribes.
I wonder that I am ever happy, and yet it is so
natural to me to be happy! The commander of
the fort at Albany, at Governor Winthrop's
request
,
has made great efforts to obtain some
information about my sister, but without any
satisfactory
result. Still Nelema insists to me, that
her knowledge is certain; and when I have
endeavoured
to ascertain the source whence she
derived it, she pointed upwards, indicating that
she held mysterious intelligence with the spirits
of the air; but I believe she employed this artifice
to hide some intercourse she holds with distant and
hostile tribes.
What a tragi-comedy is life, Everell!I am
sure your favourite, Shakespear, has copied
nature
in dividing his scenes between mirth and
sadness
.
I have laughed to-day, heartily, and for a
few moments I quite forgot poor Nelema, and all
my heart-rending anxieties about her. My tutor,
for the first time since his most unlucky mishap,
left his room, and made his appearance in the
parlour
.
I was sitting there with aunt Grafton, and
I rose to shake his hand, and express my
unfeigned
joy on his recovery. His little gray eyes were,
for a moment, blinded with tears at what he was
pleased to call the `condescendency of my regard
for him.' He then stood for a moment, as if he
were lost, as you know is always his wont, when a
blur comes over his mind, which is none of the
clearest at best. I thought he looked pale and
weak, and I offered him a chair and begged him
to sit down, but he declined it with a wave, or
rather
a poke, of his hand, for he never in his life
made a motion so graceful as a wave, and
drawing
a paper from his pocket, he said, `I have here
an address to thee, sweet Miss Hope Leslie,
wherein I have put in a body of words the spirit
of my late meditations, and I have endeavoured
to express, in the best latinity with which many
years of daily and nightly study have possessed
me, my humble sense of that marvellous wit and
kindness of thine, which made thee, as it were, a
ministering angel unto me, when I was brought
nigh unto the grave by the bite of that most
cunning
beast of the field, with whom, I verily
believe
,
the devil left a portion of his spirit, in
payment
of the body he borrowed to beguile our
first parents.'
16*
This long preamble finished, Master Cradock
began the reading of his address, of which, being
in the language of the learned, I could not, as you
know, understand one word; however, he did not
perceive that my smiles were not those of
intelligence
,
nor hear aunt Grafton's remark, that
`much learning and little wit had made him as
crazy as a loon.' He had not proceeded far,
when his knees began to shake under him, and
disdaining to sit, (an attitude, I suppose,
proscribed
in the ceremonies of the schools, the
only ceremonies he observes) he contrived, with
the aid of the chair I had placed for him, to kneel.
When he had finished his address, which,
according
to the rules of art, had a beginning, a middle,
and, thank heaven, an end, he essayed to rise;
but, alas! though, like Falstaff, he had an `
alacrity
in sinking,' to rise was impossible; for beside
the usual impediments of his bulk and clumsiness,
he was weakened and stiffened by his late
sickness
;
so I was fain to call Digby to his
assistance
,
and run away to my own apartment to write
you, dear Everell, who are ever patient with my
Bethel chronicles, an account of what aunt
Grafton
calls, `this
scholar
foolery.'
Yesterday was our lecture day, and I went to
the village to attend the meeting. A sudden
storm of hail and wind came on during the
exercises
,
and continued after, and I was obliged to
accept Mrs. Pynchon's invitation to go home with
her. After we had taken our supper, I observed
Mr. Pynchon fill a plate, bountifully, with
provisions
from the table, and give it with a large key,
which he took from a little cupboard over the
fire-place
,
to a serving woman. She returned, in a
short time, with the key, and, as I observed,
restored
it to its place. Digby came shortly after
to attend me home. The family hospitably urged
me to remain, and ascertaining from Digby that
there was no especial reason for my return, I
dismissed him.
The next morning I was awakened from a
deep sleep by one of Mr. Pynchon's daughters,
who told me, with a look of terror, that a
despatch
had arrived early that morning from
Boston
,
notifying the acquiescence of the Court
there, in the opinion of our magistrates, and
Nelema's
sentence of condemnation to deaththat
her father had himself gone to the cell to
announce
her fate to her, when lo! she had
vanished
the
prison-door was fastthe key in its usual
placebut the witch was spirited away. I
hurried
on my clothes, and trembling with surprise,
pleasure, or whatever emotion you may please
to ascribe to me, I descended to the parlor,
where the family and neighbours had assembled
to talk over the strange event. I only added
exclamations
to the various conjectures that were
made. No one had any doubt as to who had been
Nelema's deliverer, unless a suspicion was implied
in the inquiring glances which Mr. Pynchon
cast on me, but which, I believe, no one but myself
observed. Some could smell sulphur from the
outer kitchen door to the door of the cell; and
there were others who fancied that, at a few yards
distance from the house, there were on the ground
marks of a slight scorchinga plain indication
of a visitation from the enemy of mankind. One
of the most sagacious of our neighbours remarked,
that he had often heard of Satan getting his
servants into trouble, but he never before heard
of his getting them out. However, the
singularity
of the case only served to magnify their
wonder
,
without, in the least, weakening their faith in
the actual, and, as it appeared, friendly alliance
between Nelema, and the evil one. Indeed, I was
the only person present whose belief in her
witchcraft was not, as it were, converted into
sight.
Everell, I had been visited by a strange dream
that night, which I will venture to relate to you;
for you, at least, will not think me confederate
with Nelema's deliverer.
Methought I stood, with the old woman,
beneath
the elm tree, at the end of Mr. Pynchon's
garden; the moon, through an opening of the
branches, shone brightly on her faceit was wet
with tears.
`I shall not forget,' she said, `who saved me
from dying by the hand of an enemy. As surely
as the sun will appear there again,' she added,
pointing to the east`so surely, Hope Leslie, you
shall see your sister.'
`But, Nelema,' said I, `my poor little sister
is in the far western forestsyou can never reach
there.'
`I will reach there,' she replied`if I crawl
on my hands and knees, I will reach there.'
Think you, dear Everell, my sister will ever
expound this dream to me?
I was the first to carry the news to Bethel.
Your father was in one of his meditative humours,
and heeded it no more than if I had told him a
bird had flown from its cage. Jennet joined in
the general opinion, that Satan, or at least one of
his emissaries, had opened the prison door; and
our good Digby, with his usual fearlessness,
maintained, in the teeth of her exhortation and
invective, that an angel had wrought for the
innocent
old woman.
A week has elapsed. It is whispered that on
the night Nelema vanished, Digby was missed by
his bed-fellow!strange depredations were
committed
on Jennet's larder!and muffled oars were
heard on the river!
Our magistrates have made long and frequent
visits to Bethel, and have held secret conferences
with your father. The purport of them I leave
you to conjecture from the result. Yesterday he
sent for me to the study. He appeared deeply
affected. It was some time before he could
command
his voice; at length he said, that he had
determined to accept for me Madam Winthrop's
invitation to Boston. I told him, and told him
truly, that I did not wish to go to Boston
that I was perfectly contentedperfectly happy.
`And what,' I asked, `will you and poor aunt
Grafton do without me?'
`Your aunt goes with you,' he said; `and as
for me, my dear child, I have too long permitted
myself the indulgence of having you with me. I
have a pilgrimage to accomplish through this
wilderness, and I am sinful if I linger to watch
the unfolding of even the single flower that has
sprung up in my path.'
`But,' said I, `does not He who appoints the
path through the wilderness, set the flowers by
the wayside? I will notI will not be plucked
up and cast away.' He kissed me, and said, `I
believe, my beloved child, thou wert sent in mercy
to me; but it were indeed sinful to convert
the staff vouchsafed to my pilgrimage into fetters.
I should ever bear in mind that life is a race and
a warfare, and nothing else: you have this yet to
learn, Hope. I have proved myself not fit to
teach, or to guide theenor is your aunt.
Madam
Winthrop will give you pious instruction
and counsel, and her godly niece, Esther
Downing
,
will, I trust, win you to the narrow path,
which, as the elders say, she doth so steadily
pursue
.'
The idea of this puritanical guardianship
did not strike me agreeably, and besides, I love
BethelI love your fatherwith my whole soul
I love him; and, as you already know, Everell,
therefore it is no confession, I love to have my
own way, and I said, I would not go.
`You must go, my child,' said your father;
`I cannot find it in my heart to chide you for your
reluctance, but you must go. Neither you, nor I,
have any choice.'
`But why must I go?' I asked.
`Ask no questions,' he replied; `it is fixed
that you must go. Tell your aunt Grafton that
she must be ready to leave Springfield next week.
Mr. Pynchon and his servants attend you. Now
leave me, my child, for when you are with me,
you touch at will every chord in my heart, and I
would fain keep it still now.'
I left him, Everell, while I could command my
tears; and after I had given them free course, I
informed aunt Grafton of our destiny. She was
so delighted with the prospect of a visit to
Boston
,
that I, too, began to think it must be very
pleasant; and my dread of this straight-laced Mrs.
Winthrop and her perpendicular niece, gave
place to indefinite anticipations of pleasure. I
shall, at any rate, see you sooner than if I
remained
here. Thank heaven, the time of your return
approaches; and now that it is so near, I rejoice
that your father has not been persuaded, by those
who seem to me to take a very superfluous care
of his private affairs, to recall you sooner. On
this subject he has stood firm: satisfied, as he
has always said, that he could not err in
complying
with the last request of your sainted mother.
Aunt Grafton charges me with divers
messages
to you, but I will not add a feather to this
leaden letter, which you will now have to read,
as I have written it, by instalments.
Farewell, dear Everell, forget not thy loving
friend and sister,
Hope Leslie
.
As Hope had declined her aunt's messages, the
good lady affixed them herselfand here they
follow.
To
Everell Fletcher
.
Valued sir
Being much hurried in point of
time, I would fain have been myself excused from
writing, but Miss Hope declines adding to her
letter what I have indited.
In your last, you mention being visited with the
great cold, which, I take from your account of it,
to be the same as that with which we were all
shaken soon after the coronation of his present
Majesty. (God bless him!) I had then a recipe
given me for an infallible remedy, by the Lady
Penyvere, great aunt, by the mother's side, to la
belle Rosette, maid of honour to the queen.
I enclose it for you, believing it will greatly
advantage
you, though Hope insists that if the cold
has not yet left you, it will be a chronic disease
before this reaches you; in which case, I would
advise you to apply to old Lady Lincoln, who
hath in her family receipt-book, many renowned
cures for chronics. I remember one in
particular
,
somewhere about the middle of the book,
which follows immediately after a rare recipe for
an every-day plum-pudding.
I doubt not that years have mended thee, and
that thou wouldst now condemn the folly and
ignorance of thy childhood, which made thee
then deride the most sovereign remedies. Hope,
I am sorry to say, is as obstinate as ever; and it
was but yesterday, when I wished her to take
some diluents for a latent fever, that she
reminded
me of the time when she, and you, in one of
your mischievous pranks, threw the pennyroyal
tea out of the window, and suffered me to believe
that it had cured an incipient pleurisy. Thus
presumptuous is youth! Hope is, to be sure,
notwithstanding
her living entirely without medicine,
in indifferent good health; her form is rather
more slender than when you left us, as is
becoming
at seventeen; but her cheek is as round and
as ruddy as a peach. I should not care so much
about her self-will on the score of medicine, but
that her stomach being in such perfect order now,
would bear every kind of preventive, and
medicines
of this class are so simple, that they can do
Vol. I. 17
no harm. I believe it is true, as old Doctor
Panton
used to say, `your healthy people are always
prejudiced against medicine.' I wish you would
drop a hint on this subject in your next letter to
her, for the slightest hint from you goes further
than a lecture from me.
It was very thoughtful in you, Mr. Everell, and
what I once should not have expected, to inquire
so particularly after my health. I am happy
to say, that at this present I am better than
I have been for years, which is unaccountable
to me, as, since the hurry of our preparations
for Boston, I have forgotten my pills at night,
and my tonics in the morning.
I wish you to present many thanks to Lady
Amy for assisting you in my commissions. The
articles in general suited, though the pinking of
the flounces was too deep. My gown was a
trifle too darkbut do not mention that to
Lady Amy, for I make no doubt she took due
pains, and only wanted a right understanding of
the real hue, called feuille morte, which, between
you and Isub rosa, mindmy gown would not
be called, by any person skilled in the colours of
silk. Hope thought to convince me I was wrong
by matching it with a dead leaf from the forest.
Was not that peculiar of Hope?
Now, Mr. Everell, I do not wish to be an old
woman before my time, therefore I will have
another silk of a brighter cast. Brown it must be,
but livelylively. I will enclose a lock of Hope's
hair, which is precisely the hue I mean. You
will observe it has a golden tinge, that makes
it appear in all lights as if there were
sunshine
on it, and yet it is a decided brown; a
difficult colour to hit, but by due inquiry, and I
am sure, from the pains you were at to procure
the articles I requested for Hope, you will spare
no trouble, I think it may be obtained.
I am greatly beholden to you for the
pocket-glass
you sent me; it is a mighty convenient
article
,
and an uncommon pretty little attention, Mr.
Everell.
Your present to Hope was a real beauty. The
only blue fillet, and the prettiest, of any colour, I
ever saw; and such a marvellous match for her
eyesthat is, when the light is full on them; but
you know they always had a changeable trick
with them. I remember Lady Amy's once
saying
to me before we left England, that my niece
would yet do mischief with those laughing
black
eyes of hers. I liked her sister's (poor dear
MaryGod help her the while!) better then, they
were the true Leslie blue. But one word more
of the fillet. Your taste in it cannot be too much
commended; but then, as I tell Hope, one does
not want always to see the same thing; and she
doth continually wear it;granted, it keeps the
curls out of her eyes, and they do look lovely
falling
about it, but she wears it, week-days and
Sundays
,
feast days and fast days, and she never yet
has put on the Henriette; (do remember a
thousand
thanks to Lady Amy for the pattern) the
Henriette, I made her, like that worn by the
queen the first night she appeared in the royal
box.
I should like to have a little more chit-chat
with you, Mr. Everell, now my pen has got, so to
speak, warm in the harness; but business before
pleasure. I beg you will remember me to all
inquiring
friends. Alas! few in number now, as
most of my surviving contemporaries have died
since I left England.
Farewell, Mr. Everell, these few lines are
from your friend and well-wisher,
Bertha Grafton
.
N.B. It is a great pleasure to me to think you
are living in a churchman's family, where you
can't but steer clear ofyou know what
peculiarities
.
N.B. Hope will have given you the particulars
of poor Master Cradock's miscarriage; his mind
was set a little
agee
by it, but he appears to be
mending.
N.B. The enclosed recipe hath marvellous
virtues in fevers, as well as in colds.
CHAPTER IX.
A country lad is my degree,
An' few there be that ken me, O;
But what care I how few they be,
I'm welcome aye to Nannie, O.
Burns
.
There
are hints in Miss Leslie's letter to
Everell
Fletcher, that require some amplification to be
quite intelligible to our readers. She looked upon
herself, as the unhappy, though innocent cause, of
the old Indian woman's misfortuneand, rash
as generous, she had resolved, if possible, to
extricate
her. With the inconsiderate warmth of
youthful feeling, she had, before the grave and
reverend
magistrates, declared her belief in
Nelema's
innocence, and thereby implied a censure of
their wisdom. This was, certainly, an almost
unparalleled presumption, in those times, when
youth was accounted inferiority; but the very
circumstance that, in one light, aggravated her
fault, in another, mitigated it; and her youth,
being admitted in extenuation of her offence, she
was allowed to escape with a reproof and
admonition
of moderate lengthwhile her poor
guardian
was condemned to a long and private
conference
,
on the urgency of reclaiming the spoiled
17*
child. Various modes of effecting so desirable
an object were suggested, for, as the Scotchman
said, in an analogous case, Ilka man can
manage
a wife but him that has her.
This matter had passed over, and justice was
proceeding in her stern course, when fortune,
accident
,
or more truly, Providence, favoured the
benevolent wishes of our heroine. She had, as
has been seen, been carried by an unforeseen
circumstance
,
to the house of one of the
magistrates
.
There, mindful of the poor old prisoner,
whose sentence, she knew, was daily expected
from Boston; she had been watchful of every
circumstance relating to her, and when she
observed
the key of her prison deposited in an
accessible place, (no one dreaming of any
interference
in behalf of the condemned) she was
inspired
with a sudden resolution to set her free. This
was a bold, dangerous, and unlawful
interposition
;
but Hope Leslie took counsel only from her
own heart, and that told her that the rights of
innocence
were paramount to all other rights, and
as to danger to herself, she did not weigh itshe
did not think of it.
Digby came to the village to attend her home,
and this afforded her an opportunity of concert
with him: in the depths of the night, when
all the household were in profound sleep, she stole
from her bed, found her way to the door of
the dungeon, and leading out the prisoner, gave
her into Digby's charge, who had a canoe in
waiting
,
in which he ferried her to the opposite shore,
where he left her, after having supplied her with
provisions to sustain her to the vallies of the
Housatonick
,
if, indeed, her wasted strength should
enable her to reach there. The gratitude of the
poor old creature for her unexpected deliverance
from shameful death, is faintly touched on in
Hope's letter. She could scarcely, without
magnifying
her own merit, have described the
vehement
emotion with which Nelema promised that
she would devote the remnant of her miserable
days to seeking and restoring her lost sister. Again
and again, while Hope urged her departure, she
reiterated this promise, and finally, when she
parted
from Digby, she repeated, as if it were a
prophecy
,
`She shall see her sister.'
Young persons are not apt to make a very exact
adjustment of means and ends, and our heroine
certainly placed an undue confidence in the power
of the helpless old woman, to accomplish her
promise
;
but she needed not this, to increase her
present joy at her success. She crept to her bed,
and was awakened in the morning, as she has
herself
related, with the information of Nelema's
escape
.
She had now a part to play to which she
was unusedto mask her feelings, affect
ignorance
,
and take part in the consternation of the
assembled village. As may be imagined, her
assumed
character was awkwardly enough
performed
,
but all were occupied with their own
surmises
,
and no one thought of herno one,
excepting
Mr. Pynchon, who had scarcely fixed his eye
on her, when a suspicion that had before flashed
on his mind, was confirmed. He knew, from the
simplicity of her nature, and from her habitual
frankness, that she would not have hesitated
to avow her pleasure in Nelema's escape, if
she had not herself been accessory to it. He
watched her averted eyehe observed her
unbroken
silence, and her lips that, in spite of all
her efforts, played into an inevitable smile at the
superstitious surmises of some of the wise people,
whose philosophy had never dreamed of that
every-day axiom of modern timesthat
super-natural
aid should not be called in to interpret
events which may be explained by natural causes.
However satisfactory Mr. Pynchon's
conclusions
were to himself, he confined them, for the
present, to his own bosom. He was a merciful
man, and probably felt an emotion of joy at the
old woman's escape, that could not be suppressed
by the stern justice that had pronounced her
worthy
of death. But while he easily reconciled
himself to the loss of the prisoner, he felt the
necessity
of taking instant and efficient measures
to subdue to becoming deference and obedience,
the rash and lawless girl, who had dared to
interpose
between justice and its victim. His heart
recoiled from punishing her openly, and he
contented
himself with insisting, in a private
interview
with Mr. Fletcher, on the necessity of her
removal to a stricter control than his; and
recommended
,
for a time, a temporary transfer of his
neglected authority to less indulgent hands.
Mr. Fletcher complied so far as to consent that
his favourite should be sent, for a few months, to
Boston, to the care of Madam Winthrop, whose
character being brought out by the light of her
husband's official station, was held up as a sort of
pattern throughout New-England. But we must,
for the present, pass by state characters; gallery
portraits, for the miniature picture that lies next
our heart, and which it is full time should be
formally
presented to our readers, whose
curiosity
,
we trust, has not been sated by occasional
glimpses.
Nothing could be more unlike the authentic,
`thoroughly educated,' and thoroughly disciplined
young ladies of the present day, than Hope
Leslie
;
as unlike as a mountain rill to a canalthe
one leaping over rocks and precipices, sportive,
free, and beautiful, or stealing softly on, in unseen,
unpraised loveliness; the other, formed by art,
restrained within prescribed and formal limits,
and devoted to utility. Neither could any thing
in outward show, be more unlike a modern belle,
arrayed in the mode de Paris of the last
Courier
des dames, than Hope Leslie, in her dress of
silk or muslin, shaped with some deference to the
fashion of the day, but more according to the
dictates of her own skill and classic taste, which
she followed, somewhat pertinaciously, in spite of
the suggestions of her experienced aunt.
Fashion had no shrines among the pilgrims; but
where she is most abjectly worshipped, it would
be treason against the paramount rights of nature,
to subject such a figure as Hope Leslie's to her
tyranny. As well might the exquisite classic
statue
be arrayed in corsets, manches en gigot,
garnitures en tulle, &c. Her height was not above
the medium standard of her sex; she was
delicately
formed; the high health and the uniform
habits of a country life, had endowed her with
the beauty with which poetry has invested Hebe;
while her love for exploring hill and dale, ravine
and precipice, had given her that elastic step and
ductile grace which belong to all agile animals,
and which made every accidental attitude, such,
as a painter would have selected to express the
nymphlike beauty of Camilla.
It is in vain to attempt to describe a face, whose
material beauty, though that beauty may be
faultless
,
is but a medium for the irradiations of the
soul. For the curious, we would, if we could, set
down the colour of our heroine's eyes; but, alas!
it was undefinable, and appeared gray, blue, hazle,
or black, as the outward light touched them,
or as they kindled by the light of her feelings.
Her rich brown hair, turned in light waves from
her sunny brow, as if it would not hide the beauty
it sheltered. Her mouth, at this early period of
her life, had nothing of the seriousness and
contemplation
that events might afterwards have
traced there. It rather seemed the station of all
sportive, joyous, and kindly feeling, and at the
slightest motion of her thoughts, curled into
smiles, as if all the breathings of her young heart
were happiness and innocence.
It may appear improbable that a girl of
seventeen
,
educated among the strictest sect of the
puritans
,
should have had the open, fearless, and gay
character of Hope Leslie; but it must be
remembered
that she lived in an atmosphere of favour
and indulgence, which permits the natural
qualities
to shoot forth in unrepressed luxuriancean
atmosphere of love, that like a tropical climate,
brings forth the richest flowers and most flavorous
fruits. She was transferred from the care of the
gentlest and tenderest of mothers, to Mr.
Fletcher
,
who, though stern in his principles, was
indulgent
in his practice; whose denying virtues were
all self-denying; and who infused into the parental
affection he felt for the daughter, something of
the romantic tenderness of the lover of her
mother
.
Her aunt Grafton doated on her; she was
the depository of her vanity, as well as of her
affection
.
To her simple tutor, she seemed to embody
all that philosophers and poets had set down in
their books, of virtue and beauty; and those of
the old and rigid, who were above, or below, the
influence of less substantial charms, regarded the
young heiress with deference. In short, she was
the petted lamb of the fold.
It has been seen that Hope Leslie was superior
to some of the prejudices of the age. This may
be explained, without attributing too much to her
natural sagacity. Those persons she most loved,
and with whom she had lived from her infancy,
were of variant religious sentiments. Her father
had belonged to the established church, and
though he had much of the gay spirit that
characterized
the cavaliers of the day; he was serious and
exact in his observance of the rites of the church.
She had often been her mother's companion at the
proscribed `meeting,' and witnessed the fervor
with which she joined in the worship of a
persecuted
and suffering people. Early impressions
sometimes form moulds for subsequent opinions;
and when at a more reflecting age, Hope heard
her aunt Grafton rail with natural good sense,
and with the freedom, if not the point, of mother
wit, at some of the peculiarities of the puritans,
she was led to doubt their infallibility; and like the
bird that spreads his wings and soars above the
limits by which each man fences in his own
narrow
domain, she enjoyed the capacities of her
nature
,
and permitted her mind to expand beyond
the contracted boundaries of sectarian faith.
Her religion was pure and disinterestedno one,
therefore, should doubt its intrinsic value, though
it had not been coined into a particular form, or
received the current impress.
Though the history of our heroine, like a
treasured
flower, has only left its sweetness on the
manuscript page, from which we have amplified
it; yet we have been compelled to infer, from
some transactions which we shall faithfully record,
that she had faults; but we leave our readers to
discover them. Who has the resolution to point
out a favourite's defects?
As our fair readers are not apt to be observant
of dates, it may be useful to remind them that Miss
Leslie's letter was written in October. In the
following May, two ships, from the mother
country
,
anchored at the same time in Boston-Bay.
Some passengers, from each ship, availed
themselves
of the facility of the pilot-boat to go up to
the town. Among others, were two gentlemen, who
met now for the first time: the one, a youth in
manhood's earliest prime, with a frank, intelligent,
and benevolent countenance, over which, as he
strained his eyes to the shore, joy and anxiety flitted
with rapid vicissitude. The other had advanced
further into life; he might not be more than five and
thirty, possibly not so much; but his face was
deeply marked
by the ravages of the passions, or
perhaps
the stirring scenes of life. His eyes were black
and piercing, set near together, and overhung by
thick black brows, whose incessant motion
indicated
a restless mind. The concentration of
thought, or the designing purpose, expressed
by the upper part of his face, was contradicted
by his loose, open flexible lips. His
complexion
had the same puzzling contrarietyit was
Vol. I. 18
dark and saturnine, but enlivened with the ruddy
hue of a bon-vivant. His nose neither turned up
nor down, was neither Grecian nor Roman. In
short, the countenance of the stranger was a
worthless dial-platea practical refutation of the
science
of physiognomy; and as the infallible art
of phrenology was unknown to our fathers, they
were compelled to ascertain the character (as their
unlearned descendants still are) by the slow
developement
of the conduct. The person of the
stranger had a certain erect and gallant bearing
that marks a man of the world, but his dress was
strictly puritanical; and his hair, so far from
being
permitted the `freedom of growing long,' then
deemed `a luxurious feminine prolixity,' or being
covered with a wig, (one of the abominations that,
according to Eliot, had brought on the country
the infliction of the Pequod war,) was cropped
with exemplary precision. But though the stranger's
apparel was elaborately puritanical, still there was
a certain elegance about it, which indicated that
his taste had reluctantly yielded to his principles.
His garments were of the finest materials, and
exactly
fitted to a form of striking manly symmetry.
His hair, it is true, was scrupulously clipped, but
being thick and jet black, it becomingly defined a
forehead of uncommon whiteness and beauty. In
one particular he had departed from the letter of
the law, and instead of exposing his throat by the
plain, open linen collar, usually worn, he
sheltered
its ugly protuberance with a fine cambric ruff,
arranged in box-plaits. In short, though, with the
last exception, a nice critic could not detect the
most venial error in his apparel; yet, among the
puritans, he looked much like a `dandy quaker'
of the present day, amidst his sober-suited
brethren.
Whilst the boat, impelled by a favouring tide,
and fair breeze, glided rapidly towards the
metropolis
of the now thriving colony, the gentlemen
fell into conversation with the pilot. The elder
stranger inquired if Governor Winthrop had been
re-elected?
YesGod bless him, replied the sailor;
the worthy gentleman has taken the helm once
more.
Has he, asked the stranger, eagerly,
declared
for King or Parliament?
Ho! I don't know much about their
land-tackle
,
replied the seaman; but, to my mind, the
fastings we have had all along when the King won
the day, and the rejoicings when the Parliament
gained it, was what you might call a declaration.
Since you speak of it, I do remember I heard the
boys up in town saying, that our magistrates, at
election, did scruple about the oath, and
concluded
to leave out that part which promises to bear
true faith and allegiance to our sovereign lord
King Charles.
So, we have thrown his Majesty overboard,
and are to sail under Parliament colours, said
the young gentleman. Well, he continued,
this might have been predicted some five or six
years since, for, I remember, there were then
disputes
,
whether the King's ensign should be spread
there, and he pointed to the fortifications on
Castle Island, past which the boat was, at that
moment, gliding. They scruple now about the
oath. Then their consciences rebelled against
the red cross in the ensign; which, I remember,
was called, `the Pope's gift,' `a relique of
papacy
,'
`an idolatrous sign,' &c.
Scruples of conscience are ever honourable,
said the elder stranger; and doubtless your
Governor
has good reason for not complying with
the scripture rule`render unto Csar, the things
that are Csar's'.
There is no doubt of it, replied the seaman.
The GovernorGod bless himknows the rules
of the good book as well as I know the ropes of
a ship; and there is no better pilot than he for all
weathers, as he shows by not joining in the hue
and cry against the good creature tobacco. Fair
winds through life, and a pleasant harbour at last,
do I wish him for this piece of christian love!
at the same time he illustrated his benediction by
putting a portion of the favourite luxury in his
mouth.
I am sorry, said the young gentleman, that
our magistrates have volunteered a public
expression
of their feelingstheir sympathies, of course,
are with the Parliament partythey virtually
broke the yoke of royal authority, when they left
their native land, and shewed what value they
set on liberty by sacrificing for it every temporal
good. Now they have a right to enjoy their liberty
in peace.
Peace! said the elder gentleman,
emphatically
thus
it ever is with the natural man,
crying
peacepeacewhere there is no peace.
Think you, young man, that if the King were to
recover his power, he would not resume all the
privileges he has formerly granted to these people,
whothanks to Him whose ark abideth with
them!shew themselves so ready to cast off their
allegiance?
The King, no doubt, replied the young
gentleman
,
would like to resume both power and
possession; but still, I think we might retain our
own, on the principle that he had no right to give,
and in truth could not give, what was not his, and
what we have acquired, either by purchase of the
natives, or by lawful conquest, which gives us the
right to the vacuum domicilium.
I am happy to see, sir, said the elder
gentleman
,
slightly bowing and smiling, that your
principles, at least, are on the side of the
puritans
.
My feelings and principles both, sir; but that
does not render me insensible to the happiness of
the adverse party, or the wisdom of all parties,
which is peace; the peace which the generous
Falkland so earnestly invokes, every patriot
may ardently desire. Peace, if I may borrow a
figure from our friend the pilot here, is a fair wind
18*
and a flood-tideand war a storm, that must wreck
some, and may wreck both friend and foe.
The young gentleman seemed tired of the
conversation, and turned away, fixing his eager
gaze on the shore, towards which his heart
bounded
.
His companion, however, was not disposed
to indulge him in silence. This town, sir, he
said, appears to be familiar to you. I, alas! am
a stranger and a wanderer. This was spoken in
a tone of unaffected seriousness.
Of such this country is the natural home,
replied
the young man, regarding his companion
for the first time with some interest, for he had
been repelled by what seemed to him to savour of
cant, of which he had heard too much in the
mother country. I should be happy, sir, he
said, courteously, to render my acquaintance
with the town of any service to you.
The stranger bowed in acknowledgment of
the civility. I would gladly, he said, find
entertainment with some godly family here. Is
Mr. Wilson still teacher of the congregation?
No, sirif he were, you might securely count
on his hospitality, as it was so notorious, that,
`come in, you are heartily welcome,' was said to
be the anagram of his name. But if he is gone, the
doors in Boston are always open to the stranger.
Mr. Cotton, I believe, is the present ministeris
he not, pilot?
Yesan please you, sirbut I'm thinking,
he added, with a leer, that that butterfly will be
an odd fish to harbour with any of our right godly
ones. The young gentleman followed the
direction
of the pilot's eye, and for the first time
observed
a lad, who sat on one side of the boat
leaning over, and amusing himself with lashing
the waves with a fanciful walking-stick. He
overheard the pilot's remark, and raised his head,
as it appeared involuntarily, for he immediately
averted it again, but not till he had exposed a
face of uncommon beauty. He looked about
fifteen
.
He had the full melting dark eye, and rich
complexion of southern climes; masses of jetty
curls parted on his forehead, shaded his temples
and neck, and smooth as Hebe's was his
unrazored lip. It was obvious that it was
his dress which had called forth the sailor's
sarcasm. The breast and sleeves of his jerkin
were embroidered, a deep-pointed rich lace ruff
embellished his neck, if a neck round and smooth
as alabaster could be embellished, and his head
was covered with a little fantastic Spanish hat,
decorated with feathers.
Does that youth appertain to you, sir? asked
the young gentleman of the elder stranger.
Yeshe is a sort of dependanta page of
mine, he replied, with an embarrassed manner;
but in a moment recovering his self-possession, he
added, I infer from the gratuitous remarks of
our very frank pilot, and from the survey you
have taken of the lad, that you think his
apparel
extraordinary.
It might, possibly, replied the young man,
with a smile, offend against certain sumptuary
laws of our colony, and thus prove inconvenient
to you.
Roslin, do you hear, said the master to the
page, who nodded his head without raising it;
thy finery, boy, as I have told thee, must be
retrenched
;
then turning to his companion, and
lowering his voice to a confidential tone, he
added; the lad hath lived on the continent, and
hath there imbibed these vanities, of which I
hope in good time to reform him; perhaps his
youth hath overwrought, with my indulgence, in
suffering them thus long.
The young gentleman courteously prevented
any further, and as he thought, unnecessary
exculpation
,
by saying, that the offence was
certainly
a very trifling one, and if observed at all,
would be, by the most scrupulous, considered as
venial in so young a lad. He now again turned
his ardent gaze to the shore. Ah! there is the
spire of the new meeting-house, he said; when
I went away the good people assembled under a
thatched roof, and within mud walls.
And I can remember, said the pilot, for I
was among the first comers to the wilderness,
when for weeks the congregation met under an
oak treeand there was heart-worship there,
gentlemen
,
if there ever was on the ball.
A church standing where
Joy's buildings
are now
located, was the only one then in Boston. The
greater part of the houses were built in its
vicinity
,
just about the heart of the peninsula, on whose
striking and singular form, its first possessors
aver they saw written prophecies of its future
greatness. Some of its most prominent features
have been softened by time, and others changed
by the busy art of man. Wharves, whole streets,
and the noble granite market-house, (a prouder
memorial to its founder than a triumphal arch)
now stand where the deep cove stretched its
peaceful harbour, between the two hills that stood
like towers of defence at its extremities. That
at the north rose to the height of fifty feet above
the sea, and on its level summit stood a windmill;
towards the sea it presented an abrupt declivity,
and was fortified at its base by a strong battery.
The eastern hill was higher than its sister by some
thirty feet; it descended kindly towards the town,
and was, on that side planted with corn. Towards
the sea its steep and ragged cliffs announced that
nature had formed it for defence; and
accordingly
our fathers soon fortified it with store of
great artillery, and changed the first pastoral
name of Cornhill, which they had given it, to the
more appropriate designation of Fort-hill. A
third hill flanked the town, rising to the height of
one hundred and thirty-eight feet. All three,
says Johnson, like over-topping towers, keepe a
constant watch to foresee the approach of forrein
dangers, being furnished with a beacon, and loud
babbling guns, to give notice by their redoubled
eccho, to all their sister townes.
Shawmut, a word expressing living fountains,
was the Indian name of Boston. Tri-mountain,
its first English name, and descriptive of
Beacon-hill
,
which, as we are told, rose in three majestic
and lofty eminences; the most eastern of these
summits having on its brow three little hillocks. Its
present, and, as we fondly believe immortal name,
was given with characteristic reverence in honour
of one of its first pastors, Mr. Cotton, who came
from Boston, in England.
But we return from this digression to our
pilot-boat, which now had nearly reached its
landing place. A throng had gathered on the
town-dock in expectation of friends, or news
from friends. In vain did the young stranger's
eye explore the crowd for some familiar face; he
was obliged to check the greetings that rose
to his lips, and repress the throbbings of his heart.
Time, he said, has wrought strange changes.
I fancied that even the stones in Boston would
know me; but now, I see not one welcoming
look, unless it be in those barbary and rose
bushes
,
that appear just as they did the last time I
scrambled over wind-mill hill. They now
landed
at the foot of this hill, and the young
gentleman
told his companion, that he should go to his
old home at Governor Winthrop's, where he was
sure of finding friends to welcome him. And
if you will accompany me thither, he said, I am
certain our kind Governor will render you all the
courtesies, which, as a stranger, you may require.
This opportune offer was, of course accepted;
and the gentlemen proceeded like old
acquaintances
,
arm in arm together, after a short
consultation
between the master and page, the amount
of which seemed to be that the boy should attend
him, and await without Governor Winthrop's
door, further orders.
They had not gone far, when, as they turned a
corner, two young ladies issued from the door of a
house a little in advance, and walked on without
observing them. The young gentleman
quickened
his steps. It must be she! he exclaimed,
in a most animated tone. There is but one
person in the world that has such tresses! and
his eye rested on the bright golden ringlets that
peeped from beneath a chip gipsy hat, worn by
one of the ladies.
That is not a rational conclusion of yours,
said his companion. Women have cunning
devices
,
by which to change the order of nature in
the colouring of the hair. I have seen many a
court dame arrayed in the purchased locks of her
serving-maid; besides, you know it is the vain
fashion of the day to make much use of coloured
powders, fluids, and unguents.
That may all be; but do you not see this
nymph's locks are, as Rosalind says, of the colour
God chooses?
It were better, my friend, if you explained
your meaning without a profane quotation from a
play; a practice to which our godless cavaliers
are much addicted; but pardon my reproofage
has privileges.
I do not know, replied the young gentleman,
what degree of seniority may confer this
privilege
if
some half dozen years, I submit to your
right; and the more readily, as I am just now
too happy to quarrel about any thing; but
excuse
me, I must quicken my pace to overtake this
girl, who trips it along as if she had Mercury's
wings on those pretty feet.
Ah, that's a foot to leave its print in the
memory
,
said the elder gentleman, in an animated
and natural tone, that eagerly as his companion
was pressing on, did not escape his observation.
They had now approached the parties they
were pursuing, near enough to hear their voices,
and catch a few words of their conversation.
You say it's edifying, and all that, said the
shortest of the two young ladies, in reply to what
seemed, from the tone in which it was concluded,
to have been an expostulation; and I dare say,
dear Esther, you are quite right, for you are as
wise as Solomon, and always in the right; but
for my part, I confess, I had infinitely rather be at
home drying marigolds, and matching
embroidery
silks for aunt Grafton.
Hope Leslie! by Heaven! exclaimed the
young man, springing forward. The young lady
turned at the sound of her name, uttered a scream
of joy, and under the impulse of strong affection
and sudden delight, threw her arms around the
stranger's neck, and was folded in the embrace of
Everell Fletcher.
The next instant, the consciousness that the
street was an awkward place for such a
demonstration
of happiness, or, perhaps, the thought that the
elegant young man before her was no longer the
play-fellow of her childhood, suffused her neck and
face with the deepest crimson; and a sort of
exculpatory exclamation of, I was so surprised!
burst from her lips, and extorted a smile even
from Everell's new acquaintance, whose gravity
had all the fixedness of premeditation.
For a moment, Everell's eyes were rivetted to
Hope Leslie's face, which he seemed to compare
with the image in his memory. Yes, he said,
as if thinking aloud, the same face that I saw,
for the first time, peeping through my curtains,
the day Digby brought me home to Bethelhow
is Digby?my dear father?Mrs. Grafton?the
Winthrops?every body?
All, all well; but I must defer particulars till
I have introduced you to my friend, Miss
Downing
.
Miss Downing! is it possible! exclaimed
Everell, and a recognition followed, which shewed,
that though he had not, before, observed the lady,
who had turned aside, and was sheltered under
the thick folds of a veil, the parties were not
unknown
to each other. Miss Leslie now drew her
friend's arm within hers, and as she did so, she
perceived
Vol. I. 19
she trembled excessively; but too
considerate
to remark an agitation, which it was
obvious
the lady did not mean to betray, she did not
appear to notice it, and proceeded to give Everell
such particulars of his friends, as he must be most
impatient to hear. She told him that his father
was in Boston, and that in compliance with his
son's wishes, he had determined to fix his
residence
there. Everell was rejoiced at this decision,
for gloomy recollections were, in his mind, always
associated with Bethel, and he was never happy
when he thought of the dangers to which Miss
Leslie was exposed there.
My last letters from America, he said,
informed
me that you had as yet no tidings from
your sister, or my friend Magawisca.
Nor have we nowstill I cling to my belief,
that my poor sister will some day be restored to
me; Nelema's promise is prophecy to me.
They had by this time reached Governor
Winthrop's
.
Miss Downing withdrew her arm from
her friend, with the intention of retiring to her
own apartment; but her steps faltered, and she
sunk down in the first chair she could reach,
hoping
to escape all observation in the bustle of joy
occasioned by the unexpected arrival of Everell;
and she did so, excepting that her aunt called the
colour to her cheek, by saying, My dear Esther,
you have sadly fatigued yourselfyou are as pale
as death! and Hope Leslie, noticing that
Everell
cast stolen glances of anxious inquiry at her
friend, made, with the usual activity of a romantic
imagination, a thousand conjectures as to the
nature
of their acquaintance. But there was
nothing
said or done to assist her speculations, and
while the governor was looking over a letter of
introduction, presented to him by Everell's chance
acquaintance, who had announced himself by the
name of Sir Philip Gardiner, the young ladies
withdrew to their own apartment.
CHAPTER X.
A pensive Nun, devout and pure,
Sober, stedfast, and demure.
Il Penseroso
.
When
the two ladies were alone, there were a
few moments of embarrassed and uninterrupted
silence, a rare occurrence between two
confidential
young friends. Hope Leslie was the first to
speak. Come, my dear Esther, she said, it
is in vain for you to think of hiding your heart
from me; if you do not fairly conduct me through
its mazes, I shall make use of the clue you have
dropped, and find my own way through the
labyrinth
.
Hope Lesliewhat clue do you mean? You
should not trifle thus.
Well then, I will be as serious as you please,
and most solemnly demand why thou hast never
hinted to the friend of thy bosom, that thou hadst
seen, in thine own country, this youth, Everell
Fletcher, of whom I have, at divers times and
sun-dry
places, most freely spoken to thee?
I never told you I had not seen him.
Oh no! but methinks, for a godly, gracious
maiden, as thou art, Esther; approved by our
elders
,
the pattern of our deacons' wives; your
actions, as well as your language, should be the
gospel `yea, yea, and nay, nay;' this `paltering
with a double sense,' as the poet has it, would
better become a profane damsel, like myself.
If I have lacked sincerity, I merit your
reproach
;
but I meant to have told you. Mr.
Fletcher's arrival now was unexpected
And you were indisposed? your nerves
deranged
?
your circulations disordered? I thought
so, when I saw that burning blush, that looked,
even through the folds of your veil, as if it would
set it on fire; but now your surprise is over, why
look so like the tragic muse? Raise up your eyes
and look at me, dear Esther, and do not let those
long eye-lashes droop over your pale cheek, like a
weeping willow over the monumental marble.
Oh, Hope Leslie! if it were not sinful, I could
wish that monumental marble might press the
clods on my cold bosom.
Hope was startled at the unaffected solemnity,
and deep distress, of her friend: every pulsation
of her heart was audible, and her lips, which
before
were as pale as death, became absolutely
blue. She threw her arms around her, and kissed
her tenderly. Dear, dear Esther, she said,
forgive me for offending thee. I never will ask
thee any thing againnever, so long as I live.
You may look glad, or sorryblush, or faintdo
any thing you please, and I never will ask you for
a reason.
19*
You are very kind, very generous, Hope; but
have you not, already, guessed the secret I have
striven to hide?you hesitateanswer me
truly.
Why, then, if I must answer truly
perhaps
,
I have, replied Hope, looking, in spite of
herself, as archly as the mischievous little god,
when he sees one of his own arrows trembling
in the heart;  `set a thief to catch a thief,'
dear Esther, is an old maxim; and though I have
never felt this nervous malady, yet, you know, I
am skilled in the books that describe the
symptoms
,
thanks to aunt Grafton's plentiful stock of
romances and plays.
Oh most unprofitable skill! but I have no
right to reproach thee, since what hath been but
the sport of thy imagination, is my experience
degrading experience. Whatever it may cost
me, you shall know all, Hope Leslie. You have
justly reproached me with insincerityI will, at
least, lighten my conscience of the burden of that
sin.
Hope's curiosity was on tiptoe; and
notwithstanding
her generous resolution, not
voluntarily
to penetrate her friend's mystery, she was
delighted with the dawn of a disclosure, which,
she believed, would amount to a simple confession
of a tender sentiment. She sincerely pitied Miss
Downing's sufferings; but it is, perhaps,
impossible
for a third person to sympathise fully with
feelings of this nature. Now, Esther, she said,
sportively, fancy me to be the priest, and
yourself
the penitent. Confess freely, daughterour
holy church, through me, her most unworthy
servant
,
doth offer thee full absolution.
Stop, stop, Hope Lesliedo not trifle with
holy words, and most unholy rites; but listen,
seriously
,
and compassionate a weakness that can
never be forgotten.
Miss Downing then proceeded to relate some
of the following particulars; but as her narrative
was confused by her emotions, and as it is
necessary
our readers should, for the sake of its
illustration
,
be possessed of some circumstances which
were omitted by her, we here give it, more
distinctly
,
in our own language.
Esther was the daughter of Emanuel Downing,
the husband of Governor Winthrop's sister, so
often mentioned by that gentleman in his journal,
as the faithful and useful friend of the pilgrims,
whom he finally joined in New-England.
Esther Downing was of a reserved, tender, and
timid cast of character, and being bred in the
strictest
school of the puritans, their doctrines and
principles
easily commingled with the natural qualities
of her mind. She could not have disputed the
nice points of faith, sanctification and
justification
,
with certain celebrated contemporary
female
theologians, but no one excelled her in the
practical part of her religion. In the language
of the times, justification was witnessed, both by
word, and work.
That young ladies were then indulged in a
moderate
degree of personal embellishment, we learn
from one of the severest pilgrim satirists, who
avers, that he was `no cynic to the due
bravery
of the true gentry,' and allows that `a good text
always deserves a fair margent.' Miss Downing
was certainly a pure and beautiful `text,' but her
attire never varied from the severest gospel
simplicity
.
It is possible that she was fortified in this
self-denying virtue, by that lively little spirit, (that
ever hovers about a woman's toilette) whispering
in her ear, that all the arts of the tyring-woman
could not improve the becomingness of her
Madonna
style. She wore her hair, which was of a
sober brown hue, parted on her forehead, and
confined behind in a braid that was so adjusted,
it may be accidentally, as to perfectly define the
graceful contour of her head. Her complexion
was rather pale, but so exquisitely fair and
transparent
,
that it showed the faintest tinge of colour,
and set off, to the greatest advantage, features,
which, if not striking, had the admitted beauty
of perfect symmetry. She was, at least, half
a head taller than our heroine, or the Venus de
Medicis; but as neither of these were
standards
with the pilgrims, no one who ventured to
speak of the personal graces of Esther Downing,
ever impeached their perfection. Spiritual graces
were then, (as they should always be) in far higher
estimation, than external charms, and Miss
Downing
,
who would have been a reigning belle in our
degenerate times, was always characterized by a
religious epithetshe was the `godly,' or the
`gracious maiden.' She attained the age of
nineteen
,
without one truant wish straying beyond the
narrow bound of domestic duty and religious
exercises
;
but the course of youth and beauty `
never
doth run smooth,' and the perils that
commonly
beset it, now assailed the tender Esther.
Everell Fletcher came to her father's, to pass
two months. He had then, for some years,
resided
in the family of his uncle Stretton, a
moderate
churchman; who, though he had not seen
fit to eradicate the religious and political
principles
that had been planted in the mind of the boy,
had so tempered them, that, to confess the truth,
the man fell far below the standard of puritanism.
At first Esther was rather shocked, by the
unsubdued
gaiety, the unconstrained freedom, and the
air of a man of society, that distinguished
Everell
from the few demure solemn young men of
her acquaintance; but there is an irresistible charm
in ease, simplicity, and frankness, when chastened
by the refinements of education, and there is a
natural affinity in youth, even when there is no
resemblance in the character; and Esther
Downing
,
who, at first, remained in Everell's presence
but just as long as the duties of hospitality
required
,
soon found herself lingering in the
parlor
,
and strolling in the walks, that were his
favourite
resort. It seemed as if the sun had risen
on her after a polar winter, and cheerfulness and
her pleasant train sprung up in a mind that had
been chilled and paralyzed by the absence of
whatever cherishes the gay temper of youth; but
it was, after all, but the stinted growth of a polar
summer.
She felt a change stealing over hernew
thoughs were in her heart
And love and happiness their theme.
She did not investigate the cause of this change,
but suffered the current of her feelings to flow
unchecked, till she was roused to reflection by her
serving maid, who said to her mistress, one evening
when she came in from a long moon-light walk with
Everell, our worthy minister has been here
to-day
,
and he asked me, what kept you from the
lecture-room, so oft, of late? I minded him it
rained last night. He said, that in months past
no tempest detained you from the place of
worship
.
I made no answer to thatbeside, that it
was not for me to gainsay the minister He stood,
as if meditating a minute, and then he took up
your psalm-book, and, as he did so, a paper
dropped with some verses written on it, and
he said, with almost a smile, `ah, Judy, then
your young lady tries her hand, sometimes, at
versifying the words of the royal psalmist?'
Did he look at the lines, Judy? asked
Esther
,
blushing deeply with the consciousness that
they were but a profane sentimental effusion.
Yes, my ladybut he looked solemnized and
said nothing more about them; but turning to me
and speaking as if he would ask a question, he
said, `Judy, it was your mistress' wont to keep
the wheel of prayer in perpetual motion. I doubt
not her private duty is still faithfully done?' I
answered to him, that your honoured parents had
been absent the last week, and you had company
to entertain, and you were not quite as long at
closet-exercise as usual.
Judy, you were very ready with your excuses
for me, said her mistress, after a moment's
thoughtfulness.
It must be a dumb dog, indeed, replied the
girl, that cannot bark for such a kind mistress
as thou art.
How often does an accidenta casual word
evenserve as a key to unlock feelings of which
the possessor has been unconscious. The
conscientious
girl was suddenly awakened from what
appeared to her a sinful dream. Had she
perceived
,
on investigation, a reciprocal sentiment
in Everell Fletcher, she would probably have
permitted
her feelings to flow in their natural
channel
;
but not mingling with his, they were, like a
stream, that being dammed-up, flows back, and
spreads desolation, where it should have produced
life and beauty.
The severest religionists of the times did not
require
the extinction of the tenderest human
affections
.
On the contrary, there was, perhaps,
never
a period when they were more frequently and
perfectly illustrated. How many delicate women,
whom the winds of heaven had never visited
roughly, subscribed with their lives to that
beatiful
declaration of affection from a tender and
devoted wifeWhithersoever your fatall
destinie
,
she said to her husband, shall dryve you,
eyther by the furious waves of the great ocean,
or by the manifolde and horrible dangers of the
lande, I will surely beare you company. There
can be no peryll chaunce to me so terrible, nor
any kynde of deathe so cruell, that shall not be
much easier for me to abyde than to live so farre
separate from you.
But though human affections were permitted,
they were to be in manifest subservience to
religious
devotiontheir encroachments were
watched
with a vigilance resembling the jealousy with
which the Israelites defended, from every profane
footstep, the holy circle around the ark of the
living
God. It was this jealousy that now alarmed
the fearful superstitious girl; and after some days
of the most unsparing self-condemnation,
embittered
by an indefinite feeling of disappointment,
she fell into a dangerous illness; and in the
paroxysms
of her fever, she prayed fervently that
her Creator would resume the spirit, which had
been too weak, to maintain its fidelity. It
seemed as if her prayer were soon to be
granted
she
felt herself, and was pronounced by her
physician, to be on the verge of the grave. She
then was inspired with a strong desire,
proceeding
,
as she believed, from a divine intimation,
but which might possibly have sprung from
natural feeling, to open her heart to Everell.
This disclosure, followed by her dying
admonition
,
would, she hoped, rescue him from the
vanities
of youth. She accordingly requested her
mother to conduct him to her bedside, and to
leave them alone for a few moments; and when
her request was complied with, she made, to the
astonished youth, in the simplicity and sincerity
of her heart, a confession, that in other
circumstances
the rack would not have extorted.
At first, Fletcher fancied her reason was
touched
.
He soothed her, and attempted to
withdraw
,
to call her attendants. She interpreted his
thoughts, assured him he was mistaken, and begged
that he would not waste one moment of her
ebbing
life. He then knelt at her bedside, took her
burning hand in his, and bathed it with tears of
deep commiseration, and tender regret. He
promised
to lay up her exhortations in his heart, and
cherish them as the law of his life; but he did
not intimate that he had ever felt a sentiment
responding
to hers. There was that in the
solemnity
of the death-bed, in her purity and truth, that
would have rebuked the slightest insincerity,
however benevolent the feeling that dictated it.
This strange interview lasted but a few
moments
.
Miss Downing, in the energy of her
feeling
,
raised herself on her elbowthe effort
exhausted
her, and she sunk back in a stupor which
Vol. I. 20
appeared to be the immediate precursor of death.
Her friends flocked around her, and Fletcher
retired
to his own room, filled with sorrowful
concern
at the involuntary influence he had exercised
on this sensitive being, who seemed to him far
better fitted for heaven, than for earth.
But Miss Downing was not destined yet to be
translated to a more congenial sphere. Her
unburthened
heart reposed, after its long strugglesthe
original cause of her disease was lightened, if not
removed, and the e!asticity of a youthful
constitution
rose victorious over her malady. She never
mentioned Everell Fletcher; but she heard,
incidentally
,
that he had remained at her father's, till
she was pronounced out of danger, and had then
gone to his uncle Stretton's, in Suffolk.
The following autumn, her father, in compliance
with a request of Madam Winthrop, and in the
hope that a voyage would benefit her health, which
was still delicate, sent her to Boston. There she
met Hope Lesliea bright gay spiritan allegro
to her penseroso. They were unlike in every thing
that distinguished each; and it was therefore
more probable, judging from experience, that
they would become mutually attached.
Whatever
the theory of the affections may be, the fact
was, that they soon became inseparable and
confidential
friends. Hope sometimes ventured to
rally Esther on her over-scrupulousness, and Miss
Downing often rebuked the laughing girl's gaiety;
but, however variant their dispositions, they
melted into each other, like light and shade, each
enhancing the beauty and effect of the other.
Hope often spoke of Everell, for he was
associated
with all the most interesting recollections of
her childhood, and probably with her visions of the
future; for what girl of seventeen has not a lord
for her air-built castles?
Miss Downing listened calmly to her description
of the hero of her imagination, but never, by word
or sign, gave token that she knew aught of him,
other than was told her; and the secret might
have died with her, had not her emotion, at
Everell's
unexpected appearance, half revealed the
state of her heart to her quick-sighted friend.
This revelation she finished by a full confession,
interrupted by tears of bitter mortification.
Oh! she concluded, had I but known
how to watch and rule my own spirit, I should
have been saved these pangs of remorse and
shame.
My dear Esther, said Hope, brushing away
the tears of sympathy that suffused her eyes,
I assure you I am not crying because I
consider
it a crying case; you people that dwell
in the clouds have always a mist before you;
now I can see that your path is plain, and sure
the end thereof; just give yourself up to my
guidance, who, though not half so good and wise
as you are, am far more sure-footed. I do not
doubt in the least, Everell feels all he ought
to feel. I defy any body to know you and not
love you, Esther. And do you not see, that if he
had made any declaration at the time, it might
have seemed as if he were moved by pity, or
gratitude. He knew you was coming to
New-England
,
and that he was to follow you; and
now he has anticipated his return by some weeks,
and why, nobody knows, and it must be because
you are heredon't you think so? You will not
speak, but I know by your smile what you think,
as well as if you did.
Arguments appear very sound that are fortified
by our wishes, and Miss Downing's face was
assuming
a more cheerful expression, when Jennet
(our old friend Jennet) came into the room to
give the young ladies notice to prepare for dinner,
and to inform them that Sir Philip Gardiner was
to dine with themand a godly appearing man
he is, said Jennet, as ever I laid my eyes on; and
it is a wonder to me, that our Mr. Everell should
have fallen into such profitable company, for, I am
sorry to see it, and loath to say it, he looks as gay
as when he used to play his mad pranks at Bethel
when it was next to an impossibility to keep you
and him, Miss Hope, from talking and laughing
even on a Sabbath day. I think, she continued,
glancing her eye at Miss Downing, sober
companions
do neither of you any good; and it is so
strange Mr. Everell should come home with his
hair looking like one of those heathen pictures of
your aunt's.
Oh! hush Jennet! It would be a sin to crop
those dark locks of Mr. Everell.
A sin indeed, Miss Leslie! That is the way
you always turn things wrong side out; a sin to
to have his hair cropped like his father'sor the
honourable Governor'sor this Sir Philip
Gardiner's
or
any other christian man's.
Well, Jennet, I wish it would come into your
wise head, that christian tongues were not made
for railing. As to my being serious to-day, that is
entirely out of the question; therefore, you may
spare yourself hint and exhortation, and go to
my aunt, and ask her for my blue boddice and
necklace. But noshe said, stopping Jennet,
for she recollected that she had directed the
blue boddice because it matched her blue fillet,
Everell's gift, and a secret voice told her she had
best, under existing circumstances, lay that
favourite
badge aside. No, Jennet, bring me my
pink boddice, and my ruby locket. Jennet
obeyed, but not without muttering as she left the
room, a remonstrance against the vanities of
dress.
Jennet was one of those persons, abounding in
every class of life, whose virtues are most
conspicuous
in damning sins they are not inclined
to. We ought, perhaps, to apologise for
obtruding
so humble and disagreeable a personage upon
our readers. But the truth is, she figured too
much on the family record of the Fletchers, to
be suppressed by their faithful historian. Those
20*
personages, yclep'd bores in the copious
vocabulary
of modern times, seem to be a necessary
ingredient in life, and like pinching shoes, and
smoky rooms, constitute a portion of its trials.
Jennet had first found favour with Mrs. Fletcher
from her religious exterior. To employ none
but godly servants was a rule of the pilgrims;
and there were certain set phrases and modes
of dress, which produced no slight impression
upon the minds of the credulous. To do
Jennet justice, she had many temporal virtues;
and though her religion was of the ritual order,
and, therefore, particularly disagreeable to her
spiritual Mistress, yet her household faculties
were invaluable, for then, as now, in the interior
of New-England, a faithful servant was like the
genius of a fairy taleno family could hope for
more than one.
Long possession legalized Jennet's rights, and
increased her tyrannical humours, which were
naturally most freely exercised on those members
of the family, who had grown from youth to
maturity
under her eye. In nothing was the
sweetness
of Hope Leslie's temper more conspicuous,
than in the perfect good nature with which she
bore the teasing impertinencies of this menial,
who, like a cross cur, was ready to bark at every
passer by.
Youth and beauty abridge the labours of the
toilet, and our young friends, though on this
occasion
unusually solicitous about the impression
they were to make, were not long in attiring
themselves; and when Mrs. Grafton presented
herself to attend them to dinner, they were
awaiting
her. Upon my word, she said, young
ladies, you have done honour to the occasion; it
is not every day we have two gentlemen fresh from
Old England to dine with us; I am glad you have
shown yourselves sensible of the importance of
the becomings. It is every woman's duty, upon
all occasions, to look as well as she can.
And a duty so faithfully performed, my dear
aunt, said Hope, that I fancy, like other duties,
it becomes easy from habit.
Easy, replied Mrs. Grafton, with perfect
naivet; second nature, my dearsecond
nature
.
I was taught from a child, to determine
the first thing in the morning, what I should wear
that day; and now it is as natural to me as to
open my eyes when I wake.
I should think, madam, said Esther, that
other and higher thoughts were more fitting a
rational creature, preserved through the
night-watches
.
Hope was exquisitely susceptible to her aunt's
frailties, but she would fain have sheltered them
from the observation of others. Now, my
gentle
Esther, she whispered to Miss Downing,
lecturing is not your vocation, and this is not
lecture day. On jubilee days slaves were set free,
you know, and why should not follies be?
Miss Downing could not have failed to have
made some sage reply to her friend's casuistry,
but the ringing of a bell announced the dinner,
and the young ladies, arm in arm, followed Mrs.
Grafton to the dining-room. Just as they
entered
,
Hope whispered, remember, Esther, the
festal
day is sacred, and may not be violated by a
sad countenance. This was a well-timed
caution
;
it called a slight tinge to Miss Downing's
cheeks, and relieved her too expressive paleness.
Everell Fletcher met them at the door. The
light of his happiness seemed to gild every object.
He complimented Mrs. Grafton on her
appearance
;
told her she had not, in the least, changed
since he saw heran implied compliment, always,
after a woman has passed a
certain age
. He
congratulated
Miss Downing upon the very apparent
effect of the climate on her health, and then,
breaking through the embarrassment that slightly
constrained him in addressing her, he turned to
Hope Leslie, and they talked of the past, the
present
,
and the future, with spontaneous animation;
their feelings according and harmonising, as
naturally
as the music of the stars when they sang
together.
CHAPTER XI.
Our New-England shall tell and
boast
of her
Winthrop,
a
Lawgiver
as patient as
Lycurgus,
but not admitting any of
his
criminal disorders; as devout as Numa, but not liable to
any of
his
heathenish madnesses; a Governor in whom the
excellencies of
christianity
made a most improving addition
unto the
virtues,
wherein, even without
those,
he would have
made a
parallel
for the great men of
Greece
or of
Rome,
which
the pen of a
Plutarch
has eternized.
Cotton Mather
.
We
hold ourselves bound by all the laws of
decorum
,
to give our readers a formal introduction
to the government-mansion, and its inmates.
The house stood in the main street, (
Washington-street
)
on the ground now occupied by `
South-row
.'
There was a little court in front of it: on
one side, a fine garden; on the other, a beautiful
lawn, or, as it was called, `green,' extending to
the corner on which the `Old South' (church)
now stands, and an ample yard and offices in the
rear.
The mighty master of fiction has but to wave
the wand of his office, to present the past to his
readers, with all the vividness and distinctness of
the present; but we, who follow him at an
immeasurable
distancewe who have no magician's
enchantments, wherewith we can imitate the
miracles
wrought by the rod of the prophet; we
must betake ourselves to the compass and the
rule, and set forth our description as minutely and
exactly, as if we were making out an inventory
for a salesman. In obedience to this necessity,
we offer the following detailed description of
the internal economy of a pilgrim mansion, not
on any apocryphal authority, but quoted from an
authentic record of the times.
In the principal houses was a great hall,
ornamented
with pictures; a great lantern; velvet
cushions in the window-seat to look into the
garden
:
on either side, a great parlour, a little
parlour
or study, furnished with great looking-glasses,
turkey carpets, window-curtains and valance,
picture and a map, a brass clock, red leather back
chairs, a great pair of brass andirons. The
chambers
well furnished with feather-beds,
warming-pans
,
and every other elegance and comfort. The
pantry well filled with substantial fare and
dainties
,
Madeira wine, prunes, marmalade,
silver-tankards
and wine-cups, not uncommon.
If any are incredulous as to the correctness of
the above extract, we assure them that its truth
is confirmed by the spaciousness of the pilgrim
habitations still standing in Boston, and occupied
by their descendants. These pilgrims were not
needy adventurers, nor ruined exiles. Mr.
Winthrop
himself, had an estate in England, worth
seven hundred pounds per annum. Some of his
associates
came from lordly halls, and many of them
brought wealth, as well as virtue, to the colony.
The rigour of the climate, and the
embarrassments
incident to their condition, often reduced
the pilgrims, in their earliest period, to the wants
of extreme poverty; but their sufferings had the
dignity and merit of being voluntary, and are
now, as the tattered garments of the saints are to
the faithful, sacred in the eyes of their posterity.
Our humble history has little to do with the
public life of Governor Winthrop, which is so
well known to have been illustrated by the rare
virtue of disinterested patriotism, and by such
even and paternal goodness, that a contemporary
witty satirist could not find it in his heart to give
him a harsher name than `Sir John Temperwell.'
His figure, (if we may believe the portrait that
honourably decorates the wall of his lineal
descendant
)
was tall and spare; his eye, dark blue,
and mild in its expression: he had the upraised
brow, which is said to be indicative of a religious
disposition; his hair, and his beard which he wore
long, were black. On the whole, we must
confess
,
the external man presents the solemn and
forbidding aspect of the times in which he
flourished
;
though we know him to have been a model
of private virtue, gracious and gentle in his
manners
,
and exact in the observance of all
gentlemanly
courtesy.
His wife was admirably qualified for the station
she occupied. She recognised, and continually
taught to matron and maiden, the duty of
unqualified
obedience from the wife to the husband,
her appointed lord and master; a duty that it
was left to modern heresy to dispute; and which
our pious fathers, or even mothers, were so far
from questioning, that the only divine right to
govern, which they acknowledged, was that
vested
in the husband over the wife. Madam
Winthrop's
matrimonial virtue never degenerated into
the slavishness of fear, or the obsequiousness of
servility. If authorised and approved by
principle
,
it was prompted by feeling; and, if we may
be allowed a coarse comparison, like a horse easy
on the bit, she was guided by the slightest
intimation
from him who held the rein; indeedto
pursue our humble illustration still fartherit
sometimes appeared as if the reins were dropped,
and the inferior animal were left to the guidance
of her own sagacity.
Without ever overstepping the limits of
feminine
propriety, Madam Winthrop manifestly
enjoyed
the dignity of her official station, and felt
that if the governor were the greater, she was the
lesser light. There was a slight tinge of official
importance in her manner of conferring her
hospitalities
,
and her counsel; but she seemed rather
to intend to heighten the value of the gift, than
the merit of the giver.
Governor Winthrop possessed the patriarchal
blessing of a numerous offspring; but as they
were in no way associated with the personages of
our story, we have not thought fit to encumber it
with any details concerning them.
We return from our long digression to the party
we left in Governor Winthrop's parlour.
The tables were arranged for dinner. Tables,
we say, for a side-table was spread, but in a
manner
so inferior to the principal board, which was
garnished with silver tankards,
wine cups,
and rich
china, as to indicate that it was destined for
inferior
guests. This indication was soon verified,
for on a servant being sent to announce dinner
to Governor Winthrop, who was understood to
be occupied with some of the natives on state
business; that gentleman appeared attended by
four IndiansMiantunnomoh, the young and
noble chief of the Narragansetts, two of his
counsellors
,
and an interpreter. Hope turned to
Everell to remark on the graceful gestures by
which they expressed their salutations to the
companyGood heavens! she exclaimed,
Everell, what ails you? for she saw he was as
pale as death.
Nothing, nothing, said Everell, wishing to
avoid observation, and turning towards the
window
:
he then added in explanation to Hope,
who followed him, these are the first Indians I
have seen since my return, and they brought, too
vividly to mind, my dear mother's death.
Governor Winthrop motioned to his Indian
guests to take their seats at the side-table, and
the rest of the company, including the elder
Vol. I. 21
Fletcher and Cradock, surrounded the dinner
table
,
and serving-men and all, reverently folded
their arms and bowed their heads, while the grace,
or prefatory prayer, was pronouncing.
After all the rest had taken their seats, the
Indians
remained standing; and although the
governor
politely signified to the interpreter that
their delay wronged the smoking viands, they
remained motionless, the chief drawn aside from
the rest, his eye cast down, his brow lowering,
and his whole aspect expressive of proud
displeasure
.
The governor rose and demanded of the
interpreter
the meaning of their too evident
dissatisfaction
.
My chief bids me say, replied the savage,
that he expects such treatment from the English
saggamore, as the English receive in the wigwam
of the Narragansett chief. He says, that when
the English stranger visits him, he sits on his mat,
and eats from his dish.
Tell your chief, replied the governor, who
had urgent state reasons for conciliating
Miantunnomoh
,
that I pray him to overlook the wrong
I have done him; he is right; he deserves the
place of honour. I have heard of his hospitable
deeds, and that he doth give more than even
ground to his guests; for our friend, Roger
Williams
,
informed us, that he hath known him,
with his family, to sleep abroad to make room in
his wigwam for English visitors.
Governor Winthrop added the last
circumstance
,
partly as a full confession of his fault, and
partly as an apology to his help-mate, who looked
a good deal disconcerted by the disarrangement
of her dinner. However, she proceeded to give
the necessary orders; the table was remodelled
a sufficient addition made, and the haughty chief,
his countenance relaxing to an expression of grave
satisfaction, took his seat at the governor's right
hand. His associates being properly
accommodated
at the table, the rest of the company
resumed
their stations.
Everell cast his eye around on the various
viands which covered the hospitable board.
Times have mended, he said to Madam
Winthrop
,
in my absence. I remember once sitting
down with my father, to a good man's table, on
which was nothing but a sorry dish of clams; but
our host made up for the defect of his
entertainment
by the excess of his gratitude, for, as I
remember
,
he gave thanks that `we were permitted
to eat of the abundance of the seas, and of
treasures
hid in the sand.'
Hope Leslie understood so well the temper of
the company she was in, that she instantly
perceived
a slight depression of their mercury at
what appeared to them, a tone of levity in
Everell. She interposed her shield. What
may we expect for the future, she said, if now it
seems strange to us, that ten years ago, the best in
the colony were reduced to living upon muscles,
acorns, and ground nuts; and that our bountiful
governor
,
having shared his flour and meat with the
poorest in the land, had his last batch of bread in
the oven, when the ship with succours arrived?
the Lion, or the Blessing of the Baywhich was
it, Master Cradock? for it was you who told me
the story, she added, bending towards Cradock,
who sat opposite to her.
Cradock, who always felt, at the slightest notice
from Hope, an emotion similar to that of a pious
catholic
,
when he fancies the image of the saint he
worships to bend propitiously towards him;
Cradock
dropped his knife and fork, and erecting his
body with one of those sudden jerks
characteristic
of awkward men, he hit the elbow of a servant
who was just placing a gravy-boat on the table,
and brought the gravy down on his little brown
wig, whence it found its way, in many a bubbling
rill, over his face, neck, and shoulders.
A murmur of sympathy and suppressed
laughter
ran around the table; and while a servant, at
his mistress' bidding, was applying napkins to
Cradock, he seemed only intent on replying to
Miss Lesile. It was the Lion, Miss Hopeha
indeeda wonderful memoryyes, yesit was
the Lion. The Blessing of the Bay was the
governor's
own vessel.
That name, said Sir Philip Gardiner, in a
low tone to Hope Leslie, next whom he sat,
should, I think, have been reserved, where
names are significant, for a more just
appropriation
.
He spoke in a tone of confidential gallantry so
discordant with his demeanor, that the fair
listener
lost the matter in the manner, and turning
to him with one of those looks so confounding to
a man who means to speak but to one ear in the
companyWhat did you say, sir? she asked.
He said, my dear, said Mrs. Grafton, who sat
at the knight's left hand, and who would have
considered it worse to suppress a compliment, than
to conceal treason; he said, my dear, that you
should have been named, the Blessing of the
Bay.
Sir Philip recoiled a little at this flat version of
his compliment; but he had other interests to
sustain
,
more important than his knightly courtesy,
and he was just contriving something to say,
which might secure him a safe passage past Scylla
and Charybdis, when Madam Winthrop, who was
exclusively occupied with the duty of presiding,
begged Sir Philip would change his plate, and
take a piece of wild turkey, which she could
recommend
as savoury and tender; or, a piece of
the venisonthe venison, she said, was a present
from the son of their good old friend and ally,
Chicatabot, and she was sure it was of the best.
The knight declined the proffered delicacies,
alleging he had already been tempted to excess
by the cod's-head and shouldersa rarity to a
European.
21*
But, said Miss Leslie, you will not dine on
fish alone, and on Friday toowhy we shall
suspect
you of being a Romanist.
If there was any thing in the unwonted blush
that deepened the knight's complexion, which
might lead an observer to suspect that an aimless
dart had touched a vulnerable point, he adroitly
averted suspicion by saying, that he trusted
temperance and self-denial were not confined to
a corrupt and superstitious church, and that for
himself, he found much use in voluntary
mortifications
of appetite.
Fastings oft, said Cradock, who had been
playing the part of a valiant trencherman, taking
liberally of all of the various feast, fastings oft
are an excellent thing for those who have grace
for them; and yours, Sir Philip, if one may judge
from the ruddiness of your complexion, are
wonderfully
prospered. The knight received the
simple compliment with a silent bow.
Cradock turned to Miss Downing, who sat on
his rightNow, Miss Esther, you do wrong
yourself; there is that pigeon's wing, just as I
gave it to you.
Hope Leslie looked up with a deprecating
glance, as if she would have said, `Heaven help
my tutor! he never moves without treading on
somebody's toes.'
Is not Miss Downing well? asked the elder
Fletcher, who now, for the first time, noticed that
she looked unusually pale and pensive.
Perfectly well, said Esther.
Indifferently well, my dear, you mean, said
Madam Winthrop. Esther, she added,
always
feeds like a Canary bird; but I never
despair
of a young ladythey have all the cameleon
gift of living upon air.
Will Miss Downing mend her appetite with
wine, asked young Fletcher, and allow me the
honour of taking it with her?
Everell! exclaimed Hope, touching his
elbow
,
but not in time to check him.
My son! said his father, in a voice of rebuke.
Mr. Fletcher! exclaimed Governor
Winthrop
,
in a tone of surprise.
What have I done now? asked Everell of
Hope Leslie; but Hope was too much diverted
with his mistake and honest consternation to
reply.
You have done nothing inexcusable, my young
friend, said the governor; for you probably
did not know that the vain custom of drinking,
one to another, has been disused, at my table, for
ten years; and that our general court prohibited
this `employment of the creature out of its
natural
use,' by their order, in the year of our Lord,
1639, four years since; so that the custom hath
become quite obsolete with us, though it may be
still in practice among our laxer brethren of
England
.
With due deference I speak, said Everell,
to my elders and superiors; but it really appears
to me to border on the quixotism of fighting
wind-mills
,
to make laws against so innocent a
custom
.
No vanity is innocent, Mr. Everell Fletcher,
replied the governor, as you will, yourself, after
proper consideration, confess. Tell me, when but
now, you would have proffered wishes of health
to my niece, Esther, was it not an empty
compliment
,
and not meant by you for an argument of
love, which should always be unfeigned?
The governor's proposition appeared to himself
to be merely an abstract metaphysical truth; but
to the younger part of his audience, at least, it
conveyed much more than met the ear.
Miss Downing blushed deeply, and Everell
attempted
,
in vain, to stammer a reply. Hope
Leslie perceived the pit, and essayed a safe passage
over it. Esther, she said, Everell shall not
be our knight at tilt or tournament, if he cannot
use the lance your uncle has dropped at his feet.
Are there not always, Everell, in your heart,
arguments
of love unfeigned, when you drink to the
health of a fair lady?
Before Everell had time to reply, except by a
sparkling glance, the governor said, This is
somewhat too light a discussion of a serious
topic.
This rebuke quenched, at once, the spark of
gaiety Hope had kindled, and the dinner, never a
prolonged meal in this pattern mansion, was
finished without any other conversation than that
exacted by the ordinary courtesies of the table.
After the repast was ended, the Indian chief
took his leave with much fainter expressions of
attachment than he had vouchsafed on a former
visit, as the governor had afterwards occasion to
remember.
The party dispersed in various directions, and
the governor withdrew, with the elder Fletcher, to
his study. When there, Governor Winthrop
lighted his pipe, a luxury in which he sparingly
indulged; and then, looking over a packet of
letters, he selected one, and handed it to Mr.
Fletcher, saying, There is an epistle from
brother
Downing which your son has brought to me.
Read it, yourself; you will perceive that he has
stated his views on a certain subject, interesting
to you, and to us all; and stated them directly,
without any of the circumlocution and ambiguity,
which a worldly-minded man would have
employed
on a like occasion.
Mr. Downing introduced the important topic of
his epistle, which Mr. Fletcher read with the
deepest
attention, by saying that Fletcher, junior,
returns
to the colony, a fit instrument, as I trust, to
promote its welfare and honour. He is gifted with
divers and goodly talents, and graced with
sufficient
learning.
I have often been sorely wounded at hearing
the censures passed on our brother Fletcher, for
having sent his son into the bosom of a prelatical
family, but I confidently believe the youth returns
to his own country with his puritan principles
uncorrupted
;
although, it is too true, as our stricter
brethren often remark, that he has little of the
outward man of a `pilgrim indeed.'
He is, brother Winthrop, a high-metalled
youth, and on this account I feel, as you doubtless
will, the urgency of coupling him with a member
of the congregation, and one who may, in all
likelihood
,
accomplish for him that precious promise
of the apostle, `the believing wife shall sanctify
the unbelieving husband.'
I have already taken the first step towards
bringing about so desirable an end, by inviting
the young man to my house, where he spent two
months of the summer. I then favoured his
intimate
intercourse with my well-beloved daughter
Esther, whose outward form, I may say without
boasting, is a fit temple for the spirit within.
Mr. Downing then proceeded to state some
circumstances already known to the reader, and
particularly dwelt on Everell's remaining at his
house during his daughter's dangerous illness;
touched lightly on their having had an
interview
,
very affecting to both parties, and in
regard to the particulars of which, both, with the
shyness natural to youth, had been silent; and
finally, set forth in strong terms, the concern
evinced by Everell while Esther's recovery was
doubtful.
Notwithstanding, the letter proceeded to say,
these circumstances are so favourable to my
wishes, I have some apprehensions; and
therefore
,
brother, I bespeak your immediate
interposition
in behalf of the future spiritual prosperity
of this youth. He hath been assiduously courted
by Miss Leslie's paternal connexions, and I have
reason to believe, they have solicted him to
marry her, and bring her to England. But without
such solicitation the marriage is a probable one.
Miss Leslie is reported here, to be wanting in grace,
a want that I fear would not impoverish her in
young Fletcher's estimation; and to be a maiden
of rare comeliness, a thing precious in the eyes of
youthtoo apt to set a high price on that which
is but dust and ashes. The young lady is of great
estate too; but that I think will not weigh with
the young man, for I discern a lofty spirit in him,
that would spurn the yoke of mammon. Nor do
I think, with some of our brethren, that `gold and
grace did never yet agree.' Yet there are some,
who would make this alliance a ground of
further
scandal against our brother Fletcher. It is
whispered that his worldly affairs are not so
prosperous
as we could wish. Mark me, brother
my confidence in him is unmoved, and I think,
and am sure, that he would not permit his son to
espouse this maiden, with the dowry of a queen,
if thereby he endangered his spiritual welfare.
But, brother, you in the new world, are as a
city set on a hill. Many lie in wait for your
halting, and all appearance of evil should be
avoided. On this account and many others,
brother Fletcher and all of us should duly prize
that medium and safe condition for which Agur
prayed.
One more reason I would suggest, and then
commend the business to thy guidance, who
art justly termed by friend and foethe Moses of
God's people in the wilderness.
It seemeth to me, the motive of Miss Leslie's
mother, in going with her offspring to the colony,
should be duly weighed and respected. Could
her purpose, in any other way, be so certainly
accomplished
,
as by uniting her daughter speedily
with a godly and approved member of the
congregation
?
Every sentence of this letter stung Mr.
Fletcher
.
He repeatedly threw it down, rose from his
seat, and after taking two or three turns across
the study, screwed his courage to the sticking
point, and returned to it again. Governor
Winthrop's
attention appeared to be rivetted to a
paper he was perusing, till he could no longer,
from motives of delicacy to his friend, affect to
abstract his attention from him. Mr. Fletcher
finished the letter, and leaning over the table,
covered his face with his hands. His emotion
could not be hidden. The veins in his temples
and forehead swelled almost to bursting, and his
tears fell like rain-drops on the table. Governor
Winthrop laid his hand on his friend's arm, and
by a gentle pressure, expressed a sympathy that
it would have been difficult to embody in words.
After a few moments' struggle with his feelings,
Mr. Fletcher subdued his emotion, and turning to
Governor Winthrop, he said, with dignityI
have betrayed before you a weakness that I have
never expressed, but in that gracious presence,
where weakness is not degradation. Thus has it
ever pleased Him, who knows the infirmity of my
heart, to try me. From my youth, my path hath
been hedged up with earthly affections. Is it
that I have myself forged the fetters that bind me
to the earth? Is it that I have given to the
creature
what I owed to the Creator, that one after
another of my earthly delights is taken from me?
that I am thus stripped bare? Oh! it has been
the thought that came unbidden to my nightly
meditations, and my daily reveries, that I might
live to see these children of two saints in heaven
united. This sweet child is the image of her
blessed mother. She was her precious legacy to
me, and she hath been such a spirit of love and
contentment in my lone dwelling, that she hath
inwrought herself with every fibre of my heart.
This was natural, said Governor Winthrop.
Ay, my friendand was it not inevitable?
I did think, he continued, after a momentary
pause, that in their childhood, their affections,
as if instinct with their parents' feelings, mingled
in natural union; if their hearts retain this bent,
I think it were not right to put a force upon them.
Vol. I. 22
Certainly not, replied his friend; but the
affections of youth are flexible, and may be turned
from their natural bent by a skilful hand. It is
our known duty to direct them heaven-ward. In
taking care for the spiritual growth of our young
people, who are soon to stand in their father's
places, we do, as we are bound, most assuredly
build up the interests of our Zion. I should ill
deserve the honourable name my brethren have
given me, if I were not zealous over our youth.
In fearing any opposition from the parties in
question, I think, my worthy brother, you
disquiet
yourself in vain. It appeareth from
Downing's
letter, that there have been tender passages
between your son and his daughter Esther; and
even if Hope Leslie hath fed her fancies with
thoughts of Everell, yet I think she would be
forward
to advance her friend's happiness, for,
notwithstanding
she doth so differ from her in her
gay carriage, their hearts appear to be knit
together.
You do my beloved child but justice; what is
difficult duty to others, hath ever seemed impulse
in her; and I have sometimes thought that the
covenant of works was to her a hindrance to the
covenant of grace; and that, perhaps, she would
hate sin more for its unlawfulness, if she did not
hate it so much for its ugliness.
Governor Winthrop thought his friend went a
little too far in magnifying the virtue of his
favourite
.
Pardon, he said, the wounds inflicted
by a friendthey are faithful. I have thought
the child rests too much on
performances;
and
you must allow, brother, that she hath not, I
speak it tenderly, that passiveness, that, next to
godliness, is a woman's best virtue.
I should scarcely account, replied Mr.
Fletcher, a property of soulless matter, a virtue.
This was spoken in a tone of impatience that
indicated
truly that the speaker, like an over fond
parent, could better endure any reproach cast on
himself, than the slightest imputation on his
favourite. Governor Winthrop was not a man
to shrink from inflicting what he deemed a
salutary
pain, because his patient recoiled from his
touch, he therefore proceeded in his admonition.
Partiality is dangerous, as we see in the
notable
history of David and Absalom, and
elsewhere
;
and perhaps it was your too great
indulgence
that emboldened the child to the daring
deed of violating the law, by the secret release
of the condemned.
That violation rests on suspicion, not proof,
said Mr. Fletcher, hastily.
And why, replied Governor Winthrop,
smiling
,
is it permitted to rest on suspicion?
from respect to our much suffering brother
Fletcher
,
and consideration of the youth of the
offender
,
we have winked at the offence. But we will
pass thatI would be the last to lift the veil that
hath fallen over it; I only alluded to it, to enforce
the necessity of a stricter watch over this lawless
girl. Would it not be wise and prudent to take
my brother's counsel, and consign her to some
one who should add to affection, the modest
authority
of a husband?
Governor Winthrop paused for a reply, but
receiving
none, he proceededOne of our most
promising youth hath this day discoursed to me
of Hope Leslie, and expressed a matrimonial
intent
towards her.
And who is this? demanded Mr. Fletcher.
William Hubbardthe youth who hath come
with so much credit from our prophets' school at
Cambridge. He is a discreet young man, steeped
in learning, and of approved orthodoxy.
These be cardinal points with us, replied
Mr. Fletcher, calmly, but they are not like to
commend him to a maiden of Hope Leslie's
temper
.
She inclineth not to bookish men, and is
apt to vent her childish gaiety upon the ungainly
ways of scholars.
Thus our heroine, by her peculiar taste, lost at
least the golden opportunity of illustrating
herself
by a union with the future historian of
New-England
.
After a little consideration, the governor
resumed
the conversation. It is difficult, he said,
to suit a maiden who hath more whim, than
reason
what
think you of Sir Philip Gardiner?
Sir Philip Gardiner! a new-comer of to-day!
and old enough to be the father of Hope Leslie!
The fitter guide for her youth. Besides,
brother
,
you magnify his agehe is still on the best
side of forty. He is a man of good family, who,
after having fought on the side where his birth
naturally
cast him, hath been plucked, as a brand
from the burning, by the preaching and
exhortation
of the godly Mr. Wilkins; and feeling, as he
declares, a pious horror at the thought of
imbruing
his hands any further in blood, he hath come
to cast his lot among us, instead of joining our
friends in England.
Hath he credentials to verify all these
particulars
?
Governor Winthrop coloured, slightly, at an
interrogatory
that implied a deficiency of wariness
on his part, and replied, that he thought the
gentleman
scarcely needed other than he carried in
his language and deportment, but that he had
come furnished with a letter of introduction,
satisfactory
in all points.
From whom? inquired Mr. Fletcher.
From one Jeremy Austinwho expresseth
himself as, and Sir Philip says is, a warm friend
to us.
Is he known to you?
Nobut I think I have heard him mentioned
as a well-willer to our colony.
This was not perfectly satisfactory to Mr.
Fletcher, but he forbore to press the point further,
and turned his attack to that part of the
suggestion
that appeared most vulnerable. Methinks,
he said, you are over-hasty in proposing to
match Hope Leslie with this stranger.
22*
Nay, I meant not a formal proposition. I
noted that Sir Philip was struck with Hope's
outward
graces. He is an uncommon personable
man, and hath that bearing that finds favour in
maidens' eyes, and the thought came to me, that
he may have been sent here, in good time, to
relieve
all our perplexities; and to confess the truth,
brother, if I may use the sporting language of our
youth, I am impatient to put jesses on this wild
bird of yours, while she is on our perch. But to
be serious, and surely the subject doth enforce us
to it, I am satisfied that you will not oppose any
means that may offer to secure the lambs of our
flock in the true fold.
I shall oppose nothing that will promote the
spiritual prosperity of those dear to me as my own
soul. I have no reason to doubt my son's filial
obedience; he hath never been wanting, and
though both he and I have fallen under censure,
I see not that I erred in sending him from me,
since I but complied with the last request of his
sainted mother, and that compliance deprived me
of the only child left of my little flock. I speak
not vauntingly; but let not those who have
remained
in Egypt, condemn him who has drank
of the bitterest waters of the wilderness. Mr.
Fletcher, finding himself again yielding to
irrepressible
emotions, rose and hastily left his more
equal-tempered and less interested friend.
Thus did these good men, not content with
their magnanimous conflict with necessary evils,
involve themselves in superfluous trials. Whatever
gratified the natural desires of the heart was
questionable
,
and almost every thing that was difficult
and painful, assumed the form of duty. As if the
benevolent Father of all had stretched over our
heads a canopy of clouds, instead of the bright
firmament, and its glorious host, and
ever-changing
beauty; and had spread under our feet a
wilderness
of bitter herbs, instead of every tree and
plant yielding its good fruit.But we would fix
our eyes on the bright halo that encircled the
pilgrims'
head; and not mark the dust that
sometimes
sullied his garments.
CHAPTER
XII
.
Then crush, even in their hour of birth
The infant buds of love,
And tread his glowing fire to earth,
Ere 'tis dark in clouds above.
Halleck
.
The
observance of the Sabbath began with
the puritans, as it still does with a great portion
of their descendants, on Saturday night. At the
going down of the sun on Saturday, all temporal
affairs were suspended; and so zealously did our
fathers maintain the letter, as well as the spirit of
the law, that, according to a vulgar tradition in
Connecticut, no beer was brewed in the latter
part of the week, lest it should presume to
work
on Sunday.
It must be confessed that the tendency of the
age is to laxity; and so rapidly is the wholesome
strictness of primitive times abating, that, should
some antiquary, fifty years hence, in exploring
his garret rubbish, chance to cast his eye on our
humble pages, he may be surprised to learn, that
even now the Sabbath is observed, in the
interior
of New-England, with an almost judaical
severity.
On Saturday afternoon an uncommon bustle is
apparent. The great class of procrastinators are
hurrying to and fro to complete the lagging
business
of the week. The good mothers, like Burns'
matron, are plying their needles, making auld
claes look amaist as weel's the new; while the
domestics, or help,
4
4.
Mr. Mathews, (nice observer as he is) as well as many
other foreigners, mistakes in adding an
s
to this word for the
plural.
(we prefer the national
descriptive
term) are wielding with might and main,
their brooms, and
mops,
to make all
tidy
for the
Sabbath.
As the day declines, the hum of labour dies
away, and after the sun is set, perfect stillness
reigns in every well-ordered household, and not a
foot-fall is heard in the village street. It cannot
be denied, that even the most spiritual, missing
the excitement of their ordinary occupations,
anticipate
their usual bed-time. The obvious
inference
from this fact, is skilfully avoided by
certain
ingenious reasoners, who allege that the
constitution
was originally so organised, as to require
an extra quantity of sleep on every seventh night.
We recommend it to the curious, to inquire, how
this peculiarity was adjusted, when the first day
of the week was changed from Saturday to
Sunday
.
The Sabbath morning is as peaceful as the
first hallowed day. Not a human sound is heard
without the dwellings, and but for the lowing of
the herds, the crowing of the cocks, and the
gossipping of the birds, animal life would seem to
be extinct, till, at the bidding of the church-going
bell, the old and young issue from their
habitations
,
and with solemn demeanor, bend their
measured steps to the
meeting-house
. The family
of the ministerthe squirethe doctorthe
merchants
the
modest gentry of the village, and the
mechanic and labourer, all arranged in their best,
all meeting on even ground, and all with that
consciousness of independence and equality,
which breaks down the pride of the rich, and
rescues
the poor from servility, envy, and discontent.
If a morning salutation is reciprocated, it is in a
suppressed voice; and if perchance, nature, in
some reckless urchin, burst forth in laughter, my
dear, you forget it's Sunday! is the ever ready
reproof.
Though every face wears a solemn aspect, yet
we once chanced to see even a deacon's muscles
relaxed by the wit of a neighbour, and heard him
allege in a half deprecating, half laughing voice,
the squire is so droll, that a body must laugh,
though it be Sabbath-day.
The farmer's ample waggon, and the little
one-horse
vehicle, bring in all who reside at an
inconvenient
walking distance,that is to say, in our
riding community, half a mile from the church.
It is a pleasing sight to those who love to note
the happy peculiarities of their own land, to see
the farmer's daughters blooming, intelligent, and
well-bred, pouring out of these homely coaches,
with their nice white gowns, prunel shoes, leghorn
hats, fans, and parasols, and the spruce young
men with their plaited ruffles, blue coats, and
yellow buttons. The whole community meet
as one religious family, to offer their devotions
at the common altar. If there is an
out-law
from the societya luckless wight, whose
vagrant taste has never been subdued, he may
be seen stealing along the margin of some little
brook, far away from the condemning
observation
,
and troublesome admonitions of his fellows.
Towards the close of the day, or, (to borrow a
phrase descriptive of his feelings who first used
it) `when the sabbath begins to
abate,
' the
children
cluster about the windows. Their eyes
wander
from their catechisms to the western sky,
and though it seems to them as if the sun would
never disappear, his broad disk does slowly sink
behind the mountain; and while his last ray still
lingers on the eastern summits, merry voices break
forth, and the ground resounds with bounding
footsteps. The village-belle arrays herself for
her twilight walk; the boys gather on `the green;'
the lads and girls throng to the `singing-school;'
while some coy maiden lingers at home, awaiting
her expected suitorand all enter upon the
pleasures
of the evening with as keen a relish as if
the day had been a preparatory penance.
After having favoured our readers with this long
skipping-place, we resume the thread of our
narrative
.
We have passed over eight days, which
glided away without supplying any events to the
historian of our heroine's life; though even then
the thread was spinning that was to form the woof
of her destiny.
Intent on verifying the prediction she had made
to Esther, that Everell would soon declare
himself
her lover, she promoted the intercourse of the
parties in every way she could, without making
her motive apparent. While she treated Everell
with frank sisterly affection, and was always easy
and animated in his society, which she enjoyed
above all other pleasures, she sedulously sought
to bring Esther's moral and mental graces forth
to the light. In their occasional walks, she took
good care that Everell should be the companion
of her friend, while she permitted Sir Philip
Gardiner
to attend her. He was a man of the world,
au fait in all the arts of society, and though he
sometimes offended her by the excess of his
flattering
gallantries, yet he often deeply interested
her with his lively descriptions of countries and
manners unknown to her.
It was just at twilight, on Saturday evening,
when the elder Mr. Fletcher coming into Madam
Winthrop's parlour, found his son sitting there
alone, and interrupted a very delightful
meditation
on the eloquence of Hope Leslie, who had
just been with him, descanting on the virtues of
her friend Esther. The charms of the fair
speaker
had, we believe, a far larger share of his
thoughts, than the subject of her harangue.
We have a lecture extraordinary to-night,
said Mr. Fletcher; our rulers some time since,
issued an order limiting our regular religious
meetings to one, during the week. Shall you go,
my son?
Sirgo to the lecture? replied Everell, as
if just waking from a dream, and then added, for
then he caught a glimpse of Hope through the
door, with her hat and mantle. Oh, yes
certainly
sir, I shall go to the lecture.
He snatched his hat, and would have joined
Miss Leslie; but she saw his intention, and
turning
to him, as she passed the threshold of the
door, she said, You need not go with me,
Everell
;
I have to call for aunt Grafton, at Mrs.
Cotton's
.
May not I call with you?
No; I had rather you would not, she said
decidedly, and hurried away without any
explanation
of her preference.
What can have disturbed Hope? asked Mr.
Fletcher, for both he and his son had observed
that her cheek was flushed, and her eye tearful.
I cannot imagine, replied Everell; she left
me not half an hour since, all smiles and gaiety.
It is but the April-temper of youth, said the
father. Hope is of a feeling make: she often
reminds me of the Delta lands, where the fruits
spring forth before the waters have retired. Smiles
Vol. I. 23
are playing on her lips before the tear is dry on
her cheek. But this sensitiveness should be
checked
;
the dear child's feelings have too long been
indulged.
And as long as they are all innocent, Sir, why
should they not be indulged?
Because, my son, she must be hardened for
the cross-accidents and unkind events, or, rather
I should say, the wholesome chastisements of life.
She cannotwe can none of usexpect
indulgence
from the events of life. Mr. Fletcher
paused for a moment, looked around, then shut
the door, and returned to his son. Everell, he
said, you have ever been dutiful to me.
And ever shall be, my dear father, replied
Everell with frank confidence, little thinking how
soon the virtue might become difficult.
Trust not, my son, to thine own strength; it
may soon be put to a test that will make thee feel
it to be but weakness. Everell, thou seest that
Hope loves thee even as she loved thee in thy
childhood. Let her affection remain of this
temper
,
I charge thee, as thou respectest thy father's,
and thine own honour. And, Everell, it were
well if you fixed your eye on
Stop, sir!stop, I beseech you, and tell me
not because I have any thoughtsany
intentions
,
I meanany formed purpose, I would say
but tell me, I entreat you, why this
prohibition
?
Everell spoke with such earnestness and
ingenuousness
,
that his father could not refuse to
answer
him: but his reasons seemed even to himself
to lose half their force as they emerged from their
shroud of mystery. He acknowledged, in the
first place, what his most cherished wishes had
been, in relation to Hope, and Everell. He then
communicated the intimations that had been
thrown out, that his views for his son were
mercenary
.
Everell laughed at the idea. No one, he
said, can so well afford such an imputation as
you, sir, whose whole life has been a practical
refutation of it: and for my own part, I am
satisfied
with the consciousness that I would not
marry any woman with a fortune, whom I would
not marry if the case were reversed, or even if
we were both pennyless.
I believe this is not an empty boast, my son;
but we have set ourselves up for a mark to the
world, and, as brother Winthrop has said, and
repeated to me, we cannot be too solicitous to
avoid all appearance of evil. There are
covetous
souls, who, on the slightest ground, would
suspect
us of pursuing our own worldly by-ends.
And so, sir, to win the approbation, or rather
the good word of these covetous souls, we are to
degrade ourselves to their level, and act as if we
were capable of their mean passions.
Everell! my son, you speak presumptuously;
we are capable of all evil;but we will waive
that question at present. Our individual wishes
must be surrendered to the public good. We
who have undertaken this great work in the
wilderness
,
must not live to ourselves. We have laid
the foundation of an edifice, and our children
must be so coupled together, as to secure its
progress and stability when the present builders
are laid low.
And so, my dear father, a precious gem is to
be mortared in like a common brick, wherever
may best suit the purposes and views of the
builders
.
You are displeased, Sir. Perhaps I spoke
somewhat hastily. But, once for all, I entreat
you not to dispose of us as if we were mere
machines
:
we owe you our love and reverence.
And obedience, Everell.
Yes, sir, as far as it can be manifested by not
doing what you command us not to do.
Have I then strained parental authority so
far, that you think it necessary thus to qualify
your duty?
No, indeed, my dear father; and it is because
your authority has ever been too gentle to be felt,
that I wince at the galling of a new yoke. You
will admit that my submission has not been less
perfect, for being voluntary. Trust me, then, for
the future; and I promise
Everell was perhaps saved from rashly
committing
himself, by the entrance of Madam Winthrop,
who inquired if the gentlemen were ready to
attend her to the lecture.
Come, Mr. Everell, she said, here is Esther
to show you the way, than whom there can be no
safer guide.
Miss Downing stood beside her aunt, but she
shrunk back at Everell's approach, hurt at what
seemed to her a solicitation for his attention. He
perceived her instinctive movement, but without
appearing to notice it, he offered his arm to
Madam
Winthrop, saying, As there is no skill in
guiding one quite willing to be led, I will not
impose
the trouble on Miss Downing, if you will
allow me the honour of attending you.
Madam Winthrop submitted with the best grace
to this cross purpose. The elder Fletcher offered
his arm to Miss Downing, and endeavoured to
draw her into conversation; but she was timid,
downcast, and reserved; and mentally comparing
her with Hope Leslie, he felt how improbable it
was that Everell would ever prefer her. The old,
even when grave and rigid, are said to affect the
young and gay; on the same principle, perhaps,
that a dim eye delights in bright colours.
Is that Gorton's company? asked Everell,
pointing towards several prisoners, who, in the
custody of a file of soldiers, appeared to be going
towards the sanctuary.
Yes, replied Madam Winthrop; the
governor
and our ruling elders have determined, that
as they are to be tried next week, they shall have
the benefit of all our public teaching in the mean
time.
23*
I should fear they would deem this
punishment
before trial, said Everell.
They did reluct mightily at first; but on
being
promised that if they had occasion to speak,
after sermon, they should be permitted, provided
they only spoke the words of sobriety and truth,
they consented to come forth.
This Gorton, whom Hubbard calls `a
prodigious
minter of exorbitant novelties,' had been
brought, with his adherents, from Rhode-Island,
by force of arms, to be tried for certain civil and
ecclesiastical offences, for which, according to the
most learned antiquary of our new world, (Mr.
Savage,) they were not amenable to the
magistracy
of Massachusetts.
The prisoners were ushered into the church,
and placed before the ruling elders. The
governor
then entered, unattended by his
halberd-bearers
,(a
ceremony dispensed with, except on
Sunday)and, followed by his family, he walked
slowly to his pew, where Miss Leslie was already
seated between Mrs. Grafton, and Sir Philip
Gardiner
.
She rose, and contrived to exchange her
location for one next Miss Downing. Look,
Esther, she said in a whisper to her friend, at
that lad who stands in the corner of the gallery,
just beside the lamp.
I see him; but what of him?
Why, just observe how he gazes at me: his
eye is like a burning-glassit really scorches me.
I wish the service were over. Do you think it
will be long?
It may be long, but I trust not tedious,
replied
Esther, with a gravity which was the
harshest
rebuke she could ever command.
Oh, it will be both! said Hope, in a
despairing
tone; for there is Mr. Wheeler in the pulpit,
and he always talks of eternity till he forgets
time.
My dear Hope! said Esther, in a voice of
mingled surprise and reproof.
The service presently began, and Hope
endeavoured
dutifully to assume a decorous demeanour,
and join Esther in singing the psalm; but her
mind was soon abstracted, and her voice died
away.
The preacher had not proceeded far in his
discourse
,
before all her patience was exhausted.
Even those who are the most strenuous advocates
for the passive duties of the sanctuary, might have
bestowed their pity on our heroine, who had really
serious cause for her feverish impatience; obliged
to sit, while a young man, accounted a `universal
scholar,' seemed determined, like many unfledged
preachers, to tell all he knew in that one
discourse
,
which was then called a prophesyingan
extempore effusion. He was bent, not only on
making `root and branch work' of poor Gorton's
heresies, but on eradicating every tare from the
spiritual field. To Hope, he appeared to maintain
one even pace straight forward, like the mortal in
the fairy tale, sentenced to an eternal walk over
a boundless plain.
Do, Esther, look at the candles, she
whispered
;
don't you think it must be nine o'clock?
Oh hush!no, not yet eight.
Hope sighed audibly, and once more resumed
a listening attitude. All human labours have their
end, and therefore had the preacher's. But, alas
for our heroine! when he had finished, Gorton,
whose face for the last hour had expressed that
he felt much like a criminal condemned to be
scourged before he is hungGorton rose, and,
smarting under a sense of wrongs, he repeated all
the points of the discourse, and made points where
there were none; refuted and attacked, and
proved
(to his own satisfaction), `that all ordinances,
ministers, sacraments, &c. were but men's
inventions
silver
shrines of Diana.'
While this self-styled `professor of mysteries'
spoke, Hope was so much interested in his
genuine
enthusiasm and mysticism, (for he was the
Swedenborg of his day,) that she forgot her own
secret subject of anxiety: but when he had
finished
,
and half a dozen of the ruling elders rose at
the same moment to prove the weapons of
orthodoxy
upon the arch heretic, she whispered to
Esther, I can never bear this;I must make
an apology to Madam Winthrop, and go home.
Stay, said Esther; do you not see Mr.
Cotton is getting up?
Mr. Cotton, the regular pastor, rose to remind
his brethren of the decree, that private
members
should be very sparing in their questions and
observations after public sermons; and to say,
that he should postpone any farther discussion of
the precious points before them, as it was near
nine o'clockafter which it was not suitable for
any christian family to be unnecessarily abroad.
Hope now, and many others instinctively rose,
in anticipation of the dismissing benediction; but
Mr. Cotton waved his hand for them to sit down,
till he could communicate to the congregation the
decision to which the ruling elders and himself
had come, on the subject of the last Sabbath
sermon
.
`He would not repeat what he had before
said upon that lust of costly apparel, which was
fast gaining ground, and had already, as was well
known, crept into godly families. He was pleased
that there were among them gracious women,
ready to turn at a rebuke, as was manifested in
many veils being left at home, that were floating
over the congregation like so many butterflies'
wings in the morning. Economy, he justly
observed
,
was, as well as simplicity, a christian
grace; and therefore the rulers had determined,
that those persons who had run into the excess of
immoderate veils and sleeves, embroidered caps,
and gold and silver lace, should be permitted to
wear them out, but new ones should be forfeited.'
This sumptuary regulation announced, the
meeting was dismissed.
Madam Winthrop whispered to Everell that
she was going, with his father, to look in upon a
sick neighbour, and would thank him to see her
niece home. Everell stole a glance at Hope, and
dutifully offered his arm to Miss Downing.
Hope, intent only on one object, was hurrying
out of the pew, intending, in the jostling of the
crowd, to escape alone; but she was arrested by
Madam Winthrop's saying, Miss Leslie, Sir
Philip offers you his arm; and at the same
moment
her aunt stooped forward, to beg her to wait
a moment till she could send a message to
Deacon
Knowles' wife, that she might wear her new
gown with the Turkish sleeves the next day.
Oh martyrdom! thought Hope, with indeed
little of the spirit of a martyr. She dared not
speak aloud, but she continued to whisper to Mrs.
GraftonFor pity's sake, do leave Mrs. Knowles
to take care of herself; I am tired to death with
staying here.
No wonder, replied her aunt, in the same
low tone, it is enough to tire Job himself;but
just have a minute's patience, dearie; it is but
doing as a body would be done by, to let Mistress
Knowles know she may come out in her new
gown to-morrow.
Well, just as you please, ma'am; but I will
go along with Sir Philip, and you can follow with
Mr. Cradock. Mr. Cradock, you will wait for
Mrs. Grafton?
Surely, surely, said the good man eagerly;
there is nothing you could ask me, Miss Hope,
as you well knowbe it ever so disagreeable
that I would not do.
Thank you for nothing, Mr. Cradock, said
the testy dame, with a toss of her head; you
are over civil, I think, to-night. It is very well,
Miss Hope, it is very well;you may go;you
know Cradock at best is purblind at night;but
it is very well;you can goI can get home
alone. It is very peculiar of you, Mr. Cradock.
Poor Cradock saw he had offended, but how,
he knew not; and he looked imploringly to Hope
to extricate him; but she was too anxious about
her own affairs, to lend her usual benevolent care
to his embarrassment.
My dear aunt, said she, I will not go
without
you, if you prefer to go with me; only do
let us go.
Mrs. Grafton now acquiesced, for in her flurry
she had lost sight of the messenger whom she
intended to entrust with the important errand.
Sir Philip arranged her hood and cloak; with
a grace that she afterwards said was so like
her dear deceased, and in a few moments, the
party was in the street, and really moving
homeward
.
Mrs. Grafton prided herself on a slow,
measured
step, which she fancied was the true gait of
dignity. Hope, on the contrary, always moved,
as the spirit moved her; and now she felt an
irresistible
impulse to hurry forward.
My dear, said her aunt, how can you fly
so? I am sure, if they in England were to see
you walk, they would think you had been brought
up here to chase the deer in the woods.
Hope dared not confess her anxiety to get
forward
,
and she could no longer check it.
It is very undignified, and very unladylike,
and very unbecoming, Hope; and I must say, it
is untoward and unfroward of you, to hurry me
along so. Don't you think it is very peculiar of
Hope, Sir Philip?
The knight suspected that Miss Leslie's haste
was merely impatience of his society; and he
could scarcely curb his chagrin, while he said,
that the young lady undoubtedly moved with
uncommon celerity;indeed he had before
suspected
she had invisible wings.
Thank you for your hint, Sir Philip,
exclaimed
Hope. It is a night, she continued, looking
up at the bright moon, to make one long to soar
so I will just spread my wings, and leave you
to crawl on the earth. She withdrew her arm
from Sir Philip's, and tripping on before them,
she soon turned a corner, and was out of sight.
We must leave the knight, biting his lips with
vexation, and feeling much like a merchant
obliged
to pay a heavy duty on a lost article.
However
,
to do him justice, he did not make an entire
loss of it, but so adroitly improved the
opportunity
to win the aunt's favour, that she afterwards
said to Hope, that if she must see her wedded to
a puritan, she trusted it would be Sir Philip, for
he had nothing of the puritan but the outside.
Hope had not proceeded far, when she heard
a quick step behind her, and looking back, she
saw the young man whose gaze had disturbed her
at the lecture. She had an indefinite womanly
feeling of fear; but a second thought told her she
had best conceal it, and she slackened her pace.
Her pursuer approached till he was parallel to
her, and slackened his also. He looked at her
without speaking; and as Hope glanced her eye
at him, she was struck with an expression of
wretchedness and passion that seemed unnatural,
on a countenance so young and beautiful. Any
thing is better than this strange silence, thought
Hope; so she stopped, looked the stranger full in
the face, and said inquiringly, You have
perhaps
lost your way?
Lost my way? replied the youth, in a half
articulate voice: Yes, ladyI have lost my
way.
The melancholy tone and mysterious look of
the stranger, led Hope to suspect that he meant
to convey more than the natural import of his
words; but without seeming to understand more,
she said, I perceive, by your foreign accent, that
you are a stranger here. If you will tell me where
you wish to go, I will direct you.
And who will guide
you,
lady? responded
the stranger, in a thrilling tone. The lost may
warn, but cannot guide.
I need no guidance, said Hope hastily, still
persisting in understanding him literally: I am
Vol. I. 24
familiar with the way; and if I cannot be of
service
to you, must bid you good night.
Stop one moment! exclaimed the stranger,
laying his hand on Hope's arm, with an imploring
look: You look so goodso kindyou may be
of service to me; and then bursting into a
passionate
flood of tears, he addedOh, mon
Dieu!No, nothere is no help for me!
Hope now lost all thought for herself, in
concern
for the unhappy being before her. Who
or what are you? she asked.
I!what am I? he replied in a bitter tone:
Sir Philip Gardiner's slaveor servantor
pageorwhatever he is pleased to call me.
Nay, lady, look not so piteously on me!I love
my masterat least, I did love him;but I
think innocence is the breath of love!Heaven's
mercy, lady! you will make me weep again, if you
look at me thus.
Nay, do not weep; but tell me, said Hope,
what I can do for you: I cannot remain here
longer.
Oh! you can do nothing for meno one can
do any thing for me. But, ladytake care for
thyself.
What do you mean? demanded Hope, in a
tone of mingled alarm and impatience: do you
mean any thing?
The boy looked apprehensively about him, and
approaching his lips close to Hope's ear, he said
in a whisperPromise me you will not love my
master. Do not believe him, though he pledge
the word of a true knight always to love you;
though he swear it on the holy crucifix, do not
believe it!
Hope now began to think that the youth's
senses
were impaired; and, more impatient than ever
to escape from him, she saidOh, I can
promise
all that, and as much more in the same way,
as you will ask of me. But leave me now, and
come to me again, when you want a much more
difficult service.
I never shall want any thing else, lady, he
replied, shaking his head sorrowfully: I want
nothing else, but that you would pity me! You
may, for angels pity; and I am sure you look like
one. Pity me!never speak of me, and forget
me. He dropped on his kneepressed her hand
to his lipsrose to his feet, and left her so
hastily
,
that she was scarcely conscious of his
departure
till he was beyond her sight.
Whatever matter for future reflection this
interview
might have afforded her, Hope had now no
time to dwell on it; and she hastened forward,
and surmounting a fence at the south-eastern
extremity of the burial ground, she entered the
enclosure, now the church-yard of the stone
chapel
.
The moon was high in the heavens; masses
of black clouds were driven by a spring gale over
her bright disk, producing startling changes, from
light to darkness, and from darkness to that
gleamy, indefinite, illusive brightness, which gives
to moonlight its dominion over the imagination.
At another time, Hope Leslie would have
shrunk from going alone, so late at night, to this
region of silence and sad thoughts; and her fancy
might have embodied the shadows that flitted
over the little mounds of earth, but she was now
so engrossed by one absorbing, anxious
expectation
,
that she scarcely thought of the place where
it was to be attainedand she pressed on, as if
she was passing over common clods. Once,
indeed
,
she paused, as the moon shot forth a bright
raystooped down before a little hillock
pressed
her brow to the green turf, and then raising
her eyes to heaven, and clasping her hands, she
exclaimed, Oh, my mother! if ever thy
presence
is permitted to me, be with me now!
After this solemn adjuration, she again rose to
her feet, and looked anxiously around her for
some expected object. But I cannot know,
she said, till I have passed the thicket of
evergreens
;that
was the appointed spot.
She passed the thicketand at that moment
the intensity of her feelings spread a mist before
her eyes. She faltered, and leaned on one of the
grave-stones for support;and there we must
leave her for the present, to the secresy she
sought.
END OF VOLUME FIRST.